      "identifier" : [
         "8_06251_264"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "TrHE LNADIAN «JAZINE PRICE 25 CENTS 'he Fi tory of ie fa rgeant itzge iThree omp wson- Walker's Ear. Six Short Stories. FEBRUARY. 19g15 Co.,",
         "r",
         "CANÂDIÂN MÂGÂZINE ÂDVEBTISEB ___ THE EVER POPULAR HOUSEHOLD REMEDYi Which has now borne the Stainp of Public approval for OVER FORTY YEARS. à ENO'S PLEASANTý TO TAKE, Refreshing and Invigoraig THERE is no simpler, safer or Miore 'U! 5AINE.'.oi ..FRUTPO*qý T agrecable aperient which wlI, by natural mnea rs, get rid of dmngerous wastc matter without depressing the PLEASNT COLIN pirits or Iowering the vitality. INVIORATNCfIt can be safely uscd every day# z il even by invalids and children. THE BEST OF ALL HOUSEHOLD REMEDIES. AT ALL TI1M ES.",
         "~jqI_~~~! The Canadian Magazine Vol. XLIV Contents, February, 1915 No. YOUTH AND SUNLIGHT - - - - HEROES OF THE' CANADIAN ARCTIC T-E OLD WARRIOR. VERSE - - - FAMOUS CANADIAN TRIALS - - - \u0026URENTIANS. A PAINTIN IN UNFREQUENTED ILLUSTRATED - - - \u003eIO. A PAINTING - - PHER - · - - - - NO 111. E OF Two. FICTION - )N. VERSE - - - - PTION OF THREE STAR ND BOATS. A PAINTIN AND THE COYOTE. FICTI [P DE MARS. VERSE - T JEW. FICTION - - 3EACHi. A PAINTING USES OF THE WAR - - DR CUP. FICTION - - ZY OF TIHE CHIEF OF PO [ON. VERSE - - - - G - NOvÂ A. Suzor A. V. Tho Frances 1 A.- GordoJ Clarence - - W. Lacey -- Louis Mel - A. R. Cari - - Rosa Mult - - A. G. Mac - - Stanley P - Ernest Li ON - Edward F - - R. Stanle) - Francis 1 - - Franklin - - Theodore - · Neil Mun",
         "OÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER -atrtosphiere: -I ERE is somnething in the atmosphere of the World's Greatest Hotel that can be duplicated nowhere else. The resourcesr of the Cecil-its Restaur- ant, Palmn Court, Grill Room, Indian Floor, and the kind of peopie one ithere, offer the bon vivant the highest interpretation of bis ideas cleals of hotel life-at a reasonabie figure. VERLO OKING Cieopatra's Needie, with broad and noble frontage to the Thames Embankment. Main entrance approached fromn the Strand, City and West End and ail principal centres of business, amusement, and st, equaliy accessible. i E Cecil is the most comprehensiveiy-equipped residential establishment in he world. Accomodation for 850 guests. Bathroomn adjoins every bedroomn; elephone in every room. Resources of a smiali town at the visitors disposai. Sai the Canadian Magazine Trayel Bueeau, Toronto, Canada, for a copy of the Hotel itRookiet. This shows, by text and illusttation, soma of ke.luxuries of theHotet's in- 0or, its imposing exterior, the cost of/a stay, b, ef op extended and con tains a va rety 0f eral information tkat ni be found very useful to the intending visitors to London. ePhwcAddress 'liaç, Rand\" [15iI.kL) r-oi'don",
         "THZE March Number. 'STAMBOUL 0F THE SULTANS By ALBERT R. CARMAN An intimate and graphie description of a visit to a great playground of the Turkish Sultans, while it was yet Turkish. There are a numnber of beautiful photographs for illustration. FANOUS CANADIAN TRIALS No. .3 of this series deals with the trial of Patrick Whalen for the assassination of Thomnas D'Arcy McGee. Lt is written by C. S. Blue, and gives a vivld accoutt of one of the most dramatic episodes in Canadiait political life. OLD-TIME TRAVEL THROUGH THE YELLOWHEAD PASS B\u003e. EMILY P. WEÂVER Now that two transcontinental railways are using this famous pass as a means of reaching the Paci fic, it is intensely interesting to read Miss Weaver's account of travél in that region before it was opened up. There wilt be as well a choice selection of short stories, arnong them a capital one entitled \" The Magician's Box,\" b\u003e' Madge Macbeth, author of \" The Adven- tures of Anîwar Ali,\" Etc. $2.50 PER ANNUM. Including Great Britain, Ireland and most of the Colonies. SINGLE COPIES, 25 CENTS. THE CANADIAN MAGAZINJ 200-206 Adelaide Street West TORONTr",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 5 Are yqu Satisfied ,With your Complexion or are you afraid of losing the complexion you have? Try \"LA-ROLA\" agreaseless preparation ,with a delicate fragrance. LA-ROLA is a high. grade cream used by men and women. It keeps the skin soft and gives beauty to the complexion. After shaving it soothes the irritated skin. Its uneq4ualled qualîtîes have won it a 'world wide CET A BOTTLE FROM YOUR'DRL'CGJIST TODA Y YOUILL BE DEL.IGHTED WITH THE I ESI\u0026S Maau(actured by Ml. Beetiasa \u0026 son, Chultenira, Enit. SUCCESSEs R.M.C Entrance 2nd, lUthi CA~JDPW~ places, 1914. Head Master: McGill Science, lst place 1910, lat C. S. Fosbery, M.A. place 1912, 2nd MONTREAL place 1913. Ex- hibition Arts, 1913. WHAT RECOMMENDS ITSELF? wARKING INKI%",
         "CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE - ADVERTISEB LONDON O LOVE COMPAN CHEAPSIDI, LONDON, INGLAKD'.1 Direct Attention to Theîr' Unrivalled Varicty of British Madle The \"CONNAUCUT\" Ladies 11= 7is qumlt Ups Ooe,(British mace inTan shades, Spear Points, Prix seani sown, 2 Press Buttons\", 71 cents per pair. No. 315. - Laidies' DOO$kIln SIoves,(British nmade) in useful shadesof Grey, Tan or BoaVer, SPique sow. 2 Press Buttons, si centmier Pair. yTh. «OANADUAII\" Ladies' Buoksidn Finish CloVes, excell- ent woaring,' in Tan or Grey, Prix scen sevwn,3Buttons,95 centIs pet pair. lea' Real Seerakin aloves, in k Tan andi Dark Grey, (British e) Prix seam, sown, 2 Press But- - £1 .114 ver vair. Ladies' Strénes UpeaSlaves, in Tan or Oask sbade, 6 Button LeniÈh withWideArnis, Stlrp and tss Button ns illustration, Spear Points, Prix soarn sewvn, $1.20 per pair. L adies*' *0ANAflIAN\" Bluck Finish in same style as above, in Tan or Dark Grey, $1.44 Par p a ir. M N S C O E lIrong Dmesldin Buck Finish, in Tan or DarkGrey, (British matie\u003e prix seani sown, i PresseButton, 13 Censi pe, pair. Tii e«OAAiAN\"9 Buck Finish Cloves. in Tan or Grey, a splendid Giove for wear, (British made) 1 Pros Button, 95 il- cents per pait. Men'. Real Derskn GObveq in T an or Datk G~rey, (British madie) Prix searn sewn, 1 press Button, S$1.34 per pair. i Dont Qualitu c Natutal Colour, i Hanti sown witi SPearl Button, S5 LadleVp Sosiki Claves, Bluck Finish n rk Tan or Grey wt*oiLniTe andi Fur Tops, White Fur Lining at wrist asillustrationl, Strap antI Press - Button, $1.20 pet pair. jadies' 8Str o n 9 Dark Tan Sape Sloves, without Fur Tops, with Warin Wooi Lining, Strap suiable orSle;g 95ceint pet pair. Ladise'- BS0KSCN,1\" in Tan or Grey without Fur Tops, Lined F'ur throughout. Puewfl, Gusset Wrist trap 2.nd Press Button. Laies' Dleeiin, Buck Finish, in~ Tan or Grey, Lineti White Frt, Pique sewn. a. illustration, 2 Press Buttons $1ý34 pier pair. Lade' Reoal Ridaer Sloves, (Bitish madie) in rich shades of Tanf or \u003cGrev, Prix searn sewn, 2 B uttons, $1.34 pet pair. Mes@ite, witli one Lare Pearl Button, $.9per pair. SIrong Cape. Prixstr sewn, Double Palm, Wool Lining, in Tan or Black, StraP and Press Button, as illustration, $1.09 pet pair. lise mront Coatskin Sape Cloveu, in Dark Tan aliade, Lined i *th Best OualitY Perless",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Woza/ )ILET G UIDE lnolia Preparations com bine goo d tas te and high quality at small 1cost 7inolia Toilet Preparations higher Standard of Quality )assable \"Vinolia\" Standard [A TALCUM POWDERS - i -A-an exquisite talcuni, superbly in very large tin, 25c. -E CHARLIE-a talcuna with the Eeatber perfume. Extra large E DE PARME..finest quality ta!- h Italian Violet odour, 20c. IA DENTIFRICES - ini three nolia Tooth Paste, Tooth Powder 'race, Noted for antiseptic as well 4rs. All tlaree 25c. each. ýL CREAM SOAP-a pure white Lii the valuabie medicinal proper- nolia Creamn. An incomparable per box of three tablets. ROYAL VINOLIA VANISHING CREAM-a cool- ing and refreshing creamn that vanishes froni the skîn as soon as it has done its beafing work. In jars and tubes, 25c. LYPSYL -is an exquisite toilet preparation for keeping the lips in a healthy rose-like condition, 15c. ROYAL VINOLIA CREAM4-or beautifying and preserving the skin.-sold in two sizes at 35c. and 50c. ROYAL VINOLiA FACE POWDER-4mparts to the skiai the velvety appearance of a well ripended pe'ach. 50c. a box. ROYAL VINOIA PERFUMES-have individual- i ty and distinctive fla,ýours that inake thena leaders in Paris itself, 6, APPOINTa\"e\" Vtnolia Comnpany Ltmited, hot! the5 Royal Warrant of Appoiniment to their Maqfestie8 the ring and! Queeia, and! to te Roal Phzmily of Spain. MADE IN RNGLAND AND IN CANADA M nUE. TH IN$ 'the Skin and Ha for 2c. stam-b. 1 and",
         "By The Way The Edmonton Journal, says: \"The Canadiani Magazine for January contains the first of twelve articles on \" Famous Canadian Trials.\" This a field which has been waiting for some enterprising~ publisher. As we are interested in great trials of the present, we are certain to be ini those of the past. The people who can remember them will read every liue. Those who are flot old enough for this, but whose curiosity has been stirnulated by incidentai refereuces, will devour the articles aimost as readiiy. The tinst story is toid by Mr. A. H. U. Colqu- houn and is that of the case of Alexander McLeod, arrested iu 1841 for murder in counection with the burning of the steam ship 'Caroline,' which was set on ire duning te Rebelliou and sent over Niagara Falls. The tril h xd important international bea ring and the facts are set forth vividly.\" The flrst of these faxucus Trials is foliowed ini the present num- ber by an intensely interesting account of a trial that took place at Montreal, jiist after the English occupation, and that was known as \" Walter's Ear.\" The next wll deal wlth the trial that followed the assassination of D'Arcy McGee. This is a trial the records of which, buried deep in the files of newspapers nearly haif a century aid, form one of the sensatioinal chapters in Canadian political aunais and off er an aboorbing study ini criminology. The author of the article, Mr. C. S. Blue, has made an exhaustive study of the subject by examining the records at Ottawa, the scene of the crime. This is a series that every Canadian should read. If you are o a subscriber ta The Canadian Magazine, begin now and eiijoy tb.ls splendid series of articles. There wiil b. at least twelve of them, ail by capable writers. $2.50 PER ANNUM. Including Great Britain, Ireland and muest of the C0olies. SINGLE COPIES, 25 CENTS.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEB PHOTOGRAPHTHISYou Should Have BOTTLE AND LABEL - ON YOUR MEMORY \u003eA s r ie r in Your,,First Aid\" Cabinet It is a dependabie preparation for the numerous household accidents-even in major cases you wvi1i assist your physician by its use awaiting his arrivai. Applied to cut, bruises, wounds and sores it makes the parcs thoroughly aseptic, kilis the germs and promotes rapid and healthy healing. Absorbine, Jr. contains no minerais or acids and is harmiess to the most sensitive tissues. It s adiferet ind of liniment. It is a sn-Poisenous Autitentic and Genuicide This doubles its efficiency and it may therefore be prescribed and used wîth every confidence wherever a htgh-grade liniment or a safe, power- fui germicide is indicated. To reduce inflammatory conditions-aprains, wrenches, painful, swollen veina or gland. To reduce bursal enlargements and infiltrations-wens, weeping sineiws, etc. Absorbine, Jr. is a discutient and resolvent. To alaypai anyher-it andyneeffct s prmptandperannt.n To sray he troa if ore r inectd-a0% o 20%solto o Absobin, J. i helin an soohin an wil dstry bcteia, . To~~~~~~~~~~~~ heectbu.. aeat@isr n les IVSULabpahy laait adeAthiteaIT KLLS GER s \u0026ndTranes ue Auobin, J. ot nlytoverom beY 5dm 191, y A L Pm., theo cndiion butas prvenive Afir mver exrcie arub Deulha uaimtIM asta dwn wth bsabin, J. dlutd (ue onceta qurt f vter T.~t, Mmum. r o Wth azl, ibe. pth sif ont admucl, sum ,yo«, ~aieoduta w~ i preat iflmmtin ndprvetssoenma Tispoutoni.aia Pu iOiutoaof bsorin.Jr. .rj,,. ntaopte an gemicdP. te iteims, i tO emi sluio. bee ssA ibra Tia Btte tPI~m I ~theg~,iate frm ti, Betiusu etits Clt. ourena iIiho ent a yur adrea uon rceit ai 10 P. )POla mlfclutfe te mah f tapm Sudfo tia btte r rour rgu a n COyrpr. LYluocot. mxe tam yur ruggst tdat Wt BmtaiyCOidOt4 utig aufclre ~ Nae......... ~iitmoluion. Tbre mintas",
         "10 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTIBEB Oakey's SILVERSMITHS' For CL Oakey's Glis. Pape, ,Oakey's \"WELLINGTO\" KNJFI This Sample of Ba o laisadpl \"WELLINGTON\" BLA wu x Boatyfor-, for you, Mada.m! OAKEY'S 0001\u003e8 SOL\u003e EVERY JOHN OAKEY \u0026 SONS,LI a soap of unusual ___________ irity made into the Innest of flakes that a adily dissolve ini bot ater. It makes a eamy, foamy lather .at cannot injure thew dintiest fabrie or the JOHN HEATH'8 Lnds. i~TELEPHONE PEN 0)2 JX is a wonderful lite igthener of ail woollen Regisf.red in Canada di flannel garmnents. It * To b. had of the. leadi solutely prevents themn Sttoer min aaa )im iatting, thickening shrinking in the w418h. ________ WiII yomI.lm md ________ y.u a sample, free? Idreaa LUX Dept. Lever -others Lmtd Trlon~to.",
         "OÂNÂDIÂN \"MAGAZINE ÂDVERTIBEB \u003enl !SAUCE QUALITY SIZE PRICE bStores seii lkH P.-here À .1-important Point k\u003euthalls' Towels is that 7e made of ani original fectly hygienic raateriaL )rosghly antiseptic, comfort- 1 absorbe evenly throtighout have .png» easy an d \u003cGetThis Set of Three \u003cCalendars Free Theso beautiful culendars are Ideal decorations for ,your boudoir. library or den. They arm prUed in soit. artistic cooa onheavy art paper. (Size 4Yâ by 10) ýKhidI wd 5c to coet wrapping m-a mailing. Gouraud's Oriental Cream The ideai liquid face powder bas been the favorite on two Continents for nearly three quarr of a century. FERD. T. ROPKINS \u0026 SON, prep. à474 Sl Pail Stroet Notrasi -~and the flavour- FINE! Simply a spoonful of 'CAMP,' boiling water, anid miilk to taste, and your 'CAMP' is waitingl 6 ý - - - ý",
         "12 OÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER I owx5hoo for boys nde outeù ssu'ipmde. RIDLEY COJILEGE 1oe nd or iess sttSho mud nwiPï Si. Catharinles, Ont. RENJ . ILR zcbooi ]LENNOX-VILII P.Q. Head Maat.r: J. TYSON WILLIAMS, B.A., Emmanuel College, Ca Mon ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ Ti acupin anm idea tlace ince promnen ro ~youi Men ccuyin som ofthe mostproinet rondigs re haltfuland the. buildi posiios 8i ada, both ini the army, the. profesins satary and well ventilated. po - -n. in1 8nBoys are prepared for R.M.C., and i businesse, have been educated at Biho' Universities and business lie by an Co1I5ge \u0026chooi. of masters. chiefiy gradiiate. of Et uities. FOR CALF.NDARS, INFORMATION, Etc.. APPLY TO T'HE HEAD0 MASTWri à",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISEB iOp FORTY-.EIGHTH -YEA R g A Church Residantial and Day SchooI For Girls. chnan Funl Matriculation Course, Elementary Work, onscAr. Music and Painting, ~oI President: The Right Rev. the Lord Biahop of Toronto. Principal, MISS WALSH IVice-Principal, MISS NATION' WYKEHAM HALL, COLLEGE STREET, TORONTO. JUNIOR DAY SCHOOL-423 Avenue Road, Hotu Mistressa, Mis\u0026 R. E. Churchard, (Higher Certificate National Froebel Union) Tinitv Col1ede Scnool ---7 FOUNDED 1865 PORT HOPE, ONTARIO Residential School for Boys Beautiful ilealthy situation, overlooking Lake Ontario with 20 acres of Plaig Fields, Gymnasium, Mlagnificent Ncw Covered Rink.yî Boys repared for the liniversities, Royal Military College an usiness. Religious training throughout the course, 'lpecial attention given to youne boys. For Calendar apply to the Headinaster- REV. F. ONAIfiN SECHARD, M. A. (Oamb.) ï Ï-0(Late Headnaster St. Alban's Sehool, Brockville.) DING SCHOOL FOR BOYS- - ~Headmaster-A. G. M. Main- .BTINS wring, M. A., Trinity Coll., Camnbs, liousena ster-J. J. Stephen, M.A., Dublin University\u003e Vlsltor- The Lord Bishop of Ontario. Se ate bouses for Senior and JuirBoys. The Sehool Grounds caver 24 acres. Recent R.M.C. Successes- 1913, 4th, 6th, 7tb, Ilth, 13th ~ placeS. 'lL 1914, 3rd, 6th, 7th, 8th places. Pestus, Etc., apply to thse Headmaster. P. M. P. 17 Millet, ____ ___ ___ ___ ___ Artiats, Colleges and Students IBU Y OLLGEusing Oil and Water Colors [BUR COL EGEshould write for Catalogue. ockcliff Park, Ottawa CWWSpecial discount to out of town customners DENT CHOO FORBOYSDealers given trade discount and special DENT CHOO FORBOYSdiscount on following: irepoofBuidin. Pue WterSuply.Cambridge Colors (Madderton \u0026 Co.) ireroo Builnasg. Cuehael. R.M.C. Medlsi Prints (Mvedici Society) London, Eng. 91, lesodda Gym asium Chpl R.M.C Mansell's (London, E:ng,\u003e colored and plain platinurn 1914 al cadidtespassd, ne irs plce.and carbon pictures of old masters. RE..OPENS SEPTEMBER 9tli, 1914 C. W. Faulkner \u0026 Cos. (London, En.\u003e Pictures, For Calender apply: Xmas Carda and Birtliday Cards etc. O. P WOLLCEBE.U.A [OmniArtisti' Supply Co., 77$, York St.",
         "ÂANÂDIÂ\u0026 MÂGÂZINE ÂDVERTISEB \u0026DEIW9COLLEGi ST. MARGARET'S COLLEGE 144 EILOOf ST. E., TOftONTO, ONTAalO A Residontial and Day School for Girls !ite George Dickion, M. A., former Principal of Upper Canada College, and 1 Write for Queen's Kiniston INCORPORATED BY ROi the degrees of B. A., THE cate. denc, rar. GEO01 F 7al",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER AMMERING I6ranhsome ibait' -ittering mnay make life mîserable 10 ELM AVE., ROSEDALE, TORONTO 7our chid, or. for one of your A Residential and Day SchooI for Girls y or friends. If it does, you owe it e sufferer to investigate the suc- lion. hEinCpIM M. T. Scott ni Arnott methods of permnanentIy Principalnts Edî . Reed, M. AÀ. g these disturbing imnpedîmentis. P reparation for the Universit), and for Exam- Vill gladiy gîve you full particuIars inations in Music. Weli equipped Art De- eferences. partment. Thoroughly efficient staff, large Cutred pupils ez'eryuhmr. playgrounds, outdoor gampes, tennis, basket- rhe ball, rink. HIeaithful iocality. Pritnary Schooi Me rnot n\u0026 ut for day Pupils. N, ONT, CAN. For Prospectus apply to the Principal. e (Uarqaret E6aton !Bcboo[ of itterature anb £presetonJ Street, Tosolaso. *Ma*. Scott Rait~ Pwilmolp.E Oh Litera% Wenoh and Gemen, PhIyUioaI Cqlture, Volo. Culture,' inter eottom, Oratr and Pubito U1peakins. and Dramatto Art kIei for Gamundar ýshop B3etbu*e College - osbawa, omarlo A Ridendal Schowj for carle. Visitor, The Lord Bishop of Toronto. qtion for the Uintversity and fer the examinations of the Toronto Conservatory of Mus*r children also received. I zation, Outdoor games and physical traii isical Department (Piano, Theory and Ifarmony\u003e) wiiI be under the direction of a Master, and of a Sister, who for 's taught in the Scbool with marked succeas. ulture wilI ha in charge of a qualified miatress. dparticsuuo, loti. 8ISTERI HCHARGE, or t. TRESISTERS 8. JOHN TRE DIVNMajor St, TORONTO. tU1~etmîninster CoI[ege coronto at Vestbential \u0026 Va '11cbool for OtrIs Situated opposite Çueen's Park, Bloor St. W. Every educationai facillty provicded. Pupils prepared for Senior Matricujation. Music, Art and Physicai Education. The School, by an unfailing \u0026mphasis upon the moral as wefl as the intellectual, aima at the development of a true womanhood. - FOR CALENDAR APFLY- JOHN A. PATERSON, K. C, MRS., A. R. GREGORY, President. Principal. ýRE -ord of i irses; spe\u003c ering scho\u003c = - FOR LITTLE GI This is an excellent school tc, which to a resident pupil. Here sho wlll be und ent instructors, in congenlal surroundih 1ia1 Cous:-Matrlculation, Zing] OIS. Write for Calen SHÂRRIETT STRATTON ELUS. B. A.. outo 1llo",
         "10CANADIAîN MAGAZINE ADVERTIBER The Royal Military College rHERE are f ew national institutions of more value and interestt iecutYta T Royal MiUitary.Colle¶e of Canada. Nowtsalifl this, its object and work E.accomplishing are noi sutftciently understood by the genrl piublie. The College is a Governmenit institution, desigfled prirriarily for the. purpose of Instruction ln ail branches of milUtary science to cadets and officers of the Canadien M 1n fact It corresponds to Woolwich and Sandhurst. TIi* CommlRaat and miliitary instructors are ail officers on the active list of thie lIi Army. lent for tiie purpose. and tiiere i. ln additon a complete staff of professors for the eubjects which form such an Important part of the College course. Medical attefldl aiso provldýxd. WhilUt the. College is organiz4id on a strictly militai'y basis, the Cadets receive a tical and scientiflc training in subjects essential to a sound modern educatioii. The. course Includes a thorough grounding ln Matiienatice, Civil Engineering, 8urve Physies, Chemistry, French and English. T'h. strict discipline nxalntained at the Coilege Is one of the niost valuable featur the course, and, in addition, the constant practice of gyxnnastics, drill and outdoor excei of ail kind.s, ensures heaith and excellent physical condition. Commissions ln ail branches of the. Imperiai service and Canadian Permanent Forc ofter ed anmially. The. dlploma of graduation Is considered by the authorities conducting tii. exain for Domninioi Land %urveyor to be equivalent to a unWversity degree, and b the Regul of thie La w Society o f Ontario, it obtains the. same exemptions as a B.A. degree. The Iength of the course la three years, ln three terrn of 91/2 months each. The total cost of the. course, lnclidig board, uni\u003eform, instructloflal material, ar extras, lu about $800. The. annu\u0026l competitive exaunination for admission to the College tales place ln MI eacii yeam et the head\u003cauarters of th e sevemai nllitery disticts. For full particulars megemdlng tits~ exaniination and for any other Information, aP lion ebould be nmade to the Secretary of the Mliitia Council, Ottawa, Ont., or to thef mandant, Royal Military College, Kingston, Ont. S There are a gteat many imported Note Papers, sold in Canade It is your duty to patronize Home In4dustTy. SFrench Organdie - Linen Fixfs SCrown Vellum - VeIlum Finidl",
         "(JANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER \"i la !to $50 Per Week Are You 1q 0 darning it? i fond of drawing? Why not )be an artist and turn your ito DOLLARS? Many of our ýes are earning this handsome It took oniy a few months of are time. We teach you right .e and assist you to a posi- len yQu graduate. Some of es leading illustrators are our es. Write us for particulars. HOW C NAN you %,conveni gracefu] Le setup wvhere? Yi mi your hm f FOLË -the table of Who sees one, tiply. 'It is ne may be folde, tuclced away furniture deal you. Asic hi~ MIADI Wrllqo Fi HOURD Soie Licen LON~ CONVENIENT! imagine anything more ent than a light. atrong. 1 folding table, which mnay t a ,mment'. notice, ainy- iiav ned of such a table )ING TABLE- mninfold uses. Everyoe wants one. W. ausesmul. mer in the way, because it dupwhen not in use, and ' behincithe door. Your er has it, or will get it for in. ' IN CANADA ~EE BookIs \"A\"desrbing wCJ and 'E11ke 77.1k \u0026 CO., LIMITED us... and Manufaeturme IDON, ONTARIO Royal Victoria ColleRe",
         "[8 ÂCANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER THE CANADIAN BANK OF COMMERC H EAD OFFICE - - - - - - TORONT A OCapital paid-up $15,000,000 Reserve Fund 13,500,000 SIR EDMUND WALKER, C.V.O., LL.D., D.C.L., President. ALEXANDER LAIRD, General Manager. JOHN AIRD, Ass't General Manage] With branches situated in all the important towns and cities in Canada and v direct representation in New York, San Francisco, Seattle, Portland, Ore., London, Eî Mexico City and St. John's, Newfoundland, this Bank offers unsurpassed facilities for transaction of every dehription of banking business. SAVINGS BANK ACCOUNTS Interest at the current rate is allowed on all deposits of $1.00 and upwal Careful attention given to every account. Accounts may be opened by two or ni persons, withdrawals to be made by any one of them. \u003e«Num..Nm»",
         "(JÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 19 PrEBANK 0F TORONTO invites Personal adBusiness Accounts, and is pleased ta, place at the disposai of its customers the facilities gaîned during more than half-a-century of continuons growth and successful banking service in Canada. TN THE SAVIN)GS DEPARTMENT accounts Jmay be opened for small or large sums at any time, and interest is added twice-a-year ta ail balances. C AREFUL ATTENTION is given ta al Business Accounts, and aur long experience and wide connections ensure the full sat- isfactory service to aur castomers that has distinguished our service in the past. Paid-Up Capital - - $5,000,O0 Reterved Funds - - 6,402,810",
         "20 CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTI$ER A Safe Place For Your Savinàgs, If you refer to the Governmerit Reports you will ascertain that this institution is one of the oldest estatvlished of Canadian Banks, with a Surplus Fund of nearly double its capital and a high pro- portion of cash reserves. We invite deposits, large and small. The Bank of Nova Scotia With which is united The Metropolitan Bank PAID.UP CAPITAL -$ 6,500,000 RESERVE FUND --11,900,000 TOTAL RESOURCES OVER 90,000,000 BRANCHES OF THIS BANKC u everyCanadias Province, and in New- foudad We t Indies, Boston, Chicago This is a typical Policy Resu one of hundreds appearing il 1915 profit bookiet recently is by The Great-West Life Assur Company. Plan: 20 Year En)downE Amount:- $1000. issued 18 Matures 1915. Age: 26. Premni $47. 34. Total Cash -Value of Policy 1915 ...............$1577. Total of Premiumrrs paid . .946.ý Return in excess of pre- miums paid ...... ..... Or over 4ý/% compound inte, on the ipvestmnent in addition the protection. The booklet also gives preqent and guarantees. Write to, The West Life, Winnipeg, for a 'ENDENT ORDER 0F FOR ES Policies issued by the Society are for the protect-. J ion of your Family anid cannot be bought, soki or pledged. IBenefits are payable to the Beneficiary in case of Ideath, or to the meniber in case of bis total disability, 14 j or to the mrnber on attaining seventy years of age. [ F olikies £ssued from $500 to $5000 For further information and lterature applyr to E. E_ QrI.uW r- M D rUP rTIfL mII lel -",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTJ.SEB (HY WORRY? -1 eau make sure provisio'x ur loved ones by a policy in THE EXCELSIOR LIFE EsterbroWks INSURANCEtiblag Sed OC. for Ulefu1 MOU]l box COMPANY Esterbrook Pen ~j Co. MonhlwIncme oli ~New York C Md.'n, N.J. will give your beneficiary E@WEC. tqCndaAotoot uaranteed Monthly licorne enty years after your death. t r i o OFFICE :-TORONTO, CANADA. 4~D 'ERINGS o\u003e' bonds, whlch we offer sent on (cat ion. Epcry Securi_ \u003ea8- i he qualifies essential in a sauna liment, combining SAFETY 0F 'NCIPAL AND INTEREST THE MOST FA VOR~A BLE 10vrn.ment - Municipal0 borporation ancd Provon ftdustriai Boncle. Yieidl 4% to 0% dhaii be pleased to aidyeu in the PmJ\u003cl-up Capital $ 7,000,000 boan of' a des frabi. IrnvesinenL. *OflrvO Fund anld undlwlded Profite 7,248,134 220 Branohçs In Canada. Extending from the. Atlantic ta the Pacifie. IJRIIfJSavimg D.partment at all hrauchs. PORpAFION-LIM TED Deposits rceived off $1.00 and upward, and intere6t ['M. btONrpFAL- LOmmeN Ormr NlwAnt1 current rates.",
         "CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER p A Personal Matte were going to cut you off tomorrow, would listen to a proposition whereby, for a moder sum deposited with the North American L your wife would be assured a substantial ami \u003c'~ income as long as she should live ? 0f cou you would. o flot Icnow the time, but the cali is certain. Stili we make you, -an income absolutely guaranteed your widow every year as live. Syou worry whie you hive; it will save the home when you bookiel \" The Real Service »whiwh explains il fullu. You hâvec but la 1 AMERICAN LIFE ASSURANCE C Head Office TORONTO, CAN. OFFICE HAMILTON rAL AUTHORIZED. . $5,000,000 TAL PAID UP ....... $3,000,000aa",
         "CANAIIN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEB 23 at Sat isfied Feeling, :onies to one when an ment turns out better expected is the daily ience of Policyholders don Lie ince Company 1 Canada resuits under present çceed estimates by 1. It is pretty safe to ith such a Company, Canada Permanent Mortgage Corporation Toronto Street - Toronto Established 1855 President. W. G. Gooderham First Vîce-Presidtent, W. D. Mathews. Second Vice-President, G. W. Monk. Joint General Managers, R. S. Hudson. John Massey Superintendent of Branches and Secretary .,..George H. Smithi. Paid-up Capital ...........$6,000,000,00 Reerve Fund (.arn.d) ...4,500,000,00 Iavestmonts .............32,496,750,55 This Corporation le a LEGAL DEPOSITORY FOR TRUST FUNDS Every facility is afforded depositors. De- posits of one dollar and upwards are welcomed. Intereat at TIiree and One-Haif Per Cent per annum is credited and compounded twice a year. DEBENTURES i For sums of one hundred dollars and upwards we issue Debentures bearing a specil rate of interest, for which coupons payable balf-yearly are attached. They may be made payable in one or more years, as deslred. They are a Legal Investmnent for Trust Funds We shall be pleased to forward a speci- men Debenture, copy of Annual Report and full information to any whose address we receive. Associated with the above Corporation and under the same direction and management is THE CANADA PERMANENT TRUST COMPANY Incorporated by the Dominion Parliament. This Trust Company is nov prepared to ac- cept and execute trusts of every description, to act as Executor, Administrator, Liquida- tor, Guardian, Curator, or Committee of the es tate of a lunatic, etc. Any brandi of the buafueen ,fM feiiiimnte Truatf Comnanv will",
         "24 CÂNÂDIÂN MÂGÂZMN 'ÂDVERTISER They praise the A Blaisdell who use it PA TEFUL lIOI Standard 011 CompanYE Arniaur \u0026 Co. __ New York State The year upon which we are enteý Bradstret's i dark with mnystery-we cannot f Carnegie Steel Co. cast the events of a single day of it. are several of the many bÎg corporations who use Blaisdells 19 it not important that, expose wholly or in part, Many of the tiiese uncertainties, we should Prc largest concerns use Blaisdells our households with \" the one t, exciusively. This la the best sure\" -a life policy? praise we know of the' economny and efficiency of the Blaisdeil For if the future is dark to the pend),. porter of the family, what would it È~ Blijdeil 7200 indelible copying- bis dependents if death should reil is nothing short of a penci mar- hîm ? vel. Order by number from your statiofler. There are Blaladell pendils of cxrer\u003ey kind for every purpose. Pencils aiecially imprinted for more binding than a life insurance -no policy more immutable tha one issued by The Mutual Lif e Assuran\u003c of Canada' Waterloo War. worth",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 25 WITH DISCJ2ETION ~~uJ W rNpap q WrITH DES PATCH LLiL",
         "26 CANADIAN MAGAZInR ADVEBTISEB Jams Jellies Preserves Catsu p Grape Juice SELECTED FOR, QUALITY Our name and label is a guarantee that the contents of any of our bot- tdes, is the best that money, skill, care and cleanliness can produce, the contents are selected for quality. \u0026 SN, imied. WINONA, Ol \u0026 SON, Limited",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "YOUTH AND SUNLIGHT From the Painting by A. Suzor Cote in the National Art Gallery of Canada",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE TORONTO, FEBRUARY, 1915 Ne. 4. HEROES 0F THE CANADIAN ARCTIC AN ACÇOLJNT 0F THE DISASTER THAT OVERTOOK INSPECTOR FITZGERALD AND THREE CONSTABLES ON THE FORT MICPHERSON-DAWSON 1TRAIL BY A. V. THOMAS was more thau mere f act whieh rompted Commander Evans, sec- ad in eommamd of the ill-fated t Antaretic Expedition, to refer i. receut Canadian lectures to the ic death which overtook Inspec- Fitzgerald and Constables Carter, ney and Taylor, in February, 1on the Fort MePherson-DawBon tFor Commander Evans knew, eW others eould know, just what Fitzgerald tragedy meant. 7ben the news of the Scott Ant- kc disasater reaehed Canada few adian newspapers or magazines, it irprising to note, recalled the griun 'lity, which, just one year previ- y, took place at the other end of earth. Yet when Commander Lrna addressed the WVimiipeg Cana- iClub it was the first thing h. itioned. Ujas words were as fol- been much struck with the. )f two celebrated journeys- tint of Captaini Scott, of 'whose party I was a member, and that of the MPeun Dawson Moiint P'olice patrol. You muaiit be very proud of tlue Northwest Mounited Police, who face such a stern climante un- flinehingly and do thoir duty without 8houting about it. 1 1Tu go on to speak of the. great uimi- larity between tisse two journeys. Ini Captain Scott 's polar journey the. disaster was due te dimiishlag provisions, deereas- ing temporatures, and delays occasiouLed by bad surfaces. Inspector Fitzgerald had the sanie trying conditions, the. sanie tem- perature% (around fit ty degreei), and ini both expeditiona the leader, as far as me know, ,vas the. laet man te survive. In both the. leader never thought of hlimsef, but ondy of his companionq and of those who were to be left behind him\" So Commander Evans. Sacli was the interest that the Fitzgerald tra- gedy aroused in an old-eountr.inan. Yet a eompendious reviewv of Cana- dian affairs for the year 1911, a stout volumne of over 800 pages, devotes just six lunes to the fate of Iuapect\u003er Fitz- gerald and the three constables. Dr.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Norman F. Black, however, ini his re- cently-publiehed history of Saskatch.- ewan, gives a detailed account of the Fitzgerald disaster. It is safe to say that 110 heurts throbbed faster than those of the Mounted Police in the Canadian Northland, when, weeks or inonths after the rest of the world, they read of the death of Captai» Scott and his four companions in the far Ant- aretie. For the Mounted Police, those at Fort Churchill and Cape Fuller- ton, as well as those in the Yukon and on the M'%ackenzie, have feit the fascination of \"The sun and stars, and the long white road and the sky,\" not like Captain Scott 's party beneath the Southeru Cross, but beneath the atarry doire where the Great Bear and Cassiopea and Auriga for ever chase one another round Pola.ris. Inspector Fitzgerald's party, con- eisting of himself and Constables Nin- ney, Taylor, and Carter, left Fort Me- Pherson for Dawson City on Decein-. ber 21st, 1910, to maske the winter mail patrol inaugurated betweeu thc two pointa during the winter of 1904. 05. It lad for soine time been In- spector Fitzgerald's ambition to un- dertake the patrol, and lis wish had been granted. Hie reputation as a tried member of the force lad been established. The Inspector left Herschel Island, at the mouth of thc Mackenzie, on December 3rd, 1910, and spent a fort- night at Fort MePherson ini prepara- tions for the patrol to Dawson. His party left, as stated, on Decexuber 21st. They took with thexu three dog teams of five doge each. Under fair conditions of travel the trip from Fort 'MePherson to Dawson City is made by thc M,,ounted Police and by Indiana in lese than a month. The Fort is on the Peel River, close to its confluence wîtl the Mackenzie, and somne seventy miles within the Aretie Circle. To reach Dawson the Peel valley las to be climbed, the height of land erossed, and then the vallcy of the Yulkon descended. At Dawson Inspecter Fitzgerald's party was expected at latest by the. end of January. As the patrol then~ failed to appear, apprelension began to be felt. Anxiety grew day by day and was mucl inereased by fie report made by a number of Indians froim Fort MePherson, who irrÎ%,c.1 at tiie Dawson post on February 2Oth. One of these Indians, a man named Eeau, reported that le aeeompanied Inspec- tor Fitzgerald 's party as f ar as the. head of one of the creeks off the Peel River, acting as guide. Esau stated that the Inspecter paid him off on New Year 's Day, 1911. The Indians e8timated that froni where Esau left the party to Dawson was only twenty days' travelling, ai\u003e that the patrol was already a month overdue. Superintendeut Snyder, commanding officer of the Dawson~ post, communicated fortlwith with Commissioner Perry, the head of the, force, at the Regina barracks, with thc resuît that a fast relief patrol wau at once preparcd at Dawson for Fort MePherson. This relief patrol consieted of C:or- poral Dempster, Constables Fyfe and Turner, and an Indian named Charles Stewart. It left Dawson on Febru- ary 28t1, 1911. Superintendent 8ny. der 's instructions to Corporal D.mp- ster included the followirig directions - \"I1 uiderstand thut ut Hart River Di. vide, ne inatter what route h. teoik, hm would have te cross this divide. I hn it would b. advisable to make for this point and take up his trail froin there. 1cannot give Yen au\u003e' speedflc instruc- tiens; yen will have te be guided by cir- eninstances and your own judgment, bear- ing ini mind that nothing is te stana in your way tintil you have got in touph wjib this part\u003e.\"1 On the third day out Constable Turner froze lotI feet when going over a long stretel of lare glacier. Hie renained in pain from. frost bites for te» days. Barly on the Jourrney the whole party went tlrough the. ic and lad to change their underwer Their moccasina were frozen stiff. ()",
         "HEROES 0F THE CANADJAN ARCTIC March 7th Corporal Dempster 's party reached the dîvide between the Yukon and the Mackenzie. The ascent had been arduous owing to the compara- tive absence of snow and to the slip- perine(ss of the glacier ice. Aýs the party advanced trouble arose throughl the flooded condition of streames. Several times the sledges had to be dragged througli surface water. The portaging front creek te creek was aise unusually laborlous owing to biad weather. On March l2th the party struick a trait, which, in Corp)oral Demipster 's opinon, might have been Fitzgerald 's or miglit have been only anl old Indian trail. This trail cotild only be seen in places as the river was flooding and obliter- ating it. No traces of a camp were to be founld. Corporal Dempster, wýith the lindiani Stewart, left the con- stables and reconnoitered for some distance on un alternative route which the Jnspector's party might have taken. They crossed and re-crossed fromn bank to bank, but finding no0 traces they returned. Jlowever, later on this saine day, MNarch 12th, Corporal Dempster's ef- forts were rewarded by the discovery of what, there is now no doubt, was one of Inspecter fitzgerald 's niglit camps. Butter tins, corned beef tins, and a piee of a flour sack marked - R.N.W.M. Police, Fort 'MePherson\"' vere found upon the ground. This point, somne twelve days' journey from the DawsonI post, probably represent- ed the furtcet of Inspector Fitz- gerald 's night camps. The following day the same inter- mittcnt trail was pieked up. Atter two heurs' travel another night camp was djscovered, only four miles from the lirai ene. Corporal Dempster con- cluded from the proximiityv of these two camps that the Inspect or 's party had then been returning, but nothing turther was found that day, Mareh On March l4th three more night campq were found, ail within the saeof some fifteen miles. So many camps in so short a distance greatly strengthened the belief that the In- spector 's party had been returingi( to Fort McPherson. WMeather condi- tions on March 1 5th were favourable but the going heavy. One night campl was found, five miles from the last. It was noticed that thc sýnowshoe trait which the patrol -va% stili following kept to tic, river inistead of taking, a portage which wouldl have saved three miîles. On Marci l6th Corporal Demip- ster 's party receivedl grii indicatlin that they weýre hot upon I nspector Fitzgerald 's trail. After less than two hours' travel a littie cabini was reached wherein were founid cached a toboggan wrapper and( seven sets of dog harness. On furtlier exai ni nati10n the paws of a dog and a dog's shoul- der-blade were diseveredl. WVith re- gard te this day Corporal Dempster w-rote in lus diary: \"IAthough everything along the Big Wind River seemed to indirate that the party had returned to MiePhersoP, thisadis- covery was the first positive proof that they had turned back, and also that they were short of provisions. Even at thizî time I could nlot bring myseif to believe that they bad been compelled te eat their dogs, as I f ound a very amali quantity of dried fish in a corner of the cabin above mentioned, which indirated that they still had dried fish with themn, and 1 f elt con- fident that the party had returned te hfr- Pherson in safety.\"1 After this four days were spent in liard travel. Snowdrîfts were encoun- tered and territory new to Corporal Dempster's party had to, be covered. On tie evening of Marci 2Oth a fur- ther important discovery was made. This is described as follows by Cor- poral Dempster : \"On the evening of Mardi 2Oth we ar- rived at a cabin known as 'Colin 's Catbin,' between fifty and sixty miles from Me Pherson. This cabin is situated on a high bank, and 1 could see no trail leading up to it, but as it was getting dark I decided to pull up te it and camp. In this cabin 1 saw a couple of packages on a beamn, and I remarlked, Il wonder what old Colin has cachedl npý there.' Stewart, the Indian, said he wonld pull it down and see, and",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE we theu discovered the despateh bag and a bag of mail. These 1 took possession of and took on to the Fort. \"Even wîth this diseovery 1 did not thinik that any nntoward accident had ce- eurred to the party, but thought it straRige that they hiad nlot sent back for it. I thouglit the party had been somewhat hard press8ed and had put off overything pos- sible to make their load light, with the intention of patroiling back again for their cache. I thought that after finding the soyen sets of dog harness they still had two teanis of four doge each.\"1 The remainder of Corporal Demp- ster's story, covering the flnding of the bodies of Inspector Fitzgerald and of Constableg Kinney, Taylor, and Carter, is best told ini the Cor- poral 's own words, as follows; \"mhe following morning (March 21st)t about ten miles from this cabin, on thc Seven Mi]e Portage, I f ound a tent and stove alongside the trail. There %vere also tent-poles, a plate, and thermneter. i eould flndi nothing else, so procecded on for about ton miles when I fonind a to- boggan and two mets of dog harnoas ont on the. river, smre hundred yards froin the bank. 1 notieed that the rawhide ground lashing had ail been eut off. Tied to a willow on the bank was a bline handker- chief, the trail leading towards it. I went Over and oliinbed the bank, and back tîrough a fringe Of willowsq into the tira- ber, and here I fouind a smail open camp and 1 fonnd two bodies, one of which I recognized as that of Constable Kinney, and I believcd the othor to be tbat of Constable Taylor, whieh belief was after- wards conllrmed. \"Constable Taylor lad evidexttly com- mltted suicide by blowing off the top of his hefid with a 30.30 rifle whlch ho stili grasped in hi, left bard. Both men lay in bed side by side. A fire had been at their feet; each layr on bis back; they had three Alaska sleeping-bags, one under and two over them; thore was a frylng-pan, camp kettie, a small tin with a few matches in it, an axe with a broken han- dle, axe being very bluint. The camp ket- tic was haif-fuil of mooso skin whichb ad been cnt nip in .4mail pieces and appeared to have been boiled. Beneath the robe on ,which theyv lay 'was aL gnnny sack coutain- irng Tinspector Fitzgerald 's diary,ý somne old socks. dîfce nd mnoccasins, aîle a note- bcok belonging to Conaktabie Kinney. There jas alsio a porhot bnrometer whieh land beea borrowed fromn Mr. Campbell, at Red River.... \"(On the, following morning about ten miles further down the river a trail aP- poared te lead towards the bank, a while feeling for the trail we pickod ul pair of snowahoes. We thon climbed the bank and a little way back in 1 woodR we found the bodies of Inspeci Fitzgerald and Special Constable Cart This was Wednesday, the 22nd Mar, Carter had evidently dicd flrgt, as ho ç% lying on bie bock with bie banda cross over bis breast and a handkerchief o) bis face. He appeared to have been dra, £rom ton or fiftoen foot from the lire.: spector Fitzgerald was lying on bis ba on the place where the lire had been bai ing, his left hand on bis breait, the riý lying almost parailel with the body. slightly extended ontward4. Two ha bIs nkots wero wrapped around hlm. kettle and cup and a, blunt axe witb broken handie were near bum. There h. been a littie tramping around, cansed, suppose, by getting firewood. No effort any kind lad been made in making a kind of a. camp, \"'On the body of Inspector YitzgeratIý disceovered a gold wýatch in a littIe sa susfpendedl aronnd bis ncck- On Carteî body 1 f ound a Department of Figher and Marine aheque for $50, and $7 in emn Ris tocs appeared to have beca froz and bis lingera were bandaged. Tiie bed~ of ail four were in a terribly olarit condition. The stomach of each was, fil tc.ned almogt to thc backbone, the o b ribs and hip bones showing vpry prom: ently. Aftcr the. elothing had been c off, I do not think cither of thexa weigh a hunidred pounds. Constable Kinn. fret were swoiien to almoat twice their i tural size. Inspector Yitzgeralds f( were aIse very inuch swollen. mhe la(, of eccb man was very manch diseol0ur( being a reOdlsh-black, and the skin , peeling off. They land put on ail the. CIO, ing thoy lad with thein. Each bad on ti suits of uinderwear and the usual oui elothing. ' Corporal Dempster's party coveri the bodies of the Inspeetor and t] three, constablea with hrush a.nd I eeeded to Fort MePherson, wi they reached on Mareh 22ind. havii taken twenty-two days xnaking t] patrol fromn Dawson. The four bodi wvere broaght to the fort on Man~ 25th by Corporal Somers, ini chr of the fort 'MePherson post, andtç Tuffians. They were laid out in t",
         "HEROES 0F TIIE CANADIAN ARCTIC The bodies were laid in one grave aside by side, \"A firing party of five imenl, says Corporal Dexnpster, 'fired thie usual volleys over the re- illafns of our departed comirades, and eveni thougli thie funeral was held in tiie most nortlhern part of the Ei'm- pire, 1 ani glad to be able to assure yoti thlat everything was done in con- nection Nvitli the last sad rites that oouhd possibly be done under the cir- icumait\u003cifees.,\" In one of thle pockets of Inspector Fitzgerald ,%as found hie will, whieh had cvidenthy been written with a piece of charred wood. It reads as followvs: -Ahi money in despatdli bag, and bank, clothes, etc., 1 heave to iny dearly-beloved mother, Mrs. john Fitzgerald, Hlalif ax. God blcss ail\".P In the diary of Inspeetor Fitz- gerald, found beneath the bodies of Constables Taylor and Kinney, the last itemn reads: IlForty-eight below. S-aturday, Febru- ary 5th.-Pifle wvith strong, S-.E.: wind. Lof t camp at 7.1.5 aii..; nooned one hour and camped about eilit miles further down. just after noon 1 broke through the ice and had to make fire; fournd one foot ,bgltly frozen. Killed another doef to- litglt; hiave only five dlogs now, and eau oy go a few miles a day; e-verybody lareakîag ouf on the body and skiai peeling off. Eight miles.\" W'ith thizi entry Inspeetor Fitz gerald 's diary us out, but earlier en- tries teil the'whole sad story. After dimissing the Indian Esau on New Tear's Day, 1911, the party -made fair progress for about ten days. It lad thien reachied a point where it waa a question of finding the riglit river erossing the divide into the Yu- kon basin. Iiispector Fitzgerald had been relyiiig absolntely upon Con- stable Carter, who had made the trip froin D\u003eawson to Fort -MePherson, but jriot in the direction in which the pa- trol waa then going. Carter failed t'O find the pass. Hence the whoie tragedy. On January 23rd Inspee- tar Fitzgerald wrote in his diary as \"Carter je completely lest and doee not know one river front another. We have only ten pounds of foeur and eight pournde of bacon and soute driedI Mlh y last hope is gont, and the ûinly thing 1 cari do, is to return, and 'kill soute of theu dogi to feed fthe others anid ourelesuneN,, we eau mieet soute Indimna. We haveý now been a -week lookirig for a river to take us over the divide, but there are dzn of rivera anid 1 arn at a bo1 i hould niot have takoen Carter',, woird that hii knewo\\ the way frorn Little Wind River.\" So ran thie tragie chrioicile. It is clear thait Inspector Fitzgerald wouild have done anlything rathier thian turul back and that it wNas i8s ardent desire to carry out bis commiission success- fully that cost hima his if e. Thie very first day after turning backtoad Fort MeP'herson the party wýas forved to the desperate expedient of killinig dogIls; As ill-luck would have it, very bad weathecr was encounitcred at the start of the returii jourxiey. TIcv po- licemen had to contend withi mlists and with snowstorms. LSevere cold wais also experieneed and on one day thie thermomecter dropped to sixty-two be- low. But with cruel irony the wea- ther became fine again a few days before the diary raui out. What the four policemen muist have endured in Itheir effort to get back: to Fort MePhersoni passes compre- hension. On January 3Oth thie Iii- spector wrote in his diary: \" Ail hands feeling sick, supposed Io 'be from eating dog 's hiver.\" Yet thley trudged fourteeni miles that day, sev-_ enteen miles the following day, and sixteen miles the day- after thiat. On February 3rd, two days hefore the diary ran out, the party made four- teen miles and the Inspector had stili heart enough to write: \"Wet have travelled about 200 miles on dog's meat and have still about 100 miles to go, but 1 thixk we will inake it al riglit, but will have only tbree or four dogs left.\" Depositions made after the tragedy ail agreed that Inspector Fitzgerald should flot have trusted to Constable Carter as a guiide over the height of land between the Mackenzie and the",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Yukon systems. But in spÎte of these opinions, the sincerity of whîch can- not be doubted for a moment, it would be unjust to declare off-handedly that the tragedy was due to negligence. Imsparable from life in the northern wastes are great risks. They have to be taken. It must be assumed that Inspector Fitzgerald, a tried member of the force, was well aware of the risks and believed that lie bail mnade reasonable provision to nieet them. Only hi judgmeut erred, as any man's judgment can err. STo Canadiens the story of Iuspee- tor Fitzgerald 's attempt to get back to eivilization, lis herois;m, his forti- tude, his dignity in death, must ever remain a precious inheritance, a classie of the Canadian Aretie. Wh on December 29th, 1912, a broi tablet to the memory of the Insp tor and the tliree constables was t veiled at the Mounted Police barrai at Regina, Commissioner Perry p nouiued tlie words: \"The heroic fort to return to Fort 31ePherý have not been exceeded. ini the hist\u003c of Aretie travel.\" Inseried upon the tablet is I legend: \"In memory of Inspecter Francis Jo8i Pitzgerald, Constable George Frances E ney, Constable Richard O 'Hara Tay and Speeial Constable Sam Carter, v lost their lives in the discharge of ti duty on patrol front Fort -MePherson Dawson, February, 1911. Ereeted by tl comrades.\"1 THE OLD WARRIOR By FRANCES BEATRICE TAYLOR Mygood sword iu itg scabbard is, Idle long years, and bovnd with mist, My brother's lips, that tasted this, Are dust, as miglit and faute are dust. Here, in my quiet ingle-place 1 hear the strife 1 kuew afore, We have forgot our uation's grace, ]3eneath the flaming hand of war. Honour, 1 know, a mau muust hold Above the blood of other men; The generals of our -race unfold Valour and mai esty again, Yet, 'ere we go, upon our knees, Codi teadli us His huxnanity, Lest, thougli we win, our enernies Shoulil know the greater victory. £4à",
         "FAMOUS CANADIAN TRIALS Ii.-WALKER'S EAR; AN INCIDENT TO THE FRICTION DEVELOPED BETWEEN THE MILITIA AND CIVILIANS IN MONTREAL DURING GOVERNOR MURRAY'S ADMINISTRATION, BY A. GORDON DEWEY Amo'NG the causes célèbres of Canadian hi8tory the assauit committed upon Thomas WaJl- ker takes a prominent place. This was the. culniinating incident in a series of troubles between the civil and mili- tary sections of the population which lasted tliroughout the administration of Governor Murray and attracted wide-spread attention. Yet these trou- bles were, as f ar as we know, confined ta Montreal and the imniediate viein- ity, and coucerned only the new B3ri- tish mercantile element, the Frenchi being involved but indirectly, and that from association with the~ Eng- lish. These disputes form a study in theinselves, but an outline of their principal causes 15 essential to our story. The first English-speaking mer- chants of Montreal were sutlers, and those who immediately followed were not much better; between them and the. offcers of the garrison there was a social barrier, evidencing itself ini .ontempt on the one side and hatred on the. other. In officiai cireles, be- twecfl Brigadier Burton, the niilitary comumandant of -Montreal, and Gov- ernor 'Murray in Quebec, there was distinct lack of co-operation, if not active ixitrigiig against each other. »)uring \" Le Régime Militaire\" (1760-1764) the inilitia captains ad- juicted suite for the rewly-arrived Br ighrs, to the latter 's great dis- satisfaction, while differences witli the troops were decided by courts-martial. Then when civil governmenit with courts more after the Englieli niodel was established, the justices of the peace under thie new systeni were thwarted in thie rôle of popular tri- bune by thie fact that appeals f romn former decisions to, thie new courts were seldom allowed, owing to the smaîl sums geuerally involved. Thie main source of disturbance, however, was thie difficulty of housing thie troops. Thie absence of barraeks in Montreal made it necessary tû quarter thie soldiers i private, bouses. This, Murray tells us, was thie accept- cd customn in other Provinces, and thie Executive Council of Quebec loat nuo time after their appointment in pass- ing two ordinancea to legalize and regulate the systcm iii Canada. Trou- ble was not apparent until justices of thie peace had been appointed to, ad- minister thie affairs of Montreal. Thie majority of these performed their duties witliout comment, but certain of them constituted themselves spokes- men of thie more turbulent elements in the community and did ail in their power to, upset Murray 's arrange- ments. Captain John Fraser, a half-pay officer, who as custos rotudorum of thie Court of Quarter Sessions also repre- sentcd the civil magistrates, was thought best fitted Wo take charge of",
         "THE CiVNADIAN MAGAZINE the biUleting iii Montreal. The ac- cepted leader of the party opposed to hlmn was Walker, the most hot-head- cd of the justices. The colleaguea most in accord were Thomas Lambe and Francis Noble Knipe, but these two wetnt into disgraceful bankruptcy and were dismissed within the year, leav- ing Walker to play John Hlampden by himself. Thomas Walker was an Englishi merchant who came to Montreal ini 1763 and engaged i the western fur trade. Though lie had been in Bos- ton befere, comning to Canada, bis comn- mercial relations were witli London. We are flot surprised to find hlm elaiming official notice of bis arrivai iour countr~y; the Registre des Au- diances of the Montreal military court records a suit brouglit by Emond, cap- tain of a river schooner, for freiglit of geods bretight fromn Quebec to Montreal on what we Iearn fromn other evidence was the meýrchant's first trip up the St. Lawrence; lie offers te p;y,, leas value of a iuirror brokzen en route. }Peing weii supplied witli energy, ability, and capital, Walker soon rank- ed among the most prominent Mont- real itizens. Murray evidently kiiew him by reputation before their first encouniter, of which he lias left a characteristie note in a private letter, now i the Archives at Ottawa: \" Wal- ker and Knipe have been here with a ver$'ý respeettul address. I have had mucli conversation, and if aiiy con- fidence can be put ini them, we may hope te id the people in Montreal very tractable; t\u003e contribute te it, 1 have made Walker and Knipe jus- tices of the peace. The first is cer- tainiy a sensible mnan, and with pro- per management inay be kepi within the bounds ot moderation and miade a useful member of society; the man is proud and wants net, perliaps, a more than moderate share of ambi- tion; te give a riglit turn or bias te mucl passions is te show we know how te gov'ern properiy.\"1 These fond hopea of Murray's were, however, fromn bis point of view unfulilled. The contest over the billeting y waged with ail the bîtternes ef pe spite. It was charged that some ficers in assigning billets made a pr tice of sending three or four of thi wildest men to the bouse of some w( 'to-do citizen, and then allowing h after earnest entreaties te buy exen tion. Walker urged, probably w. a good deal ef trnth, that the soidi, were very liard te please in the in ter of lodgings, and high-handed their metbods, tbreatening te take 1 citizens' beds front under them, sE ing their food, and sitting up ail nié carousing, \"and upon the least priinand tlireaten te burn theni a their bouses. The women are e more impertinent and abusive th thec men.\" IJpon the side of the j tices, we are not surprised te Ici that their method of procedure v suggested to Walker by bis wi Wben lie was fIrat shown the ord ance, she was standing by and noi that \"there was notbing said ab( candles yet.\" \"No more there li replied lier husband. \"I suppl there will be more disputes ab( that. \" Trouble soon began. Capta Mitchelson, commanding the deta, ment of the 28tli in Montreai, ce plained te Burton (November 21 1764): :'There appears te be a gene, spirit amongst the inliabitants of ti place, stirred Up it seems by soe n licions person, tending te deprivo 1 ol¶lcers and soldiers tlie cor«\u003emin lowances of firewood and candi beds, and, i short, ail neest hitherte ailowed by every persen 1 icted upon, and without which it impossible that the troops can res the severity of the climate.\" je; Livingston, a Montreal justice, in, : pudiating bis earlier connection vfi",
         "FAMOUS CANADIA.N TRIALS lias eaused mueh disturbance lu the town of Mlontreal\" Evidence as te the, prime inover was soon fortheoun- ing. Several oIffleers and seldiers tes- ti»ied before Justice Gxugy te having beni put out of their quartera, given roomas inferior te, those first assigned the.m, or te having been deprived of firewood, furniture, candies, and s0 en, lu eaeh case by the intervention o~f Mfr. Walker, generally among F'rench Caniadian landiords. Rela- tions between the seldiers and the citizens were thus becomùxng danger- ougly strainied during November, 1764, and meanwhile a inove of cer- tain magistrates rendered peace im- Cati oi Fraser, as a half-pay officer, had been eceupying rooms lu thie house of Charles Réaume, but when given charge of the billeting he ezehaiiged these fer quartera ln the court-lieuse. Three or four days later Captain Payne, of the 28th, new- ly arrived in town, applied te him for a billet, and was given the key Io tiie rooma lately occupied by thie custos. Justice Knipe was aise a lodger in thie bouse and had bis s1hop there. He immnediately wrote to F!raser, claiming that Payne 'a billet was illegal as lie, Kuipe, was a jus- tice, and the lieuse therefore exempt. Fraser aniswered that the exemption applied te the otlier's rooms eniy, net to the wiiele lieuse, and reiterated hia order. Walker's version lias it that Fraser tbreatened Réaunme with fixed baoesif lie refused te carry eut the billet; \"tliey added insuit to op- prsinby pouring dewu sucli quan- tities of water upon the floor ever his (Knipe 's) head as wet lus papers, gpoiIe bis furniture, and obliged hlm oqit hie room . . . (Fraser) in his general conduct acted more like a Turkish Basifw [sic] than a Bri- tiah justice of thie peace.\" Payne set unmolested ini Réaune 's on the ý,i£rt of November 5tli, but was next morning- aceoated by Knipe in hie dress;ing-gown and ordered eut. Niean- while four of thxe ]u*tite!(s--Dumiiaî St, Martin, John Livinigston, 'Walker. andl Lambe--met, and wilhout notifyilig the other parties, prepared a warrant for Captain Payiîe, mientioning the apllled water grievance and wdriîng himi to leave on pain of imprinmi-nt. As this was dlaregarded, three of thenm (Livingston having backed downi and apelogized) prepared a nlew warrant for the eomitminent of Payne for forcible entry and thle seizure of li's effeets; thiis was served the saine after- noon. After a few daya in jail Payne was released on hiabeas corpus anid later presecuted the authors of this affront in the Superior Court. W'hen Murray heard of the affair he at once ordered. the offending miagistrates te Quebec te, explain their conduct. The mailitary party was furiolls; feeling rau se high that \"every mian now toek one aide or the other as his profession or connections sway« ed him\"; the seldîery, fromn Burton te the amallest drumimer, were united against the civilians. Livingston was thouglit to have acted fromi a mis- taken senae of duty and te be absolved hy his retractien. Dumas was equally ignorant of the Englishi language and Engliali law, se that thxe vials of miii- tary wratli were poured eut upon Lambe and Walker only. They -,ere, deelared boyeotted by the garrison. Walker complained that the soldiers were ferbidden upon the public pa- rade te, have any dealinga with hlm upon pain of four liundred lashes. Men who had get supplies frem Lambe were threatened witli severe punishment if seen near the. bouse again; but a more marked vengeance for tlie chie! enemy was resolved up- on.* Shortly before nine o'clock on the evening of flecexnber 6th, 1764, two days before his intended departure for Quebec for the. Payne investiga- ,owing narrative is compiled ftom the~ depositions ef Walker and bis wif e, lence given at the varions tria.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE tion, Walker and kis f amily were lu their hous at supper. To the riglit of the entrance hall where they were sitting was the parlour, and beyond that, a bedroom where loaded firearms were always kept. Opening off the bail, almost opposite the street en- trance, were two doors, 0one of wlieh led into the kitchen, the other to the haek yard. Walker was sitting with kIls back to the street door and three or four feet from it, kis wif e was op- posite him; the third member of the party was a friend, Miss ,Jennie Ilurd. The Frenchi servant, William Fon- taine, was waiting ou the table; ln the kitchen were the blaek cook and hier daughter, aud John Lîlly, the ap- prentice. Suddenly a noise was heard at the door, aud Mrs. Walker called \"'entrez,\" follcvwed by a scream, \"Good God, what la thisl\"l as the heavy miter door opeued, and the blaekeued faces of a row of men peer- ed one above the other at ber through the glass of the inuer door. Waiker jumped from hils seat as the first as- sailant, 'elad in a Canadian cotton nightgown and brandishlug a sword, made at hlm. Mns. Walker and the other woman rushed through the kitchen sud yard into the eow-shed, Whiere they listened in terror te, the soumds proeeeding freiri the house, and to the hammerlng of more assail- auts at the back gate. With three cuts in 1118 head, Lllly, the elerk, made off te give the alarm. A mn wlth a naked broadsword pursued the Frenchi servant into a gallery, whence he escaped by jumping into fixe yard through seme broken railings. Walker meanwhile had received a five-lnch wouud lu kils head at the first attack, but turued towards thxe parlour to reaci kils waapons, his dozen assail- ants ail dealing hlm repeated blows on the back, head, snd shoulders with their bludgeons as 11e went. Unable to elimb the stairs leading froin the parleur to the bedreem, or te open the door, 11e turned at bay and attempted te parry with kils bands the slssh of one who cailed, \"Let me at hlm, 1 wiil despateki hlm wlth my sword Another struck hlm on the chest wi the butt of a pistol. Wlth stonli iug vitslity Walker drove baek tht two with kils fista and attemipted get hold of the fire-shovel, but mw seized by the leg and throat by t, others who tried te threw hlm ài the fire; amid kis frantie struggles free himself, a violent blew on t head felled hlm te the grouud, whE 11e Iay ail but dead. fIe desenlbes kis next sensation that of a severe blow on the loi One of the assassins kneeliug up, hlm made as if to eut kils throat, Wi ker lu attempting te parry feit severe eut below kis right eaa, whl 11e thought surely montai, se dlespa: iug of furthen resistauce 11e streteli out with a grosu, as if lu kils duia agonies. One sald, \"The villain dead\"; another, \"Daran hlm, we lia done for hum now\"; a third mia, some other remark, whereupou thi ail weut out hastîly, leaving as ad( tional souvenirs of their vinit a reý mental hat sud bayonet of the 281 aud some pieees of tongs snd pokei The vietim of this devilhsh assault îs said, reeeived in ail fifty-ï\" wounds. As botki ends of the, stae were guarded by soldiers during f. attsck, ne help hsd eome te Walkez continuai cries of \"Murder.\" Af thnee or four minutes lu the cow-she for the whole scene had pase quily, Mrs. Walker mustered su fieient courage te returu to the o where skie fouud the intruders gou aud ber hushaud ail over blood in tl arins of Fontaine, surrounded 1 some friends whem the boy hi brought. \" Sfi asked hlm whether 1 would die; lie said h. believed nq but te feteki a sungeon.\" Immediatel]y after the. assauit, whi Lieutenant Tettenham sud two oh officers were sltting iu the main ga reoom, twe men whom ail eoneniet failed te recognize came iu, thr down semethiug wrapped inlu p upon the table witki the. words,\"T is Walker 's ear, \" snd then 1,fr.",
         "FAMOUS CANADIAN TRIALS After tis outrage Montreal was in \" fermnent. àfrs. Walker applied for \" personal body-guard. A corres- pondent of Murray 's thus deseribes the state of the city and vietimi a week after the assault: \"My stay here won 't be above eight days, and indeed thec situation of things is such as mnakes it dîsagreeable to be so long, as not a mnar in the street meiets au- other but he thinks of having his throat eut or bcing despatched some- how or other; a melancholy scene to see every person se on the wateh, 1 don 't miean one set of people more than another, for every man seemas to bL doubtful of his neîghbour.\" 11e haau't seen Walker'!i head dressed yet, but \"as for his body, it is one eontinued piece of mummy, beat as if with frailles [sic] tili it is as black as a hat and so swelled that you cau barely know the reinains of bis face or the colour of his skin. The quan- tity of blood hie lost I think saved his Uife, for if it lad depended upon his beiDg bleed [sic] with a lancet, 1 think the world eould not have saved him. . The ear is almost di- vided in the middle, but to make up tbey have eut off a large piece of his cheek, and this was earried to a per- sonu of this town for his supper, whose affdavit on that occasion you will sc -oon. ,' There were good reasoxis te believe that offleers of the garrison, if net aotually concerned in the assauit, cer- taînly countenanced it. Tlough the magistrates, particularly Lamnbe, were zealous iu their investigations, but lukewarm support was given by thc iiitary authoritics. This was in ne amall rneasure due to \" Mlr. Walker's bèliaviour aud the suspicions he vent- ed of almeet every officer in the place.\" The Goverument offered a yeward of two hundred pounds, a free pardon, aud a discharge from the armny, if a soldier, to anyone who woiild furnish information; the citi- zens of Montreal at a meeting also promised three hundred pounds, but all to no purpose. CJonrad Gugy, Lambe, and some other mgsrts werc able to colleet a certain amiount of evidence; this and chargres con- tained ini a letter to Walke r f romr a man signing imii..tf -.Matthew Gos- pel,\" led to seven arrests-Serguant Rogers, who, it was8 testitived, hiad hor- rowed a. broadsword undor suspicions circuirastanices on thei night Of t11e as- sault; captain Paynle, whio was con- sidcred likcly to harbour thoughts of revenge for his treatmnt; ~ren Mea, at whosc house the mlenl 111d dis- guised themsclves; Coleman and MNe- Laughlin, two soldiers speedof taking part in the assauit, and Lieu- tenant Tottcnhami, for his suspicions- ly weak efforts to arrest thc mnen who, lad presented imii with Walkier'a car, Payne and rotteniiiati wee t once released on bail, as a miutiny in the 28th was iminient, Captain MNitchel- son informing Burton that lie could flot answer for ici behaviour of any man under his commiiand. When this state of affairs was re- ported to Murray, lie with sonme mcm.n- bers of the Executive at once set ont for Montreal; thec Governor's descrip- tion of the city as lic, found it is mnuch like Ainstie 's. A meeting of Counieil was held there on January 3rdl, wlcen three resolutions arraniging for thc trial of the Walker case and the dis- posai of thc troops were passed. The garrison of Montreal then consistedi of five coxupanies of the 27th Regi- ment and eighit of the 28th; it ýwas decided to order five comnpanies of the disaffected 28th into cantoriments in adjacent parishes to relieve the congestion, shortly afterwards thc whole eight were sent to Quebec, whence two battalions of the 60th marched te replace thcm. After xuaking these arrangements and, as le thought, restoring order, Murray returned te Quebec. Immnedi- ately after his departure, however, just aftcr roil-cail on the afternoon of January l6th, a large body of the departing 28tli wcnt te the prison, picked the loek, and freed their three comirades, Coleman, 'Mca, and Mc-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Lauglhuin (Rogers had been sent in irons to Quebec\u003e. Two officers who were in tic provost mnarsals room heard their whoops and chleers, and went out after them, one tlirough the wvindow, the other thirough the door, but were unable to do anything. Cap- tain ýSkenie meeting the party as they Ih:ft the city jumped over the wall aud followved on foot as long as his breath lasted, then comrmanldecring a pass- ing cariule lie and another officer drove past thiem and with drawn swords ordered a hait. Qne who made as if lie would go forward was runi tlirough and arrested; the rest isrchied back and the prisoners were againi jailed. At miduiiglt the per- formiance of the afternoon was repeat- ed; the. prison lock was broken, the three sleeping guards locked ini, and the. prisoners rdleaaed, this time with- out disturbane. Next afternoon they appe*ared at Chanibly Fort witli three companions aud gave themselves up. The deputy provost inarshal went that night to arreat them and their companions, but as lie was reeeived with fixed bayonets, decided to let tiie military authorities tliselves escort the. men to Quebec. Through- out this whole affair, as usual, no one was arrested or even recognized, save the men who had gone to Charnbly, and Ensign Hamilton, who was un- fortunate enougli to be wouuded. When these cases of assauit and prison breacli were about to be hrought to trial, serions complications arose. The Governor naturally iiad told Walker that the iicaring would be iu Montreal, forgetting, lie tells us, till the. fact was brougbt Wo his at- tention by the. Iawyers, that \"there being but fifty-two Protestant houa.- holders in Montreal, it would b.e in- possible Wo hold the. tryai [sic] there, as inost of the, people iu that place miglit and would have been challeng- ed by one side or the other\"; and elsewhere h. writes, \"Non. were ex- .iupted from a challenge, as escli man in the. place had publicly taken a uide and loudly declared hia opinion. \" To remedY tiS diÎfrleultY, the only api eut course was taken; the triai , ordered for Quebec, and an ordina was paused on Mardi 9th, direct that in future ahl juries should summoned and returned fromi body of the Province at large, wi out distinction or regard to tic vuc age of any particular district iu same.\" Protesta at once came fr Walker aud the jurymen sumxuo, fromn Montreal, who represented t] rot only the journey Wo Quebec early spring, but also the danger fr the presence of the 28th uow iu t] place amount Wo a deulal of j tice. Accordingly at the H-ilary Te of the Court of King'a Bench in Q bec, wien no one appeared Wo prc eute, the bis wcre ail returr ignonizmus and the prisoners C charged. William Oonyngham, the soldie attorney, was dismiscd for upo sional conduet ini connection wxth i case. Walker, for his 4\"seauda\u003c and l ibellons \" notarial protest agali the. recent changes iu the judicial rangements in the Province, was \u0026 pended fromn the Commission of 1 Peace. A uew trial of the case M ordcrcd for tht. neit terni, this tii to be hld inThreeRivers, with, before, a jury from the. Province large. To avoid another refusal those froni Montreal to, attend throu fear of the soldiers, Murray wrote Mýajor Brown, now commanding t 28th, forbidding any officers or in of tliat regiment save those who WE witncsses, to attend the. trial. Major Brown, contrary to the B vice of his friends, iusiated on goi to Three Rivera himseif. Foute the. grand jurymen were from QI bec district and seven from ote ail -the witness were rsn b",
         "FAIMOTJS CANADIAN TRIALS ûf a. ycar and a day ln prison, with a finle of twcnty marks. The only noteworthy event at the trial was an outburst on the part of the hot-head- cdJ Major Brown. Wlien Sergeant MNeat's wife was teýstifying, that dur- ing hier deposition befort Lainhe shortly afte.r the assault, lie hiad threatened and forced lier inito say- ing more thoan theý truthi, Major Brown exclaimed that he believed tI'ia qulte probable, twitted Lambe on hia rec(ent expulsion fromn tlie- magis-. tracy, and flnally declared lie believ- ed imir capable of anything-all of whleli was in due timie reported iu K'ngland as additional evidence of lack of discipline in the Murray ad- mlinistration. Altiiongl the suspects liad been re- leased, the Walker case was 1,y no0 mneans at ai, end. Walker imiiself mafled for home, te liay his case before political friends in E'ngland. Meani- ivhile the London miercliants enigag- .d in the Canadian trade liad pre- sented a petition (April 18tli, 1764) to tiie Guvernment, comrplainfing of the. whole administration of this coun- tvy-tlic trade regulations, tlie iili tary, the recent assault on Walker, apd the. prison breacli. One of tleie, John Streteli, mode more specifie ob- jeotionli a memerial te the. holding of the. trial in Quebee and to the mehd of s-mmon\u003cning juries. Tlie merobaflta all threugh enjoyed the a\u0026dvntage o! getting in the first word. Muray's lengtliy report o! .Mardi 3rd luid not ye been pentdand th King-in4Jouneil expressed angry surprise at having liad no word from hini, and ordered a thorough inquiry by th. Lords of Trade. Tii. board aecordingly held severai eei.sand presented their recoin- ledtions (Octeber 8th) . wliieh wer. promptly appro'ved. Consider. ilthe uncertainty of the evidene oif.etlicy quggested thc recail o! Mury and Burton te Bngland to Wris fuxll accounts of tlie lote oýý eUrPlleS.Tliey lad considered tlie eonlaints of 'Walker regarding tlie Quebee and Three Rivers trials, and suggested tlie issuance of al new comi- mission te try the offenders, the at- torney and solicitor-general to he conisulted ais te ther legality of suecb a course. The conduiet of Chie! Jus- tiee Grregorv alil troughI -haviuig ap- peared te thie commiiittee exlt rmelv ir- ruar\"tliey recomxniiended bis dis- msa.Unlesq the pre.sent troubles subsided, they urged the entire re- nioval of the 28tli Reginit fromi the' Provinice. Finally, they expres.sed disapproval of the notorlous grand jury presentmcunts of 17641. The Gov- ernor %vas iniformed of bis re-cali, and ini due timie left to undertake the de- fence, of bis administration before tie Britisli Goveriiment. It is difficuit to sec any othier course for Miirray tli tint whicýh lie had piirsuied. WViftl tliaaI Britishi popu- lation, the comlplete division into two parties, and the high state of feelingl existing at the timie in Montreal, a fair trial could not have been lield there. On the, other hand, Wa.lker's objections te Quebc were well founid- ed ; thc changes in thc judicial systemi were contrarv to British uisage, the Journeyv te Quebee wvith ail is fain- ily was difficult aud dangerous at thiat seasoni, and broke lu uipon the pre- parafions for sumnmer trading te the upper country, but, none of these dis- advantages could be avoided ulnder the circumatanees; the mucili-talked- o! dlanger from the soldiers was more fancied than real, as- Murray had mode arrangements for the comiplete removil f romn the city during the, trial of ail tie troops in quest ion. Tic Gev.. ernor dlid wha-t lic couldl te aid WI ker ln obtaining jutcthe one great diffleulty was the long distance to be traversed, and to lessen tii the trial at Tliree( Rivera lu midsummner was granted. Walker doca net secin te have any excuse for abs)entingz hlm- self titis second time; in faet, hic; con- duiet gives a good deal o! colour to thev motive suggested by Murray. \"'Till lately 1 eould not conceive,,\" he% records, \"the indefatigable pains",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Mr. Walker toek to baffle every at- tenipt the Government made te pun- îsh the perpetrators of those outrages. I littie suspected he wanted to per- suade the merchants of London of the impossibility of procuring justice here, and that they would as readily believe that, as they did the estab- lishmnent of a whale fishery on Lake Ontario. \" -A strong point for Murray is the fact that he was able after reaching England to, justify his administra- tion before mien who, if we read aright, hiad been diligently prejudiced against him. An Order-in-Council of A prit l3th, 1767, dismisses the peti- Lions and coniplaints against hîm. as wgrouindless, scandalous, and dereg- atery to the honeur of the said Gev- ernor.\" Murray was continued in office, thougli resident ini England, till 1768. Walker, meanwhile, after suceess- full~y pleading his cause in England, had returned te Canada with an or- der from (Jenway expressing horror at the treatment lie had received and ordering hi8 restoration to the magis- tracy. Anether letter to the Gov- erners of Michigan and Detroit cern- plained of their methods and order- ed every ceuntenance and support to be given the bearer ini bis trading ventures. The nierchant's next move would be bard te justify.* The keen party struggles of the ast few years seeni te have se inflamed and embittered this exeiteable character that lie was unable te discount any stery or schexne, however impossible, which waa agreeable to bis prejudices. Carle- ton, the new Governer, was but lately arrived and as yet unacquainted with the details of the past trouble; the tirne was favourable; the choice of victims is illuininating. George Magovock, a discharged soldier whe had been living seine four inenths with W9alker, impelled obviously by the hope of reward, came forwar swear that lie knew the perpetrâ of the assault, liad indeed been t aceomplice. The deposition waa n before the new Chief Justice, ani Walker represented that the mE was urgent and lie in imminent , ger of bis life, it was thouglit be.i effect the arrests secretly and by 1 tary force. Aecordingly one or hours after midnighit (Noven lSth, 1766\u003e a detachient ef so1c with flxed bayonets visited in i the homes of six of the xnost pl mnent Montrealers, and carried t off to prison. Those arreeted i St. Lue la Corne, Knigbt of St. L and representative ef the CanA noblesse; Captain John Fraser whom we have already heard; ( tain Campbell of the 27th, the dian agent; Captain Disney, lut, the 44th, now town major; Lieu~ ant Evans, of the 28th, and Joi Howard, a leading merchant. 1I applied for bail. \u003cJhief Justice requested Walker to waive any test, but the merchant was ftrm, peating bis late assertion, \"thal was in danger of bis life, and sbA net think it worth a day's pure, if any ef them -were at liberty\" that despite the arguments of def ing ceunsel and the representat of the accused, ITey had ne ree but te declare bis judicial opij that the effence was net bailable In this proceeding, publie opii was strongly againat the proseci The Frenchi \u003canadians, as yet un te appreciate the leveUling chara o! Engliali criminal law, were c cially grieved that a seigneur Knight of St. Louis should be thr inte the cemmen prison upon the timony of a common soldier, w they knew te be infamous and me seeking a reward. Immediately after the arreat priseners, at their ewn request, i taken te Quebec, where they h( *Mixch of the material relating to this episode has been printed Archives report for 1888, Note A. A process-verbal of Disney's tria je Alnon 's Reniembrancer.",
         "FAMOUS CANADIAN TRIALS te be reieased on bail. ilere they re- ceived letters of condolence f romi friends iii the Governnment and arrny. Aý petition signied by six members of Counicil, Somle other officiais, and a large numiiber of Quebec mnerchants and army officers, wsprepared, and 01n Sunday, after religious service, a large procession visitedI first Iley, then the Governlor. This proeeeding Carleton considered quite irregular, and promiptly dismnissedi fromn the Conneil Irving and Mabane, who had headed the concouse Of petitioners. U7pon Cheuf Justice IIey 's fia re- fusai te grant bail, thec prisoners were taken back to Montreal, and as neî- ther the jail nor eourt-house were fit te, reccive theme they were lodged un- der guard in the house of a principal mendiant. Ilere they kept open house for the ianyv friends who resorted to -the Biastille,\" and public favour wa iaintained by every art to please. O)n tire other hand, as Mley telle us, \"the unyieidinig and surly carniage of Mr. Walken every day dnew f rom hilm and bis cause some of the few who bad before given hlmii thein couin- tenaflee, so that when 1 arrived in Montreal 1 found themn both under a ilot notoio01 and almost universai PlrePjiidice. \" Neverthelees Walken determiîned to preceed. An attempt te have the trial po8tponed tiil September was, nelin- quished when lie was informed that the prisoners wouid in thiz case be b.iled; a requcat for a republication of tiie rewards for information ne- ganding the asasuit was aiso refused. Lieutenant Evans was tlic finst pri. Rouer indicted. The charges were two in numnben and were preferred againet ail six aecused. The finst was buirg- jary ta la, forcibie entry with the ojcofcommittingr a felony, in this case nurden. The other was brought ~Uder the \"Coventry Act\" of Charles 1L, against maiming with the inten- jion of disfiguning. The grand jury nunibered axnong them, eight of the French Canadian noblesse, who all mlet Waflkr's challenge by cheerfully taking the oath of allegiance then and there. They thnew,ý out the iiidicitment against Evans, al wvhieh Walker was very wnothi, and accused thiem of browbeating the evidence., This was r'-sented( by thle jury, but the! Chief Justice 's eoolness and tact allayed thre confusion. Ile remninded themi that they were to hear the case for the proseeution oniy, and the(l next pri- soner was put on trial. A true bill was. found against Captain Disney, buit \"rio bill\" against St. Lue La Corne. lipon this Walker refused to proced against any of it other8, so Captain Dianley's trial was beïgunl. 'lhle case was heard oni Saiturdayv, February 28th, and Wedniesday, Mardhillth, 1767. Wiilker, who '1n his first deposition shiortly after the- asauilt had expre,ýsd mtere vague sus- picions against two other offleers, now swore positively that Disney was the wearer of the cotton niighitgown who had led the assauit. Case, a soidier, testified to having seen inii on the niglit in question armned and disguis- ed ieaving Walker's biouse. McGov- oek was very nervous and contradict- ed himeif sadly, uintil the jury re- fused to give himi any credence; the defence successfully advanced an alibi. Tt appears that on1 the nigît of Walker's misfortune thc accused and his witnesses had attended a \"bail\" at the hiouse of a former arny of- flen. Tbe élite consisted of three of- ficens and thein wives, -Madame Lan- driève, Major Disney, 'Mns. Ilow- ard and the wife of another mierchant, The company assexubied about four in thc afternoon. Tbey first boiled nio- lasses te mnake \"tire.\" Then came tea and a game of blind man's buff, M-Na- jor Disney devoting special attention to the handsomne French widow. Eng- lish country dances were next engag- ed i. Then they ail sat round the steve and rested while the cloth was being laid, After suppen came more dances. This dleiightfully informaI Party was ixnterrupted about a quar- ter to ten by thc arrivai. of a messen- ger fromn Brigadier Burton for Dis-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE ney, announcing the attack upon Wal- ker and ordering the town major up- on duty. Though emphasizing the fact that Lieutenant Robertson',% lieuse was within two hundred yards of the scene of the crime, the proseeuting attorney w-as unable to persuade the jurymeri that Disney could have slipped out. cornmitted the assauit, and returned unobserved; the accused was prompt- ly acquitted. Mr. Walker and hils wifo were presented for perjury; the jurymen aise, \"infiamed by Walker's accusations,\" avowed their intention of entering individual actions agai-nst hlmi for defaînation. The Chief Jus- tice expressed himself as quite satis- lied with the verdict, and lu conclud- ing has report lie aaid: \" Mr. Wal- lcer's violence of temper and an in- clination to, flnd people of rank in the army enrcerned in titis affair lias made him a dupe to the artifices of a villain wli*se atory could not have gained credit but in a mind that camne tee miuok prejudiced te receive it, and the umhappy consequences of it, 1 fear, wiIl be that by mistaking the real objects of his resentmnents, the Public will ha disappeinted ln the satisfaetion of seeing themn brought to justice.\" IIey ' expectations were fulfllled, and ne one was ever convict- ed of this new famous assauit. This ends the épisode of - W Ear \" The disturbancea, too, of i it was the outstandîng event hia( ceased. The billeting grievane4 been removed by the provision oi per barracks for the soldiers niotous 28th hadl been sent away to Quebec, and then te, Ireland; ton had returned home, and Mi was aise recalled. 0f the incen Justices Walker alene remained hie Lad trirned hua attention fro- taeking the mnilitary te attaekiu Goveriiment. The histery of headstrong but forceful charaei by no means at an end, but we net detail it here. fie in Moi and Zachary Macanley iu QuebE the Canadian opposition te the. bec Act, basing it en two gro the denial of representative in tiens, and the granting of libert: Frenchi Roman Catholies. Whe. situation lu the New England onies became acute, 'Walker, a- ently despairing of British rnis, sides with them and plotted wit inarkable temerity ln the intereý Benedict Arnold. Hie was arri but freed by the Americans wheri captuired the vessel in whieh liE being ttiken ln irons te Québec. turning with themi te Boston, he ly turned up witli Du \u003cYalvet in don, where we shall leave him.",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "A MILL, WITH OVERSHOT WHEEL, IN UNFREQUKNTED NOVA SCOTIA TRAMPING IN UNFREQUENTED NOVA SCOTIA BY W. LACEY AMY NOVA SCOTIA, almost equally with Newfoiindl\u0026fld, is littie miore as yet than a coast-line. Tii great interior remagins a hunting- groufld, despite the eistenlce along the coast for a century and a haf- long before Ontario passed the forest stage--o! a hard-working, serious- minded people, who have struggled, firat to hold the country for England and latterly i some parts Wo hold existence i the face of commercial disadvantages. On the south coast from Halifax westward the tourist has begun Wo seize the scenery as hus own, but eastward there is stifl no\u003e railwa'y, no tourist traffle, and littie ini the way of real industry save Cod To see this eountry of unscarehed rivers, untrod forests te the very wa- ter, and indentations that twist and wind behind an outpost of innumer- able islands, you mnust forge your chauffeur-and a lot of other things you may have become, aceustoimed te conneet with comafortable travel. 'It dependa upon your point of view. So long as you refuse te lend yeur- self te the seheme of life that is on a fair way to make mnan 's legs xnerely historical-like the appendix and the tonsils--there are pleasures Wo be en- joyed along that coast that outweigh the absence of comforts. The Woman- who-worrîes and I thought se. Three 1hundred miles o! roadway-and four times that length of eoast-was boundi We open up new delighta net obtain- able where the dining-ear menu faces",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE you or the summer resort obtrudes its tiresome affectation. Along that railwayless coast lives ak thin hue of fishermen-nothing north of them for fifty miles but man- less forest, uothing south but the ocean, xiothig in îf e'but the harvest of the water. Stores there are few. Boarded-up show-window 's here and there tell of the iniroads of the mail- order house, the cheapness of water transportation from Halifax, and lat- terly the parcels post. Ail along the road stand these mute signs of ,a dead trade, with empty houses thickly strewn. Steadily, year after year, the people have moved to the West, or died of the dread scourge, tubercu- losis, whicliplays sucli havoc with ithe fishermen. Many of those who, remain will tell you of depleted fisheries and repeat longingly the lurid tales of fortunate frienids ini the West. A kind- ly people and honest, with hands out to the stranger and an unaccountable lack of many of the ordînary com- forts of life. Doctors are few 'and scattered, visiting their patients in SUnmner by motor-boat and naturally dependent upon Halifax for surgery.' The few stores offer few luxuries. The mail-order catalogue is the closest con- Moction between the fisherman and the life we know. Along that three hundred miles of coast there is but one road, with littie off-shoots leading southward here and there to fishing villages on the penmn- sulas. The \"coach road\"' has cover- ed everything even the careless in- dulgenace of a winkcing government could permit, but it couldn 't reach every cluster of houses on sucli a sinuous shore. There seemed to be no other limitation to it. Payment per mile lias made the miles many. Hilîs that miglit -have been avoided, with a saving 'of length, structural difficul- tics, repair, and climbing, are care- fully included. The road glimpsed over simple country only a mile away wanders two, or three to get there, for no reason save the extra mileage it means. One would think that the na- tural tangle of that coast wi satisfy even a goverument contra\u003c Thus it is that settleements app ing ou the niap four or five n apart are really ten, and in the sage every physical feature of the rounding country is encountered. It is not mere rhetoric to assert a new road could be built thro every essential point almost as eh, ly as to repair the old one. For y there lias evidently been no atte to repair the bridges over soe tions; in one stretch of twenty n there were missing culverts, of average mucli exceeding one a il How the mail driver overcomes Vý at niglit is a mystery; upon inqi hoe merely grins and, says the ho know the holes by tbis time. Righ the heart of Slip Harbour the r( way up a grade misled me into thi ing we had wandered into the be\u003c a dry streain. Everywhere along way springs use the road as the j plest channel for getting there. T rîpple'merrily along the trail, or ing unbridged at their leisure, filling no purpose but the draliu of the Provincial Treasury and convenience, of the thirsty travelle Here and there are short stret\u003c that -show the possibilities of the n~ and a few cement bridges were ut] construction over the more dange., streams. And yet it was under n continued pseudo-repair than road. I ever saw. \"Where wili readli deeunt roads?\" asked one of two automobiles we met in our w, more than a hundred miles east Halifax. I referred them te the 1 sibilities beyond Hlifax; I had ne been there. It was a hundred miles of that k of road we trudged-and walk was the onhy method of deing it g~ anything resembling comfort. It g us time, and exercise, and entire fi dom o! action. The only other y to do it was by \"1coachi \"-what would cail the stage-and we tr somie days of it to the most kin mémories of the walking.",
         "TRA-MIPING IN UNFREQUENTED NOVA SCOTIA A RELIC OF PROSPEROUS TIMES 1 t wa,,s a lonely hundred miles- lovly and lonely, 1onelY and lovely. In that distance we mlet, two automno- biles--and they were sorry for it- and Dot more than a haif-dozen vehie1es outside the Settlements. There seem.ns ta be no communication bc- tween settlieets save by coachi and teL(ýephone. Lt is explained by the fact that there is no inter-trade. Bachi vil- laelooks oxily to Hlalifax, where it sella its fish, buys its supplies, spends it. holidays. 'Mile after mile there was evidence thiat nothing but the coach had passed that way for days, We commenced our walk fromn Mus- quedoboit Ilarbour, a namne we learn- ed to pronounce with the grcatest pride. Further along we came to a dozen villages that troubled us more .-that we mnentioned to each other in ou? w jargon, and stumbled blind- ly over iu gettmrg directions. I car- r Ied a large map as the simplcst method of finding our way. Chezzet cook, Petpeswick, Newdy Qûoddy, Necumteuch, BEumsecum, Mushaboan and the Test of thein derive their naines from sources' of eriminal ln- terit, the touriet is apt ta think. Get- ting rid of the words withi quick con- fidoee is the only chanice of beinig un- Musquedohoit Hiarbour will some day be a week-end resort for Ilalifax, My memories of it are a desertedi saw- miii, a deep, menacing river with steep banks, and an inexhaustible sup. ply of four-pound speekled trouit that lay beneath the damn awaiting.fthe firet bare hbok to ho \"jigged(\" out for the table. \" Jigging\" mnay be the ext reine of bad sportsmianship, but it inakes unrivalled eating at Musquedoboit Harbour. The daily coach provided a solution of the baggage problem, and we ex- perienced littie difficulty in kceping ii toucli with our conveniences. Froin Musquedoboit Harbour we set out onc afternoone eight miles for Jeddare Qyster Pond. On the way we pa8sed through the tiny Settlements of Sal- mon River Bridge, Head of Jeddore, and Smith's Settlement, eaeh liable to ho missed, but jealous of its name. A' littie Sunday-school pienie ni a sheltered nook heside an arm of the sea reminded us that there wus still pleasure-taking aloug the coast. Not I",
         "SHEE\"T HARBOUR, AN IMPORTANT NOVA SCOTIAN VILLAGE even ini the settiements did we see an- other sigu of life. Jeddore Oyster Pond derives the familiar portion of its name £rom the ctie. An of oysters there at one te.Asaw-mill quickly put an end to that. Now there are only a few white shelis to tell of it. At Jed- dore we had our first taste of the pos- sible difficulties we might have to face. By request the eoaeh-driver had un- loaded our baggage before a house Which had been named to us as a pos- sible stopping. place. But stopping- places along that coast are oniy pos- sible, as a rule-by which I mean nothing to their discredit. Liquor is flot sold eustof Halifax, and the road- houses serve you or not, as thiey please. There are very few to serve. Our bag- gage wua in front of the house, all right, but we were firmly informed that it wau not a stopping-place, and even if it had beau, a wadding the day before praveuted the entertaiument of guests. A mile back there was a woman who might take us. 1 lookied at the twO suit cases and decided camping out thera had'its attractions ,over a mattress a mile baek. -We went iup the road begging accommoda and a woman took compassion o1 for the niglits were cold. It wî relief later in the evening to be in a kindly way that no one -v have seen us stuck for a place to s We Iearned then, that there mui noguesswork in our information, that there was not a horse to be anywhere for xnoving baggage. I creased our delight that we had trusted 'to the steamboats mun along the coast, the landings b anywhere up to a couple of miles 1 the stopping-places. Next morning we set out for Harbour, an easy day of ten Întending to stop for dinner at L Slip Harbour, reported to be miles 'on the way. By the time ped.ometer reistered the four 1 we had advanced a mile beyond last house into the heart of nbro dismal forest. It was floon, and had had *Io meat-and little el since the 11001 before, and I car thirteen pounds of camera.( more we had coma a mile too fi and didn't go back. On we ploue into the most lonely bit of road",
         "iVOWEIRFUL, WATERFALLS WVASTING THEIR FORCES IN UNFREQUENTEI) NOVA SOOTIA met in the(, whole journey-not a sign of habitation, not even the tinkie of .owbells, and but the dim tracks of the. coachi of the day before. We learn- edt yearn for the eowbells from that day, for they told of settiement near at hand. At two o'clock we bur8t suddenly on a weleome road-gang at the edge of Ship Ijarbour, and a few minutes later were mnakixng a meal at a table that baunted us for the rest of the trip, MNs. Newcombe, of Ship JIar- beur, I remember as one of the bright, spots of the journey. With sickuiess on ber bands sIe stili lad time for cleanlines of house and pleasing variety of table-and a roll of Iooked rugs beneath the parlour sofa made mne regret the limita of mny baggage, At Slip ilarbour was a relie of prosperous timea, a deserted saw-mill. All along the way w. came on tlem. Finncedby English capital, they hadj gene thie way of 80 many indus- tries in Canada thus backed, through p rodigal management, ignorance of loalconditions, and careless control hy the abareholders. Some of the milis were closed through the clear- ing-out of the saleable tîimber, and powerful waterfalla and wefl-built dams were waisting their for-ce. Onlly one other industry revealed itself along the coast. Two or three gold mines were making desperate efforts to keep at xork, depressed a littie by the failure of others. At Tangier anid Sheet Harbour there were lively hopes tliat the local workmnen wouid net b. turned off.. Ship Harbour, situated at the Iend of a beautiful armi of the sea, is n\u003eow best known along the coast for its mal. mon; but thc salmon meason was about over, the one or two belated fisher- men we met heing mont convcrnied about the quiokest way out. Down eael aide of the arma a road ran,~ the one used only by the coach to a.void the ferry, and tIc other leading te a flshing settiement down by the sea and to a ferry across te the coach road. That four-mnile walk down te tiie ferry on a vivid Saturday morning- the coach road, they toId me, -was al- most imüpaaaable-was one of the. most beautiful stretchea along the. coast. A church or two, one lone blackamith",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE shop, a working sawmill, an oid miii of our grandfathers with its overshot wheel, and here and there a herring fisherman drawing hie nets--these were enough, without the fleeting glimpees of faraway sea, deep green islands, and quaint houses. Hanging on the fenée I found the horu to sum- monl the ferryman across the three- quartera of a mile of water. It was a amail horn for such a big job, but it possessed a voice that wouid have made it the most brilliant memory of any youngstcr's Christmas. It echoed and rolied over the water, and tup the hill behind me, and iu among the trees, until I thouglit I had been playing with a tempest. The littie rowboat that f erried us over for seven cents each was manned by a boy who could have had no possible use for land. I foundl it diffleuit to explain that we were tramping - with enough money to pay our way. One kindiy. intentioned resident considered he was elaborating on my story hy tell- ing of hie meeting with \"another fel- Iow walking along the coast. Re was covering more ground than you a day, and he'd worn the soies off hie an d had paper tied around them fret were terrible sore.\" If we not_ proývîdentially got througb days before the declaration of v have no doubt of our classificatii German spies. As it was, we wý a new kînd of tramp. That day we had before us a wa twenlty-three miles. We had heai the stopping-'plaee at Spry Bay, wished to make it for Sunday. the way we eneountered one ol confusing tangies of the cou Many of the villages have neighl ing settiements dÎstiguished them only by some qualification. Harbour has its distant suburi Ship Harbour Lake, Lower Ship bour, and Lower Ship HÉarbour covering an area, of a dozen miles entirely disconnected by miles o settied country. A careless lue is a calamity on the Nova S eoast. We learned, too, that dis cannot be gauged by villages, but by individual houses, for some o villages are four or five miles Five miles is a factor in a tran twenty miles, about meal-time. SUMMONING THE FERRY IN UNFREQUENTED NOVA SCOTIA",
         "A PRIMITIVE CONVEYANCE IN VNFREQIJENTED NOVA SCOTIA We dined at Tangier-pronounced as it iii spelled-and alter an heur 's rest ini a liglit shower, set out in the threatening skies ten miles for Spry Bay; and one of those eean raina is not to be trified with. For the last four tuiles it was village ail the way, Spry Bay being separated from Spry Ilarbour only ini the imagination of the residefits. Hlere we found the first mnistake in our (levernment map, but it was a serious onxe. That four miles followed every dent in the coast in a Mnost aggravating manner, the stop- ping.house in plain view only a hait. Mile away as the crow flies, but two miles by the road. We spent Sunday at Spry Bay, a day of continued ramn and feg. We were thankfui te be where we were. The table we faced was in a class by itseif along that coast. Speaking of tables reminds me of the beds-and the mneiory is net the mogt pleasant. Everything front repes and feather tieks up we tried, and the springs were usually net the meat eomfortable. Traveliers with ironclad demanda in the way of bed comforts wiit net be at home there. Breaking new greund lias its discomforts, euee of the greatest te me being a set of springs that saga a foot and a haîf in the Middle. In caue of extremnity the rug beaide the bed is comparative luxury. Menday we made but eight Miles, te Sheet Harbeur, the viest important village between, Halifax and Sher- breeke. We had of necessity te stop there for we had been unabie te learn anything ef the coast beyond. No. body West of Sheet I-larbour gecs eat of it. Bietween Spry Bay anid Sheet Harbour we passed ever a great height, the island-detted, peninsula- piereed sea beneath us specked with groups of distant fIshing boats. Mushaboon was a quiet littie place of ed flakes and a wharf where a vessel was ieading. Sheet Harbour, yeu wouid remnem- ber, as composed of MUrs. Oonrod, the travellers' friend, and a Cathelie church crowning the end of the har- heur. To be received by Mrs. Conirod is reemmondation enough for the south east. \" Do you see any name",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE out there to say this is a hotel '1\" she demauded of a complaining traveller. \"Well, then, get out.\" Three years later he returned, confident that he' would bie forgotten. She recognized him in the midst of dinner-and lie finished it elsewhere. 'We spent a whole night there. We 're proud. Mrs. Conrod is Irish,1 and 1seventy-five, and, with oue maid, handies a big house and a store across the road. \" Go to the other store,\" she hurled at a cusý- tomer who, had interrupted her after- noon nap. In the meantime events had been shaping to force us to the coach. The soles of the ahoes of the -Womau-who- worries were making effective protest against the roads. We didu 't appr,-- ciate the paper our feilow-tramfp liad used to f111 the gap; but net at shoe repairer had we accu since we lef t Halifax, and we were informed we probably wouldn't thia side of Sher- brooke. At Spry Bay a fisherman drove in a few tacka. At Sheet Har- bour we heard of eue who worked in the mines by day, and by night eut the village hair, and sometimes re- paired shoes. 1 was waiting for him at six, and found him willing, \"aup- posin' they didu t bother himi too mucli with hair-cuttin'.\" At eleven, that night I stumbled through the darkness to has house and was reward- cd with soles that were, at leaat, solid leather and securcly tacked. It pre- vented the paper situation. East of Sheet Hlarbour the average accommodation deteriorates, but is not at aIl impossible. Sheet Harbour seems to be the end of ordinary traf- fie, snd travellers thereaftcr must take what thcy caui get. Wc also bie- gan to feel the distressirg effects of unreliable information. Having plan- ned to walk only sixteen miles that day, we decidcd at the end of it to puali on five miles further in the un- eanny darkncss of an ocean fog after sundown. It was a venture I don 't ivant te repeat in a wild country with- ont fences to keep you in the road- and the ieniory of a bear enli we had seen saunter out on the road us that day. Twelve miles farther on, at Josepli, we were forced to gi walking and take to the coach. weather was beceming unsettie raw, the roads were terrible, th( ping-places more irregular, an meals eoming at ail hours ew: mistaken local ideas of distanc direction. To reacli Marie Jos( were direeted. dowia a branch thiat .crried us two miles outi way, having already walked foi ther than the distance given then another mile out of our with a great, gaunt feeling whE lest meal should have been two befere. The remainder we d coachlngng evety minute fi ter weather, that we might wa] In six -days, the Sunday of we had spent at rest, we had e almost exactly one hundred mi', cording to my pedometer, mor eighty of which was along the road. During that week-aud t] the preceding and sueeeeding è coach-we opened to ourse] variety of scenery indigeneus t Scotia. Little, Îndifferent fish, lages, asleep by day, lively early morning and late afterno, sullied by the outside world o class distinctions; ample baàimf a country 's fleet miglit anch( only bobbiug littie fishing lx sight; freeli, white-washed holi without regard to aught but tl: ers' whims; white-towered el peeping over the hill and bri peaca and thoughtfulness; Cj here and there, lumbering1 along as if the world were: rush and care; a patient peopi and gentie, bearing the diffieu their if e with wonderful caln these but a few of the brush- of the pieture we saw. Ever folds, bringing to us new me new humours, new gladuesses if e, new sorrows-always b( and free and tinged with the of simplicity and patience.",
         "From the Painting by Louis Mettling THE in the National Art Gallery of Canada STUDIO",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "DEAR FATHER THIRD AND CONCLUDING LETER FROM A SON WHO WOULD MAKE SOMETHINGO0F HIMSELP TO A SELF-MADE FATHER EDITED BY ALBERT R. CARMAN Hetel de ,Barbizon. wr Father : t is alinost a rebel who sits down write yen to-niglit. It la certain- in infidel with regard tothe great erican religion ef dollar-making. at would yen think of a mn who Id put up goeda whicli the people -e crszy te buy, but wlio insisted ýn putting up an article which tliey ild net have at any price; and ) lived bis lite eut in poverty as !onuene? 'What -woiild they hlmn in Chicago? Tet there are of Rueli mon in France. 1 ast iafterneon aud watched eue at tk. He wore a sliapeless \"eew 's êtfst\" te keop the sun eut of bis g. Ho had on clothes whieh weuld ito eontempt lu the. stock yards; [ bc wore thm bocause lie ws tee r te bnynybetter. lis paints, eanva, bi bru hesad ceat lim, iywhieh ho saved by living in ,ft; and ho would have borne suy d9hip fer thorn except givo up the ýe 1 lke. for dinner. He was -king at a pieture *hich lie will bably have te give away. Yot lie Id have painted it so it would sell. L the picture ho painted was the e*pleture s ho saw it; aud, as lie ught it nerer snd nearer toth fection ho lad lu lis mind, lis f1e being seened te brina ever lu a L of subdued eestasy et enjyeynt. was hungry; for ho was econoin- tg by delug witheut déjeuner. Hie s not know howhe isgoing tolive through the coming winter ln Paris, Yet lcie l the happiest \"foot\" alive. If lie gets just the right shade of the rîglit colour on that eommionplae boulder in the foreground, lie woiild flot change places with a Rothschild. The point of view of sucli a mnax îa so entirely different frein ours that it la no wonder neither aide ean ex- plain it without imputing lunacy te, the other. lie weiild like to have more money because it would leave his elbow freer for bis work; but that lie should secure more mouey by lin- priaoning bis elbow--or by giving it up to the control of anethor mani- would be to sacrifice the end te the means. lie would have put out of lis reacli theoenly thing that lie want- od the moey te buy. The real difforonce la that lie doos lis work to please hlmaolf snd not te ploase the largest crowd, wliereas we do our work te please the crewd sud te get their golden applause. lie ex- presses himself; we try te express the average maninm our area. Hie leads hxxmanity; we follew it. lie la a creator; we are imitatora. lie la the master o! his campaigil, with victory or de! est at the end of lis own brush - we are auccessful autiers. When we speak of lis happineas snd our lisp- pmress as if tliey ceuld be coxupassed by the saine word, it la as if w, spoke of the aong of the frog and the aong ef the lark. Yes, dear Pad; that la my moed to-niglit. It la flat rebelliln against",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Chicago. I feel to-niglit as if pos- sible poverty were only a trifling in- convenience which should nlot be al- lowed to affect the planning of one 's Jife; and as if the attainment of cul- ture, which would enable on1e to at least appreciate the higher achieve- ments of these men and which inight lead me--even me--to taste the tri- umphant joys of creation, should be the sole purpose to which I ouglit to, devote my energies. I probably will feel quite differently ini the morning. I notice that, after my most exalted hours, I stub my toe against some stunp, which my up-raised eyes had overiooked; and, in a moment, I amn overwhelmcd with thankfulness that iy feet can stili feel solid finaneial earth beneath them. I do not know why it is; but I haven't the unruf- fled courage of these men. They ap- parently neyer think that thcy miglit give up the arduous path to the bill- top, and go to making money. They are quite aware that thxe rnoney is there for them to make; but they 11o more consider the possibility of paus- ing i their career to make it than You dIo of giving up your immense business to go back on grandfather's farm and raise hogs. But I iack that spirit. I ean swear devotion to culture here to-niglit in my ton-franc bedroom, aftcr a good dinner and with an ample \",letter of credit\" in my poeket; but if 1 were to wake up a poor man in the morn- ing I should neyer think of doing anything cisc than saiiing at once for Chicago and thxe hog business. Arn I a coward, or is it rny training? lias the dollar seemed to me the only good so long that I dare worship no0 higli- or god except with its squalid ap- proval? The preachers talk to us at home of \"unworidiiness.\" That old mnan, painting away in the shadow of bis bent straw hat, k-nows more of \"lunworldliness\" than ail the fash- iona'ble ehuarches iii Chicago. His is the \"higlier life.\" His is the \"re- ligions calm.\" Hie is \"unsPotted frorn the world.\" licean \"endure hardsbip hike a good soldier,\" m I will seil my birthright. for a x of pottage any day. You can sec that your son is in a somewhat contemptuous n toward himscif to-night; and j letters arc not entircly innoceni blame. I can sec that yon are proaching a deeision i my case; that that decision wi.ll be to c home and get the nonsense woi out of me. And I ar n l a \"1 funk.\" For I arn pretty sure th will corne. 0f what use is it to, for a head of gold if one must si upon feet of clay? Yet I pump rny courage by remiînding mysel, yeu. You remember how grandfa bitterly opposed your move to cage. fie said that Chicago wi wieked place whcre you would be into pathis of sin; that in the hi of the great ciY yon would nDeý your religious duties; that ho n heard of any real good man in t ness there; and that they 'd b. smnart for you anyway and you'd ail the money yon had saved. I g it was that last notion that made determined to, go. Grandfather willing that you should buy a W] in the store \"up to the village,\" then you could build a brick i there some day and be one of the E men of the eomxty. Hie wouid let have an oid nag of his-Il remen yon telling-for your delivery wa whieh would be a new wrinkie tl Thus he rnapped out your futui pleasant, peaceful, and profiti But you dared everything and N to Chicago. You might have 1 ruined iu a month. But you had courage to take the risk. licigh-ho 1 Have I your spirit arn I the heir oniy of yonr ideals your dollars? One of the mon hei one of the cornparativciy suecel men-was telling me the other about his folks at home. They vine cultivators iu the south France, and are i a prosperous of business. Hie lias three liroti two of whom have staved with",
         "DEAR FATHER father and helped buy another hli- side or so of vines, while the third lias become a fat merdhant in Bor- deaux. My friend '5 naine is Josephi, anud it is a naine which you would hlear iii the studios of Paris if you were there wvhen the \"rising hopes\" of the new generation are spoken of. But bis father always says that he lias \"four sons, three of whom are doing well ini the world, while Joseph is a vagabond in Paris.\" Josephi Isuglis at it; but there is pain in his eye-niot pain for himiself, but pain for the good people at home who suf- fer sorrow and anxiety for him so useleuily. Then lie, too, sorrows for tbem. He is the only one of the four brothers who is really alive. Parsons followed me ont here the other day-wanted t4\u003e see something of the artist before he wus \"cured.\" But the only thing that, struck him ws that the attention of Anthony Comstock and the Purity Departi-nent ouglit to be called to thia town. I mention this now because 1 know that lie will; and lie will add that you ought to get me out of such surrounid- îmgs as soon as possible. As this is a Lh4ter of rebellion, probably 1 cannot stop at a better point, And I amn going to mail it to- night, especially as prudence insista that I will be sorry for it in the inorn- ing. I probably wiIl; aind then I would teair it up if I could. But if 1 ean put miyseif in rny moments o! courage in positions fronim hich I cannot run away;i when I turn cow- ard, I xnay lie worthy of vou after ail. This may leadl you to issue an ultimatum; and tIen I hope that I wil have enougli of you in nie to re- fuse to yîeld. 'With dlouble affection, JOHNr.",
         "THE PRIDE 0F TWO BY ROSA MULHOLLAND W EEN I beame engaged to Kýit lie had just made a suc- c eas as a novelist. Persons who knew uothing of my affaira were pleased to cry me about as a great heiress, bevause my parents bavlug died during iny childhood 1 was very early in possession of my father's property. Kit'. pride would not allow hixu to speak ti, me tili the publie had labelled hi. genius \"suc- cesfut.\" His pseudonyxu i. Balder Hildebrand, snd people have thouglit him a Norwegiau instead of a Con- nauglit man, which naturally added to hi. prestige. However, 1, being Lilirosa .A.nsbella, so naxned in my father's will, and nder promise to my mother always to write my name in full as i. comprehieuded lier own name snd those of her two sisters, delighted in the liberty aud simpli. city of \"Kit.\" To drag sixteen let- ters of the alphabet along tlie end of an epistie, sud to be replied to by three, was oe of the smaller fascina- tions of a tlioroughly satisfactory en- gagenment. Our disagreement arose out of xny capricee-whieh was as great as hi. pride. 1 pretended te fear that a noveliat miglit expeet hi. wife to act as hi. arnanuensis; thougli I was secretly longing for sueli su oppor. tunity te help him. Hi. pride rose te white heat at the bare suggestion of sucli fears, sud I played witli it tiil su angry letter, giving me back my freedeni, brenglit mue to mny senses. Believing in my power, I mnade ne reply, sud my next news of hima wus threugh a nq paper sunouncement that the dia guished novelist Balder Ilildebr had started, on a trip te Ccxi Africs, in searcli of material fc bniisut nooYd descriptive of \"ocal life of London. 1 finished the season, dancing self and friends into the belief I was delighted to regain my f dom, sud when that was over 1, went tripping abroad. I tarrie\u003c Egyt, studying the problem of Sphinx, liovering about the dei observing limnns nature tinder conditions and trying te believe 1 was developing Snto a aupE woman. Two wliele years passed fore 1 returned to Eunisnd, then 1 was rather the fashion an my friends and admirera as s wlio hsd done independent thi aud liad enjoyed nusual exi ences. 1 was lioe proud te aàk qut about Kit, sud I searched the a in vain for a word about B Hildebrsud. He appeared to 1 dropped ont of the fl\u003c*le publie ni Iu a balirooni I at least heard i tion ef hi. name. \"Do yen sec that girl ini w dancing?\" said ene womau to Cther. \"She may well look pe She lias liad a lucky escape. Ia twe years ago shie was nae poor Balder Hildebrand!i h fate te have been tied for l$fêi blind novelist! \" \"T amn ouite tirt\" T %pici 1.",
         "THE PRIDE 0F TWO MNany careful inquiries failed to procure nie further information than was conveyed i» sueli passing words as \"oh, yes, poor fellow I Work stop- ped, Got a blast of some pmisonoua air into his eyes whLI, travelling. ilas retired somewhere or other. Too proud to show himself, one im- agines. \" ,My mind kept runing on the busi- ness of a professional seeretary or amanuienais, and to oceupy part of my tie I got myseif o» the commit- tee of management of a bureau for procuring engagements for persons who had adopted that profession. I becamne quite assiduous ini my attend- ance at the office, and took mnuch in- terest in the applications for help froin literary quartera. One day during business hours 1 beard the remark, ''Application for au amanuensis from Balder Hilde- brand, the novelist. He appears to, want a mn, and we have only I took occasion to say: (my pride cowforted by the knowledge that my past was unknown ini this quarter) TLWth regart to thc case of Mr. Hildebrand, I eau get hilm whiat lie iranta. Write Wo hini thiat a per- sol, will be with hini on Monday as lie wishes. Give me hie letter, that 1 may have the address.\" Not until 1 got home and sat down to think did Iknow what 1Iintended to do. But 1 was soon packing a niodest trunk, and looking up the raiiway regulatione for reaching the bye.ways of Devonshire. I found the place, a cottage lost awa i the apple country, standing in a garde» clearing among orchar\u003cls, and walked up a laxie betwee» bend- jug trees riehly coloured with the geair was deliciously aveet, and fnagra»t witli the odours of Septeni- ber flowers that know the dewa and -\"fow lie must enjoy thisi\" 1 htforffettixiz for one moment Over a low Iiedge on whicb perched a stiff peacock, e ut out of the dense dark yew, I saw imii coming down the orchard, slowly, stopping a mno- ment and puttinig hIs hiand on1 a weighted branch, toucliing the round- ed appies, then dropping lis armi Wo bis side and mnoving on dejectedly, I took care Wo avoid hini, and waited tîii he had entered the house before I presented myseif at the door. An old Irish servant, suimmnoned to dîmind\" lmi in his present state, re- ceived mne, and stepped fromi the hall into, the littie study to anniounice Miss Gibbs, the seeretaryv s4ent down froin London. \"Yes, air, it 's a lady, air.\" There was an» exclamation of dis- pleasure froin the master, a murmuiir of abrupt conversation, and tie mn returued Wo me. \"Your sex is against you, miss,\" he said. 'We 've only two, men here, and we have no way of puttin' up a lady.\"' \"I have made arrangements Wo stay with the postmnistresa i» the vil- lage except in worki»g heuris,\" I aaid. \"Wili you tell your master that the me» in London were ail en- gaged; and that I kiiow my busi- ness?\" ' After another conference within, and a littie delay I was admitted Wo the temporary sanctum. of Balder Hidebrand. \"He's in that great a tuss that he'll try te bc dol»' with yen, miss,\" whispered Bernard, and lingered before he ciosed the deer, as if Wo see bis master weil through the irritation of hie disappointment. Kit was sitting in a meet iincom- fortably accidentai position in the middle of the rom, with the air et one who did flot k»ow where hie vas, or had ne sense of arrangement, no care about his particular surround- ings. There was a litter of papers on the writing-table in the wide-lat- ticed window, everything was tossed about by an impatient liand, a peu wet 'with ink had been tlirowu down upon a page and lad made a blot.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Having greeted me witli that po- litenese of good breeding whicli no ir- ritation could quite extinguish i Kit, lie said: 1'I wanted a man. One could grumble at him and swear at him. as much as one pleaed-\" \"Pray don 't reetrain yourself,\" 1 said i a rather husky voice, which I liad been praetising for some hours, I have a knack of mixnicking toues of voice, and was now reproducing the mnner of one of my aequaint- anees who lias a peculiar lisp. \"I1 ar n ot a brute,\" lie said hufflly. I suppose you know why I reqire your services. I have a novel to write, and I eau 't sec to write it, I hate typing. A pair of hauds, and an intelligent brain are what I need to help me. \" \"Shall we begin at once?\" I said. \"May I arrange your papers? 1 can't write in disorder. And won't you oit in a eomfortable chair near the window 7 Let me place it for you. Would not a few flowers on the table beside you be agreeable ? \"What differeuce doe it make to met\" lie said. \"You have a woman 's ways, and I tell you f rankly I have no liking for the society of women. As you are here, however, I would rather you were comfortable. If you eau do better i pretty suroundings by ail means let us have the best of your work.\"' 1 had been rapidly putting things to riglits, and wlien a cluster of roses was placed at his hand lie belied his words by raisiug it to his f ace for a moment, and breathing its sweet- ness. \" I arn ready, \" I said. lie leaned back in hie chair, and seeme 'd to want a minute to gather up his thoughts. I selected my pen, sudl sat with my eyes on his face till they became inconvenieutly moiet. So this was Kit. lie lias ruddy brown hair, you know, aud a golden liglit in hie eyes when he smiles. Hie eye- lids were now drooped, unexpectant of liglit, snd thiere was ne smile. We began. The story opei pleasantly, and animation returi to bis face. That day 's, work briglit and eoueoliug. As the woni bcloved by the man in the book eh, cd heref, I fclt exultantly sure t ber face, forni, and personality w modelled ou mine; and I went lic to my postmistress with a lightei heart; as day followed day, howei and the lieroine 'e cliaracter and c duet took au uncxpected turn spirits sauk, and I could flot b seeing myseîf as I must have appt cd to another at the time of oui qu rel. I bore this change witli res4 tion, strengtliening my intention keeping my secret, if not for ev'er least until some inevitable and couragiug moment miglit arrive. lier nome was Violante. (Hie J formerly liked a long name, and find that lie had now unuecessa: chosen one reconciled me a littlE Lilirosa Annabella.) I was just l1 iug that the licro would begin te dcrstaud lier better when ehe be, te, beliave so badly that I nek cried. out, declariug mnyself ready snswcr for the innocence of lier tentions. I blotted several pages 1 day, and liad to spend my eveni moyn tliem. Afýyter that the matter grew w\u003c and woree, and at last I lost my 1 deuce, and threw down rny peu, j ing:- \"This is a very cynical nevel.\" \"Rly\" lie said in great i prise, \"Do you always criticize you go alougl\" \"One muet, if one lias any bra And you said you wanted a pe-r witli brames.\" He gave a little laugli. Had 1 less sore I sliould have been glaè have amused hlm. \"Pray go ou,\" lie said. \"I ki women, it appears, hetter thon do.\"' \"How eau that bel\" I said. arn a woman, and yen are not. \" \" That le the very reson, \" le a \"A man unfortunately cornes",
         "THE PRIDE 0F TWO know a woman better than women eve-r knowx their own sex-through suiffering. \" ' Then you have - suffered from such a womnan as Violante!1\" , «I arn not obliged by the rules of this engagement to answer impertin- ent questions-\"' \"Oh!\"ý iBut by the tone of your voice 1 arn warned not to class you with the imnpertinenit. You are a sympathetie womnan, and 1 forgive you.\" This, 1 think, was the very moment at whihI1bega to get jealous of mnyseif. 1 dared not say more, and was particularly silent and unob- trusRive for the rest of that day. But as 1 walked back to the village bc. tween the apple trees there was war in te hart of thegirl who wasen. gaged to Kit, two years ago, -with the secretsry of to-day wlit was winning on, his symnpathies. The situation was odd, and I tried to Iaugh myseif out of it. 1 qat down to the work next mornÎng teiling a Immnorotis story of the conduct of two little birds I had corne upon, .vidently mnaking up a quarrel, perched on the tail of the yew-clipped pecokon the garde\" liedge-row. Kit listened with more of his old ,%mile than I had seen as yet, and I made no complaint that day, thuhViolante was behaving dis- gutigy. Ail the time 1 wau long- igto talk to Kit. It seemed so nat- ural to do se. But li muci COnver- gation there was danger of fergetting my asumed voie, and nMY littie lisp. As 1 wn-s leaving after workl ho said, -You have been very silent to-day. I hope you are weil.Y i\"ýOh, yes, \" I rephied, \" but there is only the story te talk about. And 1 fesr to seemn-impertiflent.\"P \"Thore ie really ne danger,\" be gaid eagerly.-\"I would rathier hear 7our eomnments. \" \" ýI don't think yen would. 1 amn in arme for n'y sex. 1 do not bélieve Violanite behaved like that. i Ut us talk ber over, then.\" * To-morrow, if you wish. I mnust say good-bye for this eveninig. \" lie looked disappointed. Neit day he broke off work early, and the Irishman broughit tea into the study. \"Now,\" he said, \"I invite you to tea with mie--tea. and a liite onýi- versation. 1 amn a lonely mnax, with -iqabilities. A Nomlal- 1 will flot say a lady, because the other word means se much mnore-a true womnan, as you elaim to lx-, will not refuse to gratify me.\" \"I am at your service,\" 1 said; \"but the claimr I make is not for i- self, as 1 have saidl, but for mny scx. \" \"It is a very unusual attitude for a woinan to take uip. Shie se often assumes to bc herseif the only excep- tion te an unhappily general mile. As yeu are so large-minided 1 have a mind to trust yen. Morose and soli- tary as 1 have been for the lest two years I have confided iu no one. If this blindness had not overtaken me I might have shaken off a bitter dis- appointment-\"l I smothered au exclamation whieh would have marked my keen sense of the isuggestion that 1 miight eaaily have been quite forgotten, and swal- lowed the sound with a slight eough. \"I1 fear you have got a eoîd. \" \"Oh, very slightly. But my huski- ness miust be, disagreeable.\" Net at ail. I rather like a low con- tralto voice. \" Another blow for me, who rememn- bered hie oft-expressed delight in the \"merry ringinig treble of my talk and laughter. Roseetti's draw- ing of \"How they met themselves in a wood,\" just glimmered acrose my mental vision, with a meaning for me, only. Tmuly, we were meeting ourselvea in a wood; our very selves, wÎth the knowledge that makis a dit- ference. \"Will yen plems te continue your criticism of my heroine. You accuse me of cynicism li drawing a woman'a character.\"' '« I do not believe you ever knew muci a woman, 11",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE \"I have known lier. A wornan will accept a inu's devotion so long as lie m\u0026kes lier f eél heraelf a queen, obeying her commando, aud doliglit- ing in lier caprices. But lot lier flnd herself called on to bear lier aliare of tlie burdens of life, sud lier love lias flown. At a suspicion, even a groundîcas one, that the smnallest ser- vice may ho required of lier, interf or- ring witli lier amxusement, lier wings are spread. \" \"Did she beliave lie thatt I don't mean Violante, but the other one?\" \"Yes; I fear I anubbed you once for askipig me somthing like that question. I have aecepted your sympathy, sud I answer your in- quiry, straight. I ws clioking now with liatred sud jealbusy of myseif. 1 did niot know wlitler my past self or my present self lad the more riglit to be ag- grieved. \"I1 have not givon you mueli syim- pathy as yet,\" I said. \" To listen witli interest te the grumblimiga of a blind mn is sym- patly in itself, \" lie said 'witli a toucli of pathos in the linos of liii face, whieh some peuple would have scorn- ed as \"self-pity,\" but whicl did not excite my contompt. I could[ not, however, afford te show sympatliy. The only safety was in continuns argument, \"You don't agree witli Seott on the. point,\" I said, attempting Wo get again pn general grouxxd. \"No,\" le said, sud repeated the linos that \u0026lready lad corne into n'y mind: \" Oh, Woman i our hours of ese, Uncertain, coy, and 'bard te pieuase When rare and siekness wring the bro-w A ministering angel thon!\"' \"I1 have no belief in that. The worn I wanted to airy would have sorely liated the trouble of me, now! ' \"You cruel akeptie!\" I cried; and for the moment forgot n'y caution. lut was my own voice that ranig in my ears. He threw up has head 8 soUnd caught; im, with an inde able look whîcli friglitened mi sinile slowly grew on his facE died away; after whieh lie dr his head on hs liand, and ther, a long silence between us. \"IPerliaps I amn,\" he said at \"But with regard Wo that mnt atanza, so hacknoyed as a quot I would say, as a reading of it- the womau who cornes Wo a i his pain as a miniatering ani not the saine person as the lad3 riee of his hours of esse. Tihe ifferent types of feminine eh, or. So mudli you will alow, i are reasonable.\" \"Let me be roasonablo in oyes,\" I said, \"for my experie: different froin yours. But wo finishod the tea, and I promis do a littie service for my lan this evening.\" \"I rose to go, and lie rose alui: mnade a stop, towards me. \"WÜi you not shako liands me?\"\u003e I went, t meet lim, and pxL lngers in bis, as ho cot\u0026ld net llnd mine. Ho held my hand, ly as if ho would dling te it, I pulled it away indignautly, turned to leave the mooxu. \"Good evening, sir,\" I said most pronouncod unnatural and left lin. As I trimmed a hat for my mistress, shut up in my little in the village that ovening, tears feUl thiek on the tuile and ors whieh are not warranted to a shower. Oh, the incist inu! Woman is a miracle of0f Compared witl hin. To thlük sliould lave nursed nmy ro througli the distractions of travi society, living on wweot eo my own heart-for ths! -0 have grown sympathetie and dential with a msuiese",
         "THE PRIDE 0F TWO ever iii lis affection, forgetting me witb bitterness, and ready te faRin l love with a strange woman, hie mere amanuensis, an argumentative wom- ail too, and with an unpleasant voice, and1 a lisp' My paission over. 1 summoned miY commron sense, and resolved to be what Kit would eau reasonable. 1 ws despiaed and practically forgot- tezn. 1 wouild finish hie book for him, keeping lm welI at a distance iu the mneautime, and then I would returmi whenoe 1 hiad corne, undiscovered, and beave imi te flnd another score- tary, who would gladly respond to his confidences. Findinig it more than ever difficuit te present myseif at my desk the next miorning 1 admitted that 1 was properly puuished for my hardihood in venturing on an under- taking whieh has proved tee difficuit for me. Ail day lie made himself perfectly deliglitful te that odious creature, the seeretary. There were neo more snuhe and lectures. He drew lier eut, like one who desired te ho informed by lier superier knowledge. No matter how hoarse she was, or liew absurdly she lisped, he lisitened te lier witli a rapturous expression whicli made me iut witli unhappiness. The work went on, nevertlieless, 'Il kuow yeu don't tike it,\" lie said, \"but wliat I have written 1 have written. One eau only write of one's own experieuces. Should sweeter hapenings corne te me after mnuel sufering , mny next novel will, per- haps, b. of a more sanguine colour. '1 lied been as uilent as 1 found i possible te bc, but here 1 spoke. Il'Has any one the riglit te cail hi. own mood an experience of the char- acter snd Ceuduct Of othersl What h. p2!ovokes, lie ereates.\" 'Ah!\" lie nid reflectively, \u003c'not badlY Put, I ivili think that ever. The inconsistencies of cliaracter, and the contradictions of truths are 1111.. jf table and lummeasurable. Who k-nows wlietlier Violante may uct jus- tify herselif, even iii the lest chap- ter?\" I H1e then began te quote again the lines of Scott te which lie liad given hie own particular reading. This hurt mne beyond bearing. ''Yo fogt, aid. I, ý1 'ta yýo1 founid twe different types of wvoifien registered in these verses. And Vie. tante is only one.\" H1e smniled. It was terrible te mne te feel that 1 lied grown te dread hie smnile, wbich was for the secretary aud nwt for me. I wished ho,, would 1-elapse inito sterilness towards hur. and mnemories of 1111. 1 said somvthing further abouti two womien and eue, woman. I can 't remnember exactly what it was, but I know that the ut- terance left me aware of imminent risk of a dangerous collision between Lilirosa Annabella and the detest- ahie 'Miss Gibbs. 11e did net appear te notice it, however, It was evident that the secretary was occupying al his masculine attention. The novel wua drawiug te a close, and it was still uncertain whetlier bce meant te clear Violante's cliaracter, shoew lier s an augel mnisunderstood, the victim ef deceptive appearances, or dismiss lier inte tlie penal realmas where wander in eternal eblivion the never-to-be-forgiven heroines. 'Il kuow you mean te end it bad- ly,\" 1 nid, wlien lie iutiniated that lie was prepariug the denouemeut, and iutended te inake a pause and think it over. H1e lied proposed an interval for a walk in the orcliard and gardeus every d]ay, te delay the work while he was makiug up his uxind, and thus rendered mue se thor- eughiy miserable that 1 coutd not en- dure my position any longer and re- soived te break the engagement and liurry away, et any cost. \"Y\"OU have deeided on a bad end- ing,\" 1 repeated. \"Any eue could write it for you, te save yeu the trouble. Your Violante is net real enougli te require yen, er any other speciat autlior of lier being, for lier eudiug. She is suob a poor bloodleus",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE ereature very littie would finish lier.\"y 11Will you undertake it then?1\" he asked. \" If I leave the ending alto- gether to, you, wil you write me the last few chapters?\" \"Indeed I will not,\"' I said-' 'you must work lier out for yourself, or employ some one wliose views are like your own. And I amn obliged to tell you-\" I added witli an effort to speak indifferently, \"that I shall re- turu to London ina day or two. This engagement has mun beyond tlie length speeified, and I amn due elese- where.\" His face became clouded, and me- morse took possession of me. Lilirosa and the strange wornan were rending my heart betweeu tliern 0, Miss Gibbs, Miss Gibbs, how liad you gain-. ed sueh an influence over my Kit, with your sharp contradictions and your purely mechanical services? \"Don 't go away yet; give me an- other day or- two, \" lie pleaded. \" I amn due in London to-maorrow night. \" He was silent for a minute, and, I fussed with my papers to occupy the interval. \"Corne to say good-bye in tlie momning, \" lie umged, and I said, \"Yes, I can do that, feeling as if I liad got a reprieve f rom the full pen- alty of immediate departLure. Tom leave liim so, alone and helpless, with- out even a secmetary to comfort him, was intolerable. \"I1 may be able te send you an amanuensis frôm London, I said. \"You would stiil prefer a man, I sup- pose.\"e Hle actuaily lauglied; and that har- dened me a littie for the moment, and enabled me te «et out of his presence witliout betraying myseif. After a miserable niglit I rose up, limp, but resoived. I dmessed myseif for our last meeting, i white, as lie used to like to see me, my heart me- minding me the while of how siily it was to, think of sucl follies. I miglit as well be clotlied ini sackcloth and ashes for ail the differenc* could make to a man who was sil leas. \"No matter! I said, tmying to move the tell-tale redness from al my eye8, (also of no eonsequence) will, once for ail, destroy Miss Gi' if only to xny own eonsciousnesa wiil feel tliat I arn myself inL the ment of my last farewell to Kit.' I walked up tlirough the av green lanes, and saw that the ap trees liad a reddem glow tlirough green than wlien fimst I saw th and tliat the yew peaeock stood à more darkly against the brilliane( distant foliage now touched N gold and searlet. To iengthen walk I approaelied the cottage by orcliard paths, and pauseZa mon to, disentangle a tress of my 1 from the claws of a pendent bra which liad just dropped an over-i apple into the liat that I carried my arrn. Turning my liead I saw Kit e ing up tlie path to meet me. His eyes were open, and the g en smile was in tliem. Hie wal with a free etep, looking stmaight fore liim. It was Kit, no ior blind. My arms fen by my aides. Hat apple were on tlie gmound. Traiu ed with amazernent, I waited for: to corne to me. \"Lii!\" lie said, with the ring great joy in his voice. \" Kit!1 What lias done it?\" I forgot ail about Miss Gibbis. were liere together, and the sighi me was making hîm glad. \"You have donc it. Your coui did it. My doctor told me that blindness, being of the nerves, mi possibly go as suddenly as it es The joy of your return to me acted as a tonic. I knew it wl this morning. I opened my eyes the stnshine. \" \"But-Miss Gibbs-\" 1 uaid, \u003c did not know-\" \"I found you ont pretty early the proceedinga. You were flot",
         "REPARATION elever as you intended to be. Uow could you expect to keep up a dis guise of voice and manner so perfect- ly that Lit should never alune throughi it ?\" And you were Iillowing me te go away! \" \"As a blind ian, how could I take advantage o! your genierosity? But I was torn with inidecision. When I saw the blessed light tbis niorning 1 knew that God was sending me a great happiness. \" \"Kit,\" I said, after a few mire- portable mîiues had flown, \"we are the two happicet people ini the world this morning. \" We repeated thosqe words to eateh other to-day,, the seventh anniversary o! our marniage. REPARATION By A. G. MACKAY S HE planted rose by the door, And cbjidren passed in bands, But nione of them would take the flowers She held in wistf ut hanids. Now silence filis the littie house Where weeping was before, And lovers stop to pick the llowers Around the sagging door. Lord, grant that she may see her flowers, And see young eyes aglow; And may ahe dream that love was true In summers long ago. - ~",
         "THE ADOPTION 0F THREE S' BY STANLEY PORTAL HYATT T l«'IEP Sanitary Board ot Fort Alexandra, having got through u is ordinary conucal busiuess, ehih con8isted of anthorising the payiment ef fifteen shillings eaeh as a month 's wages te three Kaffir labour- ers, adjourned from the Court-house to the bar of the Thatehed Hlouse Hetel, and went into committee on Three Star. It was always a more point witlh the inhabitants of the townshbip that, thengh theirs was the oldest settie- ment in Maaiionaland, it was flot al- lowed te have a mayor and corpora- tion. Not that it would have rever- enced mayors and aldermen-but it objected to other towns being granted special privileges, just because they happened to bc bigger. True, Fort Alexander was right et! the main track, being two hundred miles from the railway; whilst the other two or three dozen tin shanties which oompesed it might net impress a stranger very greatly; but the people knew it was the nucleus of isomething big, and professed te care littie about what outside crities might say. The Boom must come. Three Star bimself was seated on an empty barrel, munehing biscuits, when the B3oard entered the bar. Hie waa a smnalt boy of uncertain age- about four, Miss Hales, the Matron of the Hospital, delared-but, beyond that, ne one knew anything about him. Aceording te Jobnny l3elden- huis, the Dutch transport rider, the child and its f ather had been travell- ing north on a private imule cart, M2 which had been swept away in t te cross the Lundi Drift wheu river was in flood, both the Ieade6 the driver being drowned. A c, of days later, Johnny, who ws south with empty waggons, had f the survivors, drenched and sta, on the road, and had proinptly ed back and brought thein the miles into, tewn; but the fathei been. delirious aU the way, and died of blackwater foyer tw;enty heurs after his arrivaI, leaviin dlue te, his indentity. The ohildhlad been very ilfoi days; butl at the end of a notbing short of physieal force have kept hum in bed. In rep questions, he gave lis naine s I whereat Miss Hales had shaker head, and decided that in futm, must be \"Theodore;\" but the. lad rejected both appellations, after a discussion whoch had kep barman up tilt tbroe o'clock ir morning, had settled upon 'Il Star\" as being short and ist and alse serving to fix the. date o arriva,, whioh lad occurred duri severe whiskey famine, when the. lad preforce f allen baok on brait At first it lad been supposed ti would be an easy task te, tramE lest mule cart back te itsa i place; but thougl at Tuli, the. lx station, men remembered it pas ne one lad troubled te a*k ita ovf naine: and on the TranavpAi aiU",
         "THE ADOPTION 0F TI] iEE STAR and evin wired to au ex-Alexandrian in Johanniesburg, but without resuit; then mien began to breathe freely aai, and to inake plans for Three Star's future. Tiie idea which fouud most support was that the towu itself should adopt tie child; but at a general gathering iéld after the Saturday market, Father Martin, the chairnian of the Board-\" Father \" being a purely secular titie, conferred on hîm as the oldest iuhabitaut, he having heen thoe sine the foundation of the place, eight years previously-poînt- id out the legal difficulties of sueli a uqheme, and it was finally rejected lu favour of adoption by some individ- ,la]\" who w-as to be chosen 1»' the Board after its next meeting. Every- one was detenmined that Three Star ahould remain in Alexandra, the ouly dlseutienit beinig Stephenson, the manager of the Trading Company'\u0026 storo, and he had ceased to co.unt ince, as a inere neweomer, lie had 8eoffed at every possibility of a Boom in F'ort Alexandra. Three Star took the gla-ss of lemon- \u0026de which Jack Hartigan hiad just brought out for hlm, lu his two chubby hands, washed down bis biscuits with a long drink, then nod- J.d bonevolently to the Board. He wa distinctly grimy, the resuit of a chance meeting with Peter, a taine ga; tiough, when ho slipped away frmthe hospitai an hour previously, ho had been a very model of clean- ~Peter did tis,\" hi remarked, ponigto is dirty pinafore; then li Brambled off the barrel, and trotted acrosa to Father Martin, who jift.d 1dm on to the bar. \" I love Peter, ' ad I love Peter's mn,\" lie 4pntinued beaming at Hartigan, who b«dsbeing the largest trader lu tedistrict, wss alse proprietor of thi 11Misus wrants tie piceanizi, Baasa;\" the osptalboy put bis head in the door and spoke to 'Martin, whio glane-. ed rather ruefully at his ewu attire~ a sleeveless flannel shirt and dis- coloured khaki breeches, then hurried out, leuding a very unwilling Three Star. Mins Hales was waiting on the steop, looking as severe aLs ber gentle face would shlow. Shie was thirtyý. two, and she ealled herseif an old mnald, wich meiait skiel had refused at, least a dozen offers in t we years. -\"Oh, Theodore, what a mness, you are in! Mr. Martin, 1 have told you before not te take hlm into that horrid bar.\" Fathier 'Martin, who waa thlrty- eight, and had been refused twice, tlushed under the uumierited accusa- tion. \"I didu 't, matron, really 1 didu 't; I fouud hi there.\" \"Then who took hlmi n lu\" Three Star auswvered, \" Peter's man there. Peter throwed mie down, and Peter'. mn carried me lu sud gavai me biscuits sud lemn'uade. \" Miss Hales frownied again. \"1V.s shameful; Mr. Hartigan ought to know botter. Good-aifternoon, Mr. .Martin ' Father Ma.rtin ne-entened the bar full of 'wrath against the trader. \"Theiimatron 's on your track, Jack,\" hoe growled. \"Si. says it's a con- founded shame Wo bring the kid lu here;\" then, after soothing bisi feel- ings with a drink, he turned to bis fellow-members, snd the Board weut into commnittee on Three Star. Hartigan seated himseli on the bar- nil, and haviug nothing better Wo do, listeined Wo the discussion. \"I don't see who is to adopt hmn,\" Martin began. \"The ouly married men-the magistrate and the doctor- have children of their own, and no oee use ha-s a decent housi, or could spare time te give hum proper atten- tion. Besides, most of us are hardly the sort of inodel he want\u0026 Yet they eau't keep hlm indefinitely at the Old John Maddison, the labour agent, wagged his grizzled iuad. \"We'ne most of us tee broke as well",
         "THE OANADIAN MAGAZINE to do it as it should be donc. When ýthinga buck up it wiil be different; but whilst one is hanging on to min- ing dlaims, and waiting, paying out fees ail the time and nothing coxning Îu-\" Rie sîghed, and called for an- ,other round of drinks. Stephenson, of the Trading CJom- pany, laughed unkindly. \"When things buck up!\" ' lie echoed. \" I've been here three years now, and dur- ing that tume the town lias incrcased, to the citent of two grass huts owned by coolies, wliilst there are not ten solvemat white nien in it to-day.\"\u003e John Maddison sait very straiglit. \"You confounded, undersellhng, money - grubbing, trader - clieating -white Kaffir, \" lie spluttered; but Terry, the owner of the Tliatclied flouse, laid a lieavy liand on lia arm. \"Steady on, John,\" lie grunted. 'Then, \"'If you're one of tlie solvent ones, Steplienson, you eau afford to pay nie. -Mac, \" to the barman, \"sing '.out the total of Steplienson$ 'secouet. 'Thirty-seven pounds eleven, isn'tit?\" Stephenson mnuttered an oath, and Ieft hurriedly, amidst the jeers of the Board. \"Il take the kid mysel!.\"1 Harti- gean, who liad been listening in sil- -ence, spoke abruptly. The niembers started and excliang- ed glances. Tliey had not thouglit of Hartigan before. Truc, lie was the ricliest xnan in tlie distrit-at least, till the Boom came-but his nearcat store was tbirty miles out, and-well, there was another objection. \"1,11 take him mysel!,\" Hartigan repeated. It was left to Martin to answer hlm. \"It 's awfuily good of you, Jack, but your place is too far out, and rottenly unliealtliy. \" Hartigan had foreseen the objec- tion. \"I1 kuow; but, then, you sec, I arn going to live in town now. in starting a wholcsale store to knock eout Steplienson. I bouglit Murray's old house from thc executors this morning. \" Thc Board conferrcd a moment, and again Martin had te be i man, but this time lie got ul drew the trader on one aide. \"Look liere, Jack,\" hie aaid awkwardly. \"Yen know whai wliy none of us can really ta ...this infernal whiakey uothing toi do but te liang aboi drink tili things improve; an must admit you've been as bad rest sincc--since your youngE ther died. Perliaps it deesu 't for us, but wc want Thrce turn out a bit better.\"1 Hartigan did net take offenc, because what Martin said wai and because lie himsclf was i est; but hie stuck to, bis point. bring Mi tp as straiglit as in ther was. If I peg eut I car liii a certain five tliousaud. dliaps liad better let me havi Martin.\" Then lie went on stoop, wlierc lie leaned agair rail, whilst the board con! cri thc bar. Ten minutes later Martin him \"They think, after a ouglit to, leave the decision t( Hales. I ai going tmp te see h evening.y Hartigan. noddcd. \"Ail youl'1 find me liere auy time.\" For thc second time that da' Hales looked severe. \"I don 'i Mr. Hartigan is at aIl a suitabli A year ago lie was particular in way, but since lis poor brothe here lic seens to have ceased t( like se many of you, \" alie sigle starcd out into the niglit. 'lI a,- sorry for 1dm, but I alieuld be te trust liii witli 'Theodore.'' Father Martin shifted uneai has chair. It was net the fra Miss Hales hadl lectured hlm, directly or by implication; fi most from the day of lier arriv brave littie wonian liad set to, single-liandcd, to figlit the moi-i rot of the town. Thie hospiti bal! a mile from the Thatched 1",
         "TUE ADOPTION 0F THREE STAR a littie osis of cleanulness and reflue- ment; but how could the matron help knowing what went on, when haif the population had been lier patients? She had not aecomplishied, mueli; ini faet, somnelimes, when skie had been sitting up all night holding the hand of a dying mnax, il seemed to lier that sÉhe had accomiplished nothing; but .even if skie lost heart, skie neyer gave up he fight. 'I shoudd be afraid Wo trust him axow,' skie repeated. Martin leaned forward suddenly. 1 lit would be a goodl thing for Three Star-Theodore, 1 mean. Hartigan would provide for him as none of us eoùld, and 1 tliink it would niake hinm keep straiglit as well. Give hiun a chance, matron.'e Miss Hiales looked away. At laýý, \"WeU, lie skiailtlry. I wil keep Theo- dore here for six months, and Mr. Hlartigan shall corne and see him as often she likes. If at the end of that time I amn quite satisfied, I will agree to the arrangement; but I shall have him watched closely.\" The town took Jack Hartigan's re- formation very seriously. Il did not want hlm te be a teetotaler-il would have resented such a thing stroxagly;. but it gave hlm every assistance by not pressing hiun te drink, In any other community, a miax would ha,e boen chaffed, or even sneerel at un- der the cireurnstances; but after a police trooper had received a scien- ~tifi biding at the hands of no less a person than the barmfan, criticisi» caeexcept li the case of Stephen- son, and lie was ignored as benealli eonteifpt. The lown had been quiek le under- .ta»d why Hartigan 'wished to adopt the child. \"Three Star la the image ,of poor young Leslie, Jack's brother -the most decent boy we ever had li Alexandra,\" old Maddison declared, anid Hartigan huiself had admitted asmuch te Miss Hales. He had Wold Ille inatron many other Ihings as they sat talking on the stoop, after Three Star had gonie te bed, and the wise little lady soon camne Wo know hlmi wonderfully well. Skie saw hini al- most every day, for if she wvere buisy when lie called for the boy, l'e gen- erally found somne excuse for a secondl visit later in the day. Nearly four months of Ilartigan 's probation period had gone by when Stephenson started for a trip home. Th'le whole tewn sssenibled Wo see hlmi off, flot because it regretted losixig hlma for a limie, but because there was nothing else te do. S\"Good-bye, Fathecr; good-bye, John,\" Ihe passenger caled to %ar- lin, and Maddison as the driver of the post-eart gatheredl up1 his rein. \"Keep the. Boom 1111 I cotne back.\" Then lie caught siglit of Hlartigan, whom lie detested as a trade rival. \"Se long, H1artigan. Perhaps i l drop acroas Three Star's relatives ai home.\"e \"I'll break your neck if you do,\" lhe trader replîed promptly, thoughi the words gave him an uneasy feel- ing; and as soon as lhe cartl had jolt- ed off on Ils lwo-huindred-miile jour- ney, he walked up te the hospîtal te taNkthe malter over wilh 1he maîroxi. Somehow, they had become so used le the possession of Three Star, that they had almosl forgotten the risk of someone appearing Wo daim hlm. Miss Hales heard hlmi wvill a trou- bled face. \"But I thougil the Board, or Mr. Roper, lie magistrale, had made ail sorts of Iiquiries, liad adver- tised ln the papers.\" Harligan shook his head. \"Roper lef t il 10 the Board; and thougli Mar- tin wrole a lot of letters. lhey didn't winl le lose thc kiddie.\" \" Il was vcry wroing of themn,\" the matron tried te, speak sternlv. \"Sup- pose lie las a moîher who l'as been wondering and longing ail these month\u0026 t\" \"He ean't have oue, or she would have lracked hlm before tis, \" Harti- gan snswered with a show of assur- ance, hrying Wo dispel, thc double h.",
         "THE OANADIAN MAGAZINE. himself had raised. \" The only dan- ger is that Stephenson may attempt to scare us witli some bogus dlaim. \" Miss Hales siglied; and when ber visitor liad gone, 811e sat a long while stariug across the great streteh. of open veldt towards the distant fine of kopj es. \" It would undo al the good if 11e bast Theodore 110W,\" she mur- mured. Three weeks later Father Martin, who was coachi agent amongst other things, waa standing ini the doorway of the Thatched House watching the post-eart comiug dlown the road. \"There 's a passeuger, \" 11e remarked to Maddison. \"I1 wonder who it is. It's three weeks since we liad any- one . . . Huile, Mac,\" to the bar- man. \"You had better get that trek- gear cleared out of one of your bed- rons; there 's a stranger on the Mac came forward just as the ve- hicle disappeared intc: the drif t. \" We '1 see if lie looks worth it firat, \" lie remarked calnily; but five minutes later, wlien the vehicle reappeared on the near bauk of the river, 11e gave a whistle of astonieliment. \"A woman, by Jove! Who can it bel?\" The stranger alighted 8tiffly from the cart; but even the duet aud the weariness of the jouruey could net disguise the fact that she was an Eng- lieli lady; whilst Martin, wlie went forward shyly to meet lier, noted that she was aiso young. \"You are Mr. Martin?\" she asked hurriedly. \"I was told to sec yen, and have corne te fetcli iy littie boy. \" Miss Hales wipi a very sad story, had to get a separ baud, sud, in rei witli the child. heard lie liad beei aud followed him get ne furtlier i saw an account of dlore, whieli Mr. Si te one of the Cape papers. . Tliey are going away by the cart.\"$ Hlartigan got up rather tinstea \"I amn sorry,\" 11e said. \"Thank Miss Hales. You needn't ie anything about me,\" and lie tui towards the door; but, apparent13 ing on a sudden impulse, she c hîm back. \"Mr. Hartigan, your promise]1 good, at lest till Theodore lias gc The man fiushed, then laugh littie uneasily. \"Very welI, 1 keep it, Miss Hales\" The whole towu went dowu ti Thatclied House to sec Three Sta part, and, to their own surprise, more stili1 to that of his mother, of them kissed him. Miss Hale. intended te part from him at the pital, but in the end, she too, ac panied him to the liotel, whert stood ou the step beside Hartigas tii the cart fiuaily disappeared the rise; then she turued te go te tlie lospital. Hartigan hlesita moment, glanced towards the door of the bar, but finally a after lier. \"We shail miss the littie beg, lie said at last. \"He made a 1 difference to me.\" \"You must not let it make tee, difference, Mr. Hartigan. Prg me you won't. \" Tliere waa aI in lier voice, thougli she streve te keep it steady. Hartigan liad been staring str ahead, but uow lie faeed round a was very lier eyes. \" It is \"I shot: .r. Hartigan. Slie te you,\" tion from lier bus- She Io( r i stu» com( ;ce youl\"' that help?' [0W. ,d kee-, any Di",
         "-e\u003e \u003c o e",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "THE CUR AND THE COYOTE BY EDWARD PEPLE AUTHOR 0F \"THE PRINCE CHAF.\"* \"THE MALLET'S MASTERPIECE,\"1 ETC. H E, was a dog, and tbey called himi Joe. Hie hand ne god- father, but was iamied after Chip Moeb 1w u rich relative whom the brute res\u003ceimhled PhysicalY-and it wasi 't a compliment eitbier, .Jee's ancestry was a miatter to pass over pelitely* and forget. 11e was a large animai, with the uimistakabie build if the wolf-beund, yet his blood was xnixed with many\u003e another hardy breed. lis hair, ef a dirty Yellowlsh browxi, grew in ever\u003e' possible way, except that designed by a beaut\u003e'- loving Creator, whule bis uxidershet jaw hinted at the possibility of a bull- terrier~ figulring as ce-respondexit in some leng-fergotten scandai. There- fore, Joe bad little claim te beaut\u003e'; but, rather, as Frisco Jim expressed it, \"'was the dernedes' erxi'ries'-look. i' beas' wes' of the Mississip.\" Chip 'Meseby thought of his ricli relative, and smiied. Thc criticismn, haral but just, fitted the deg in. all respects with the ene exception ef his oyes. There speke the Scotch cel. lie breed. The\u003e' were beautiful, pathetie, dreamy, yet marred-frem a poetical standpint-by a dash of impishness foud oxily in that cord- iil\u003e' despleed, but weirdly intelligent race of canine eutcasts--the cur-deg. lI the beginnixig Chip -Moseby found hlm on the prairie. How lie bad ever wandered into the centre of this trackless plain was indeed a mys- tery; but there be was, and cenunand- ed pit\u003e', even from, a eow-puncber. 4--3P Lost and fil.sre [al ished( for- wvant of food kird water, he walted duxtnbly for the treblack buzzards that wheeled in hizy circles aboýv bis head. Chip dlismlounltedl and -urvyed biis find in wonder, strivixig te dJecide whe_ ther to take the cuir iinto camp or puit himi out of miisery for onice and al] by al mierciful ehot. Wisdom called aloud for the 8hot, but something-a half remnembered somnethiiig deep down lin the inside of the man-whis- pered and made hlmi hesitate. No, hie could not decide; but, being a gambler by birthi, taste, and educa- tien, ie shifted the burden of re- spoxisibility te the back of Chance. The proceas was simple. Hie reaelhed for the heavy guxi whidh lay upon his hip, and poised a silver dollar be- tween the thuimb and fixiger of bis ether band. \"Now, slraniger,\" he obscrved cheerfully, \"yeu're gemn' te bie the stakes of a show-down. Heads, you go te camp. Tails, yeu go to biell. You couldu 't ask fer axiything fair- er 'n that, could youi?\" Hie 8pun the coin and cauglit it i bis open band. The deg eocked bis cars, and the Texan cocked bis fort'- four. Tala la\u003e' uppermost. \"Yo' luck ain 't changed much, puppy,\" sighed the maxi, sbifting bis position for a cleaner ehot at the back of the sick dog's head. \"Yoii've been elected this time, sure, an'-\" Chip paused suddenly, wendering why, but pausing. fis victim whin-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE ed faintly, raised a pair of gentie, fever-touched collie eyes, and waited. The cow-puncher eased the haxumer of hîs gun and suld the weapon into its holster. \" Demn the dawg!1\" lie inuttered be- neath hiebreath. \"It 's jus' lîke some Pc' li'l' heiplees, moon-eyed gai what is--what 's callin' me a sneak!\" Clip Moseby did not know he was niuttering sentiment; but, alone on a wide green prairie with lis pony and a dcg, wherc noue of his fellow rang- era could see and laugli at him-well, it made no difference, anyway. Frem hie saddle-tail he unticd his water- fiask, pouring its contents into bis 'wide feit hat; then le added a bit of liquid from another and more prce- lous flask, and made an offcring to a new-found fricnd. The dog lapped it eagcrly, and, after a time, sat up on his haunches, to devour the last crumb and fibre cf Clip 'e last ration cf corn bread and bacon, while the cow-man looked on and curscd him- horribly-but with a smile. Slipping, sliding, in the dip of hie master's saddle, yet 'wagging a mangy tail to show that he understood, Joe was chrietened and rode twenty miles te camp. It was just an ordinary camp cf twenty cow-mcn in charge cf cigîteen hundred long-homes \"on the graze. \" An idie existenace at this season, nioving as the big \"bunch\" listed, and dealing greasy carda at al times save wlcn in the saddle or snoring beneath the cold white stars. Thc cew-xnen lived, drank bad whis- key, gambled, and died-semetimes from delirium tremiens or snake-bite;, at other tumes from purely natural causes, sudh as being tramplcd by a steer. A remuant they were cf a long- departed hero type, stiil picturesque, yet lacking i certain vital attributes -mainly morality and a bath. The camp accepted Joc for two mca- sons: firstly, because thcy did net came one way or tIe other; secondly, be- cause Clip Moseby lad, on varions occasions, thrashed thrcc cf the q men in brutal, barc-knuckled figh and the rest lad seen him dc Therefore, nineteen more or less -ý able criticisma were pclitely v held. For four sweet days Joe ate, dr and slumbered, recovcring loti body and in nerve; tIen le rosE and began te take notice. The thing he neticed was a lean-fian powerful deg that lad dwelt in c for the space cf seven menthe and at home. The \"lomer's\" naine Tonque. He belenged te a gentle known familiarly as Greaser Sai gentleman wlose breeds were as b, mixcd as- Joe 's--a fact te which pi ed reference was made by j( friends witl frequeney and impu, Tonque was the onlY memibe camp whe openly resented Jfe'u vent. lHc first made pantomimie ( turcs, tIen displayed a epleenish appointment, at thic strangcr's ge: and disposition. Hie builied the dog shamefully, teck away the jui boues, nippcd him in hie tend, spots, aud cursed him in Me, dog-languagc, a thing ceuceded bh linguiste te be-with the exceptie coyote talk-tle vileet of obs vituperatien. Joe bore in silene4 many days. Hie wae a guet of Moseby, virtually a tenderfoet, uncertain cf the etiquette requirE lis delicate position. The master ne orders, and what was a dog to Truc, a bite or two was nothing u~ but an insult sinks f ar deeper thi tootl, nnd wlen the cattle-camp slumberingr threugh the nigît, dcg heart ached aud troubled It is a hopeless sert cf thing te s a bulllying for the sake cf etiqu but somcwlerc tîrough the mcug many breeds rau thc blood of a tleman dog; so Joc gave up his 1 and teck hie bites withcut a ~Roi",
         "THE CUR AND THIE COYOTE quired Chip Moseby, puffing at his eorn-cob leisurely. \"Fi' dollar!\" chirped the Mexican cook, his little rat eyes twlukling. \"Make it ten,\" said Clip, with a carelesa shrug, 'an' Je ' chase that rabbit's whelP of yo'r'n plumb off'x the range. Greaser Sam Iaughied joyfully and produced a montl 's pay iii silver and dirty notes. Yank Collîine wus mxade stakechelder, while Chip, stone deaf to, the warnings of certain uxiibelievers, knocked the dottle from lis pipe and wbistled te lis dog. Joe came over- for protection, it seemed-and laid a trembling chi on the master's knee. '\u003cJoe, oie ma, \" asked Clip, in the toue, of a niother's tender solicitude, 'lis that there Mexican skunk a pes- tein' of yen?\" ' The dog, of course, said nothng- tiiat le, verbally-but his two great glorious eyes spoke volumes. 1x, them the master read this carneat, but re. spectful pica: \"Mr. Moseby, sir, if you will ouly Say the word and allow mie te chvew np that bow-legged son of a exie-eyed pariah, l 'Il love you tili the crack oif doomi\"e The master, who was a gentlemnan fighter bimself, sînuled grimly, strok.. dà the. ugly head, axid waved hie pipe- stein j the general direction of the bumnptioxis Toxique. \"Ail right, son, go eat hlm up!\" Tt may here bo stated that onie of J90'. gra.ndeet qualities lay lu strict obodiexice; or, failing in the letter of command, he did bis best. The. incident occurred just after dinner, when the eow-punchers, re- piste with coffee and fried bacon, were enjoyixig a quiet smoke. Tbey ros te, a maxi, forxied a whooping ring about the contestants for camp petgand wagered on the outcome. Tebattie, minus revolting- details, was 500lI over and ail bots paid, for briefly-Joe did hie best. OuIy an aiugel or a ring-seasoned bull-terrier oouId have done more. Greaser Sain lost twenty dollars. Cbip Moseby won nixicty. Tonque, thc bully, yelpixig in the dimi dlistance, lest al] hie pride, the better portion of eue car, aud quite a depressing quianity of bide and hair. Joe barked once, a hoarse sbout of uxiholyv joy-which wais only humnan, alter all-thexi sat down meodestly, licked his wounds, and conxited uip the ceet of hie victory. Ie, had made one eueniy, anid many friends; but Greaser gain was enly a. eoek, anyway -se sthe tg ef a dozen ragged bites was peace uxuixterable. Later, Sain partially qardthe accourit by pouring a dipper full of boiling grease on Joe 's baek. Trins, by tIe, turne tex inlches of bide curlcd up, peeled off', axd heaied again, the. cur-dog loatled ail breeds of Mlexi- cane, and oue in particular. Aise, Je suffered somewhat in the matter of scraps and boxies;- thon affaira took a turu for the better. Greaser Sain, while revelling lu a noontide siesta, iu- ad(vert(xitly, rolled on a rattcexiake, and, inepite ef a copions snpply of antidote on hand, swelled up absurd- 'y, made noises, and passed eut li Èideous agony. At the unpretention\u003c funeral Joe controlled his features admnirably, wlth thie one exception of hie tail, which would wag iteif iu spite of every gentlemianly instinct. This was wreng, o! course, but a dog's ideas on the ethice of retribuition are sim- ple anid direct. Je was glad-veny glad. H1e thrasledi peor Tenque again -net frein malice, but merely ini a spirit of exuherance. One o! bis an- cesters bad been au Irish setter, tboughi Joe was unaware of it. And new the waif began te flid bis own. Hei learned the profession of cow-punching, tegether with the arts and observances thereof. He could aid lu a round-up nobly, for hie wolf- hound Iength o! 11mb gave him speed, which mnade evexi the. tough littie bronches envions. At branding-time he eould dive inte the bord and l'eut",
         "THE CANAT\u003eIAN MAGAZINE out\", any caif desired, then liold the evil-minded mother en tête-à-tête till the irons did their work. This saved the cow-men mucli exertion, but was liard on tlie cattie, and harder stili, as it proved, on Joe. His deeds were praised just a frac- tion too bighly, so the cur-dog lost bis head, puffed Up with pride, and grew \"sassy' '-an elusive state to\u003e whieh even humans are subject. It was borne in upon Joe that lie owned the camp, tlie bucking bronchos, tlie gra7ing long-liorns, and, yea, even the prairie itaeif for a most expansive sweep, and îf e seemed good to him. Say, Clip,\" remarked Frisco Jim, witli befitting solexnnity, \"thet there dawg o' yo'u 'ru is gîttin' jes' too cocky fer to live a minute, lie don't need nothin' but a straw bat, Vn a tootlipiek sboved iii bis face, to, put me in mini' o' thet li'l' Englisb mav- erick wbat berded with us las' Au- gus'. You reck'lect 'im, Chîp-one eye-glass '' a hired man fer to tote his shotgun!\" Few eow-men, howevcr, are trou- bled becanse of a cur-dog's vanity; therefore, tbey submitted to lis pat- ronizing familiarity and rebuked hum not. Tley loved bim for bis grit, bis speed, bis'braîns. Tliey flattered bim and spoiled him, sbarîng, on common ternis, their board and bed-especial- ly the bed eomposed of a roiled-up blanket witl Joe on the outside. 0f course, there were fleas-bhundreds of fleas--but a hero of the plains soon learns to overlook the littie things of life; besides, it was good to feel a warm dog in the smail of a f eilow 's back wlien the wind was nippy and from. the north. Thus Joe waxed fat and prospered in bis pride. It is strange liow a monigrel's breeds wiIl erop ont singly, and, for the time being, dominate ail Cther traits; yet tbis vas tbe case with Joe. 1In a figlit of any kind bis bull-Inisb came to the fore wýith a rush, the un- deraliot jaw flguring as a conspicous racial mark. The wýolf-honind straun developed solely wlen lie cauight a lean, lealtby jack-rabbit in a str, away race, brougît hima into , and ate hi before the eyes of e mirng crowd. Ris keen, pa sensitiveness was no dloubt imb frora the collie stock; but of that is more to follow. At present Joe's cur-dog i gence and sense of humour lay cs most, leading him to thje perfori of tricks. These lie could do w: number, fetching, carrying, or ing on his lind-legs to, beg for and applause. Hie could imit bucking broncho or a pawing Also, he said lis prayers in the ner of certain far-distant Chri -a feat, by the bye, which inc his associates liad achicved in Hie named thc values and poker by barks, and, flnally, could nu deck of evil-smelling cards, sel therefrom any named ace or spot, an accomplshment whici voiced abroad and thrilled the Southwest with wonder and d la it, then, to be marveiled a a earelessly born cur-dog, alon surf eited with adulation, i weaken and lose bis grip on mo, Joe lost it, but not irrecoverabi about this time lie met bis -Wa and a mangy Napoleon re8ted space on the isle of mortiflcati A liglit frost féil, and with il the coyotes. Joe bad neyer e coyote, and bis interest was \u0026~ -Irish interest, mixed with 'W superiority. A lazy wbite moou over the horizon, quencliing the flre's glow and flooding the plai a ghostly glory. Prom far \u0026Y the east came a melancholy ya and Joe rose up and listened. denly, from nowlere, appeari firet coyvote-a splendid, stri specimen, witl yeilow black and a flaunting, featbered tail took a clump of sage-bruali bound, lit on his launches, p bis noue toward the skys hig and loosed one long, ghouhiili i",
         "THE CUR AND THE COYOTE As lias benI 8sa41, thw dog- was itr ested. Thlere Was somet1hýIlg more. Ile was striekendmbprlz - by this cool effrontery. Jiere -was an arrogant stranigcr. sîiing-wîthont thle eoreyof inivitation-upon Joe 's owuririe disturbing1l the peace in ahaýtfulj, aillen tongue. The serene chj(ek of it I A devil-lipped piteli- imp! yap)ping at Joe's moon! A pair of patilhetie cole eyes swep0t iîlowly round the circle of recumbent cOW-mlefl, restinig at last upon the mas- ter, and seeming-ifl camp vernueular -tAo inquire, as plain as words: \"~Fer jeroosy 's sake, Mr. Moseby, what is A. camp humiiourist kindly supplied, thie information. TFhat there le a hell-warbler. Sick hlm, Joe!\" Joe took the suggestion without parley. A noiseless brown streak made out toward the serenader, but Mýr. Coyote saw it coming. Rie ended bis song wlith a erisp crescendo and departed in an easy, shambling lope. The dog was tou mucli occupied wo hear the coarse ripple of amusement followving bis exit, or to see the mais- ter stir a sîceper with bis foot and remnark, 'witb a widening grin: ,,Come, git up, Tony, 'n' see the spote. MUy dawg's a linkin' it after a ki-yote. \" A more perfect stage could not have been \u0026esired; the mon for footligbts, Tonque and nÎneteen other eow-men as the audience, a coyote for eomed- ian, and Joe, of course, the star. The cbasýe went south. for baif a mile, don- bled itself, and passed the camp again, the mnanoeuvre being repeated six sep- arate times, apparently for the bene- fit of those who watched. It was a close race, too, or seemed to be, for ,oldom was the cur's black muzzle more than a. yard or so behind bis victim's fiaunting tail. Neyer before had the wolf-bound, breed eropped ont so strongly. Joe rs.n low; bis muscles ached and humn- e'd bis eyes protruded, and he whimn- 'Dered in desire; yet, strive as he would, h(o failed to reduce file load, wiîle the beast iii front reeled on.- ward with a shblinIIig lope. Tliink of it!1 A lopel But now Soe gaiued. Ile moaned aloud wit1 joy. lis blood was Up, and lie wenti for lis eneily ili ruy heart-breakiîîg Ieaps. Th1rce timeis Ili, snapedad bi]t nlotingil buit bis ownl dry tonguo; then sominetlil1g happeni- ed. The coyote, tiriig of' the gamue, took bis foot in his halid, so to speak, and faded a-way as a woodecek leaves a weasel. Joe sat down and thougfit abiout it. Nothing short of a pistol-ball could travel like that littie black dlot on theo far horizon. There was someuthing wrong about the whiole affair, buit just what the cur-dog could not figure out, PossiblY the cow-men miglit enligliten hilm sud offer sympathy; so, withi this false hope at heairt, he \\vent back slow- ly, bis hot breath coming in labonred1 gaspa, bis stuimp tail sagging sadly, lus receptîin, however, was very dif- feront £rom the one so fondly hoped. Instead of pats sud a courteous ex- planation, they greeted himi with a roar of vulgar laughiter-a taunit which stung hlm to the very quick. That dogs are sensitive to ridicule is a faet too patent to admit of argu- ment; but coles, perbaps, are the most humanly sensitive of ail. And this la where Joe 's cole breed crop- ped out to stay. 11e was stunned at first. Hie couldn't takeý it in; but wben the taunts eontinued, the dog's already heated blood began te boll. lie was flghting for bis last tomn shred of pride-and pride dies bard. Hie eroncbed beside the camp-flre, bis rougli bair bristling down bis spine, bis ugly nose distorted by an uglier wrinkle still. And wben at last Sprîg Flannigan-the humourist, by the way, wbo bad sicked Jee on- laughed louder than tbe rest, and and pointed a derisive finger at the hero fallen low, tben the cur saw red and forgot to be a gentleman. At hast a rawhide boot is a rather tougb proposition, but Joe bit through",
         "THE (IANADIAN MAGAZINE it, through the trousers beneath, through fleili and sine-w, til bie strong teeth met. 'With a beilow of rage and pain, the limouriat wrenched away and reached for bis big blue gun. Hie was a quick man, but Chip MosebY was a fraction quicker. fias hand flew out and dîsturbed the pot-shot aim, wbule the builet went whining out across the prairie, impairing the market value of an innocent long- horn. \"Drop it!\" commanded Clip, th4n added, by way of pacifying argu- ment: \" Ef you had made a sereamn ais of yo'se'f like Joe lad, an' we'd 'a' latighed at yiou, buru m~e ef you wouldn't want te eut our tl'\u003eats!\" This was logic, but Sprig, lu bis misery, failed te see it. He, tee, was Irish. His fingers tingl ed on bis smnok- ing gun, while lie urged his deatb- dlaim with a quiverlng chun. \"Th' murtheriu' divil's whelp! HIe's ebawed a place enter me laig 1\" Chip Moseby retorted promptly and beartlessly. \"Well, charge the so' place up te profit 'n' loss, 'xx' run 'n' tell yer memmer. Now shet up, or l'Il bloedy yer demn nose.\" This, also, -was logic; besidles, Sprig's noue had been bloddîed once before, and memory llngered. There- fore, lie dropped the discussion ln a Christian spirit, tîed up bis leg wltb a wbiskey-soaked rag, and strove te forget the incident. So mucli for the man's wound. The dog lad received a deeper one-larg- er and more pltiless. A bull 's-eye had been made of bis vanity, aud only death or the coyote's blood eould soothe the pain away. Next morning le tried te persuade himseif that it ail bad beau a dream; but Sprig Flannigan limped, and a dog's leart doasn't ache se flercely because of dreams. The day dragged on and on, 'but reacbad a close at st. A purple twilight came sneaking over the west, deeper, darkar, till the lazy înocn arose, and again the camp paled-a lonely, flickering bloteb a 'vast white sea. And silence fe God 's silence, whieh. a whisper ii like a curse on a woman 's lips. From out the east a whisper le2 -a faînt yapl yapI that rose sank again. Joe heard it, and sti to give no sign, but his hair v,\u003c riss, and liii lips roiled back from yellow fangs. Silence again, r holy than before; then a ghost-b leaped the sage-bruili, squatted profaned the niglit -with a shatte drivelling howl. \"Hi, Joe!\" said a merry-hea gentleman, \"there 's yer frien' a ing of you. Run along, son, 'n' wlth hlm. \" 'This sally was reeeived with a al of mîrth, and the dog arose and w net toward the cause of bis degr tion, but deep into the silent cs herd, where his soul-if dogs sonls--was empty of ail save and shame alone. The niglits which foilowed weni Joe, a living death. Witb fal punctuality the heil-warbler in the sage-bruali and began bis ha ing serenade. Hie jeered at joe, drove hlm to the verge of hy phobia. Hie ealled the dog by iii ubearable, and dared him to a P-1 Joe did try it once, just to prove paradox to bis canine mind. Ti after lie resorted to strategy, and for Mr. Coyote, but without av\u003e This seemed to amuse the ow-. vastly, and each sad f allure wi aew delight to them. Somehow, fancied the two words \"humc and \"brutality\" te be yoy and wrought religiously upon fine. Tbey took to tormetg instead of watching bis oldtiuie lour trieks, which now, alasi played no more. He had noher tricks, and even the ace and d spot'seemedl te have lost their\u003e ch",
         "THlE CUR AND THE COYOTE rien the hell-warbler took ta, eal- ing iu the daytime, bringing hlm frlends and famiy with hlm Re wouid gide înto camp and steal smre- thing, then glide away unharmed, pursued by raw profauity and a pis- toi-bail. Joe loathed him, but was a8haimed. No longer lie waited for the. cow-men's nightly jests, but at the sound of the flrst yapI yapl lie wouid rime fram the camp-fire and Bllnk away into the outer darkness, ta tide bis face fram the siglit of man. Joe 's cup of woe 'was fuil-and yet, not quite, for another trouble was to corne upon hlm. Rlm master went awtiy, Chlp 'Moseby had gone in the nîgit -on a hurry-call-while the dog was staling a certain coyote many miles froim camp. 0f course, there mîglit have been a tral, but a lieavy raÎu was falling, which îs bad for trails; and wheu a mani' l the West simply goes away-well-lofe but f oola, or slaeriffs, foilow after. And now was Joe alone indeed. For atime even the coyote was forgotten lu a grief for the one square man wlio had offered pats, low-spoken words, and a sympathetic eye. Shame and bitternes for a (log, are liard ta, bear; but grief for a loved one wlilsked lu- to the Great Unknown Îs a pang un- dreamed by man'. It rends hlm, wliule hils dog heart ulowly breaks, and hie, too, slips away, ta hunt-who knows? -tllb li cks a master's spirit-hand. The Mexiean dog Tonque waslas ing into arrogance of late. Joe tbrashed him soundly, but got no plea.. sure out ot it, thus proving to him- self that his case was bad. Then lie wandered away an tlie prairie alone, and mnade a flnd. It wasn't inucli lu jtsoit-a calfakin tobacco-poucl-but it beionged to Chip Moseby. Joe nosed it one,~ snd hope came trickling back to hlm. And 110w the callie stock cropped out agalu, asmsted by tliat other and mueli maligned canine st-ain-the cur. Joe noted the dis- tant camp, drew an imaginary Uine betweêu it and his ind, and knew that the master 's broncha, had travelled nerth. This was enougli. The ugiy ears lay back, the long limbs stretelied themselves lu a swinging stride. Straîglit as a mhatt toward the pole- star sped a faithful dog, while hlm heart beat higli with a boundiing, hun- gerlng joy. Somiewliere lk tlic north him master waited, and belilnd hlmi lay tlie camp, the jeering caw-men, and a gang of mad coyotes yapping at the stars. Then, suddenly, Jae sto)ped1-so suddenly tliat he slid. For a long, long time he mat xnotionlem upon hlm liaunclies; but at last lie arase, looked nortliward with onc wimtful glance, and then trotted baek ta camnp. Now thîs, lu a linnan, miiglt lie called lieroie courage, or even majes- tic pride. In a cur, it lias nio naine; but a brazen liell-warbler was stili at large-and the cur remembered it. The next time Joe gave Tonque a thrashîng, hie did enjoy lt-to the very marrow; almo, lie ate a square meal, and began ta study the ha-ýbits of coyotes from a scientific stand- point. \"Say, Joc,\" said Frisco Jiini, with his greasy smile, \"why don't von put smre sait on yo' cousln's tail?\" Joc passed the jest and insuit wltli- ont apparent notice, for 10w lie hadl ether fiali ta, fry. To be explicit, lie went ont and lay down amiong the long-horns, hoping the f um es of their smoking bodies miglit dlsguise his scent. If Mr. Coyote clianced ta wan- der careiessiy amang the cattie, as lie did at tîmes, then-perhaps ! But Mr. Coyote laughed, as eue derides a tenderfoat, aud hored a hole ln the wind with hlm shambling lope. This was disappalnting, at lest trom the dog's side of it, but the next eneounter proved ta be of greater in- terest ta ail concerned, and these were many. Joe made a wlde détour, as- saiiltedl the enemy in hlm rear, and",
         "TEE CANADLAN MAGAZINE got hlm pocketed in a bundli of sleep- ing cattle. This was weil. The coy- ote 's only road to, hope lay diroctly across the baeks of several hnndred steers; a perilous path, at best, for the boasts rose up in unexpected places, thus causing the race-track to become lnmpy and uncortain. Tho long-horns are peaceful creatures as a rul; but think, my friiend!1 If you yourself were wakened suddonly from dreama of cuds and Inscious grass by a charging coyote and a whimpering, foaming dog, perhaps you would think from a bovine point of view. At any rate, the cattle mnade progress difficult and uncertain, and once the race was ail but run. A big steer tossed the coyote flfteen or twenty foot, but another one tossod Joe at the saine instant, se honours wore even, se, to speak. And now, indeed, was pandemon- juin loosed upon the night. The tom- ror-stricken cattle, fleeing from they know flot what, surgod backward, bel- lowing; in frenzy rushîng round and round in a swiftly converging circlo, tightening into a sort of whirlpool knot, known technically upon the plains as a \"cattle milI.\" In daylight a \"muRl\" is dreaded. At nîght-well, ask the cow-inon. \"Wake up, boys!\" screamed Don- ver E d, seoking his tethered bronche on the mun. \"Je s millin' the meat fer to ketch bis ki-yote!\" Now, whether or net it was really Joe 's design, is a matter beyond the ken of mnan; but this we know, ore .swoet tranquiility was restored again, the cow-punchers had expended their uttermost supply of plainsmon 's three P 's, which is to, say-powder, per- spiration, and profanity. Yet peace and order did arrive at last, and whon it caine, a little black dot was yap- ping on the far horizon, while Joo sneaked, panting, into cainp, dofeated again, but hopoful. The gods had al- most smiled upon hum, yot with the ,cow-nxon ho wasn't quite s0 popular. Twice More the eur-dog failed- ~failed by a narrow margin-and the days slipped one by one away day was a brooding time for th ories of wrongs and ridicule, a mng time for the loved one wai the north. Bach niglit the took the sage-brush at a flyin and stabbed the stillness. with]1 cous, ghoulish cry. One day Joe lay thinking- Suddenly ho cocked his cars, short stroil on the prairie ani baok satisfled; thon ho waiteè days for chance and a cold, prc wmnd. It came-an icy wh: tearing f om, out the east bronchos backed their tala it; while the men blasphein bult a bigger fire. At twilij stole out besido a elump of sagE scratching tiil ho made a hole. he squattod, his black noso p dead toward the blast, the sevei of bis every breod alort for 1 Again came night, but with Iazy moon. Again came silen\u003c for the moaning of the wii wind and one other wail-a fai yapl that dribbled from out tV A horrid note, a very carica sound, yot Music now to the the waiting dog! 'Nearer it cai nearer stili; no longer an ech, the wind, but a full, deep-t! challenge, mingled with the pî of velvet foot. It camne, a i swish-the shadow of a gho sailing over the sage-brush ini tiful, unsuspicious loap. 'Twas. a perfect Ieap, high, fui, grand; but it had ita di! tagos. In mid air the coyote fate beneath hum, and tried t 'He did turn, partially, and E his back. In an instant Joe o'ver humn. 0f the bliss and sublime bi of that battle in the dark, no: Joe alone will over kncjw. E the glory of it! The feel of flîng enemy boneath his pawý tc'eth. mot flesh and bone, to Io, a rasping cliek! The savage n fooman flghting back at last ijng. toaring-, in a coward 's i",
         "ON CHAMP DE MARS despair! The peace whieh passeth un- clerstandling when the quivering brute hydead 1 Joe closed his eyes and rested. His thiroait-grip was stili upon bis prey, a grip which relaxed not once t 111 the coyote 's body was dragged across the plain, tili it lay beside the camp-fire, bloody, l111,p, and stili. \"esgot 'timiL\" roared a x.onder- ing sentinel, and the camp woke up an(d cheered. TJhey forined a ring about the vie- Wor and applauded him; but lie back- red away and snarled. lie hadn 't ask- cd( applause. He wanted justice-- julstice for a (log. The cow-men looked and marvel- led. A dozen hands reached out to pat the ugly head, for human beasts ean honour courage, even iii a lesser beast; but the cur remembcred many things. The black ilose wrinkled wickedly; the coarse hiair brîstled down his spine; lbare-n cunws( of anger and contcxpt-then tuirned and left thie camp. In vain Ihley whistled af'ter him; ]n vain tbiey shoutod and called his namei. Their voiceq w-ere lost in the ruish. of iey wind, and th (fog- was, gone. Net once dIld Joe, look back. Ilte settled downi inte a tireless, swinging trot -measured, mnonotonous -buit having for its goal a loved one, wait- ing somewherc in the trackless nortli. uis seul was satisfied; bis (log heart beat with the peacefl pridle of onc who, las wiped a stain away. Thiere waq blood upon bis eoat-the blood cf an enemy-and Joe could look lis master in the face. ON CHAMP DE MARS (MONR.u) Bv R. STANLEY WEIR UJNSCATIIED as yet by battie-scars, \"Tramping through sad December's snew, The khaki lads on Champ de Mars Are gîrding for the distant foe. Bach, with a dream, comes marching by; Each all afiamie for England's fight; But 0, prcsaging heart, say why That sound of weeping in the nigkt f The Duke came down one frosty day And passed between the khaki ranks. Full grave bis look We heard him. say: \"Soldiers! the Empire gives yeu thahks. Leng live the King!l Our foes shall learn You stand with him for simple Right; And may God grant you safe return.\" But still that sound aUl tkrough the night! 0, marching fromt the Champ de Mars, Tley cross the seas; tley storin the trench; Flighting bcneath the troubled stars 'Witl Belgians brave, -witl valiant Frendli; Fighting tilt victery austere Shall crush the Great Betrayer's might. But, O, my bcating keart, dost kear A souiui of weeving in the nightI",
         "THE FIRST JEW BY FRANCIS HAFFKINA SNOW THlE noise of shots, the slouting, the oatlis, and sereams had ceas- ed. From the Jewish Quarter in the littie provincial town of Ta- viânssk a reddish tinge tb the sky and a black~ haze of simoke, like a pointing finger, marked the zone of the ravages of the Black Hundred. In a cellar of one of the houses ini the Quarter crouehed a man. It was almost piteh dark in the cellar; onlyv from time to time the surge of the erackling flames froin the windows of the bouse opposite would cast a lurid glow through the small aperture which served the double ends of light and ventilation, anxd iluned in a erimson glare the blank, cold surface o:f the cellar wall. Within the sphere of each refulgence a ghastly face would swim-a pale Jew's face, with large, dilated eyes, an enormous nose hooked down over a thin pendi-line of jetty black moustache and a long masso u mkernpt, curling beard. It was Môisha Ygrshâféchik, the school-teacher. Hie cruhed there like an animal, a hunted thing, pursued by wild mobs of drunken hooligans, who, with bestial howls, chased, fer- reted out, and relentlessly out down every Jew that still remained upon the scene or who had been se unf or- tmiate as to take refuge lu spots too readily accessible bo their pursuers' fury. As the wild hunt raged by the house, the fugitive's stariing eyes, when the red glare dawned, shone with an almost insane emotiexi. Hate there was in thein, and fear, and her- rer, and something else besides. His 348 breath came in short, quick gaaj crouehed there and made no ment, and waÎted-waited un noise liad died away and the tuons tide had turned its course aside, until the long, n stone-paved street was silent, si ly silent, silent as death; unt: the subdued crackllng of the told the story of the pogrôm fanatie rage. Long liad he been thec pogrom had begun at noo now the afternoon was fast de, towards, its end. The glinij blur of light £rom the little v had grown dimmer and dimmel only the intermittent criis\u003en eut the Cimmerian blaakness damp, eold, underground ci whieh the hunted man had tai f uge. Over and over again his fe half-crazed mind reviewed the He bad been sitting at the tai Rachel, his wife; with Rebeci seventeen-year-eld daughter, whom he called his \"Rose of Si in moments of especial affectior Moisai, his young son. They we taking quietly of their ]?assovel kosher-ineat. ou\u002bfate",
         "THE FIRST JEW -wild, horrible sounds-w-ere inter- mingled in a single discordant, terri- fying note. They had rushed to the windows: ail tlic windows of the bouses bordering the narrow, hilly street were packed with startled. Jew- isil faces. Ald, a8 the y' gazed, a strearn of tleeing people, hotly pur- sued by a moctly throng of burly, drutnken ruffians, the vivid blue and red of their torn rub6àshkas splashing out strongly againist the blackxiess of the chosen people's Uipsardaki had burst round the corner at the bottom of the. street and Iled frantically -op the. steep incline, stumbig, falling, sereammng. ln the bouses, as they ran, they took, refuge, and the drunk- eu pack behind separated into groups, and pursued them up the rickety, wqualid stairs, bowling out their fear- fui cries: diBiéi Zhid\u003ciff 1 Biéi Zhidôf if Biéi H4snovo Otrôdiydl Fagdni Zhid! CIuhi.si4 raspiàll CI\u0026rist4 pr6dall Svin- y6tje ùcho! Proklài ZAfd! Bîéi îch pag4,tseif I Biéi ich Néclirisiieil\"j The screamas and shouts that came fromn the iner rooms of the houses were horrifying in the extreme. Soon to the. tumult thi. sound of broken glass was heard; fumnîture, crockery, dlocks crashed through the. broken parle and splintered inito a thousand. bits below. Bnrly ruffians, with hoai!58, triumphant shouts, leaned far out and with enormous, blood- stained knives ripped iip the bernies of the herished perini* and puokoviki; the. stony streot grew white as though cqvred with a sudden, anachronistie fai of snow; the cloud of feathery white flakes swirled mnadly ini the air. Flecing 'from death, pale, haggard, fer4razed men and women Ieaped out the. windows, and lay, groaming, broken, and xnaimed, on the feather- strewn cobbles below. Once a littie e141d, propelled by soine powerf ni, brutal arn', had corne hurtlîng \u002b4hvoxwgh the. wiiidow of the house op- posite, and had fouad instant death below, before it had even had lime te, utter a cry. The Jew shuddered as lic reealled the sof t, duil thud which lie had heard as the amall body had struck the stony street. And then his own d~oor bail heen burst open, and a haif-dozenl vodka- crazed hooligans, their dilated blue eycs blazîng wildly in thieir encriml- soned faces, had made Irruption into bis smali, Iow-.ceiIingcýd roumns. The Jew shuddcred ai\", trembled lerribly as the scelle camie upi again Meore hîs mental gaze, and lie e:overed his paleý face with both. handa, as if the vision were aetually there before hlmii, paint- cd on the black couvas of tle dark- ness. Ilis youing son, who was riear- est to the door, struck down at his vcry feet; his wife and daugliter out- raged, and slain before lis veryeys TIen, fear lending wings to lis quak- ing limbs, Ile lad broken pasi, the drunken ruffians, and, literally cae by fear, lad jumped the wliole length of tle steep staircase, and, burstinig ulirough the half-latehied ccllar..door at the bottom, of the stairs, had rolled down the few stops into the cellar. TIe door had swung back iinediate- ly. The hooligans, thinking he had fled out into tIe street, had not found it worth ther while to pursue hin, but had gone on with their devil's work above. Later, by a supenhuman effort, he had dragged himself, step by Step, up the cellar stairs and soft- ly puished the boit. Then le had tot- tered down again and fallen ini a huddled, heart-broken heap upon the cold damp floor. le was saf e ! NKow the pogrom was over, but still he feared-he hardly knew why-to» emerge from his place of refuge. Finally, however, thought of his wif e and children expiring above gave strength to bis sl\u0026king libb\u0026 Pain- fully ho staggered up the stairs, and, unboiting the door, came out and \u003eWM beddiig, -whieh is the moat \u003ceherisbed posession of *very Jewlah",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE stood for a moment in the front door- way, looking furtively, with 8taring, friglitened eyes, into, the white-strewn street. What lie saw there made hlm shudder and turu hie eyes away. Everywhere aronnd him lie heard the low subdued wailing cry of the ,survivors, huddled, terror-strieken, half-erazed, heart-broken, within the blood-stained rooms. Rie beeame conscious of a strange tlirobbing in hie head. Mechanicaily he put up his hand and drew it away, ýcovered with blood. Then lie remem- bhered. One of the pogrômchikî had htirled a bottie at hlm as lie fled; it had craslied to piece8 against hie skul wÎtli an impact which, at any ordin- ary moment, would have kiiled him. ,outriglit. Then, however, lie lad hardly feit the wound, and had only fied the faster to escape hie doom. Slowly, with great effort, for a strange trembling shook hlm, still, from, head to foot, and hie legs gave way weakly beneati hlm., lie stumbledl up the stairs to hie roome. Hie door and that of hie neiglibour, Solomon Rabin6viteh, gaped wide. Hie shuffled across the threslold and tottered into the living-room, where, Oh, Great Je- lovah, was it only a few short hours before ?-tiey had ail been quietly seated before their Paseover meal, when the low, ominous moanÎng note lad struek upon their ears i Near the over-turned table lay hie vrife-tle wife of lis bosomn, hie f aith- fui, devoted Rachel. Hie saw at a glance that sle was quite dead. Hia daugliter lay where she liad been huri- ed by lier brutal murderers, across lier mother's body. lier face wae a mere red gasli. The boy lay liuddled in a heap in one corner. The flibr was strewn with broken bits of glass and croekery and spiiled food and drink. The whole place was utterly wrecked: furniture broken, windows mere empty eyes, and mirrors empty f rames. The Jew etood there as if turned tn stone. Finally a low, plaintive moan issued fromn hie conipressed lips. Hie knelt at hie daughter'e ahuost unconscious of wlia meehanically began to ehafE liands within hie own. \"My Rose of Sharon!\" again and again, \"my littIi Sharon 1 I But she gave no sigu, an into lier glazed, staring realized with a sudden el she, too, was quite dead. H over to the corner, witha]1 and weakly and laboriously - boy over upon hie back. sliuddering glance lie turnec Slowly lie rose to, hie feet. there a moment, rigid as a atone, looking down at the sient bodies of hie dead. T a horrible cry, lie eovered with hie hands, and, reelli drunken man, lied wildly etairs into the street. Time went by. The Je-W ter had buried ite heaps of doggedly gone on with its sordid 11f e. New familles hi into the houses and flats ma- by violent deatli. Soon th strete resumed, to all exti pearance, theïr normal spE stood the dense rows of squa populated dwellings; the mu tie low-eeilinged stores fil hian gIng strings of saueagei er, or black 'with a motly a of caet-off elothing. Dirty, aged geese squawked weakl gutters as before. Crowda eapped, black-bearded, blaci ed men and slatternly, sIre men, their heads, following Mosaie law, elosely slavein their greasy wigs, movedi i forth like bnsy ants, or cor in gossiping groupe hefore 1 of the bouses; innuxerablft ineredibly dirty (the boys inevitable kodes trailing ri out behind) played, with eph beneath the very foot ofth hy. The population, thon, 8 visible signe of diminution; numerous, freshly-broken m",
         "THE FIRST JEW the little Je-wisb cemetery at the other elnd of the town remained to tell the talle of what had been. une living reminder, however, there was always before Ilhe Quarter's eyes. It %vas Mé)ishia Viirshýiirehik, whose, wbole famnily, wife, dlaugliter, and son, liad heen siain iii bis very presence. lit was whisperedl that he had gone insane as the resit of his experiences A strange luistre in bis hollow eyes, lie sbluiled abouit the Quarter, speaking to no mant, addressed by none, living alone in the chambers whieh had been liii homte. Pe(ople tapped their fore- heads as he( passed by the squalid doors about whieh they congrcgated. \"Q vi0 0 ziûress.l\" tbey muttered, C(onimisera-,tinigly, the more so as they realizedl what their OWii suffering had been. For few had escaped unscath- ed ini the uiiÎversal circle of grief whicli linked( thein all together. But M6lisha Varshâffchik -went by without a word, lookîmg neither to tbe riglit or left; and always, in his strangely lustrons gaze, a question lurked, a problem, wlhich, like the Grecian spouse 's web, was half.-loom- .d each day, only to be undone at niglit;. cuuld neyer attain its solu- tien. One day a former neiglibour, one Jankel, a kusher-butcher, made bold te plucek himn by the aleeve as lie pass- ed isq littie shop. 1 1Why dost thou always give way te tliy grief, man?\" lie asked, wîth rougli kindness, in bis snorting Yid- dish-Russian speech. \"Why doat thu net stop thinking, and take thy sur- row with resignation, like bhe rest of usi W. are Jews; we were boni for suiffering, as the rabbis tell us, for 'wailing and the gnashing of teeth.\"1 Môislia turned his burning gaze up- on hm. diThinking?\" lie repeated strange- ,y, 'IAye, thiat is it!1 Always arn 1 tblnking, thinking-but 1 cannot make up my mind.\" \"lWliat troubles bhee, brotherl\" tbe butcber began, but Mô1isha had already slxulled on. Two Jews stood talking togrether, few days later, in tis saine Jankul 's kosher-shop. 'Did you heur thie ns\"askced one of the other, in the risinig nIasal whine chrceiteof Ie lews iii cvery Iiiini(l \"No, what ai\" \"Misa arhâfeikis cr iyn more!\" \"O hîmmel 1(n erdeý!\" cried 11w, other, raising both lean bands t10 heaven. \"When did it hiappunC\" \"Yesterday niiglit,\" nwee thec first, b)reaking, the two worýds ulp mbit a comnplieated series of tonal varia, with a long crescendo at the end. - J heard it front my wîfe 's sister. She lives in the saine biouse.\" The gist of the above colloquyi\\, b ever, was only haîf the niews. Like wild fire the report soon spreadl about the Quarter thatMihaVrhfci had indeed te ail appearance regain- ed his ressort; but that he bad becomev an apostate, an -Athieist openly de- clared! Some blamed, somne extenul- ated; the rabbis, of couirse, were in the former class. Now the sbuffliugý figure inspired no longer comimisera- tion, but fear. A strange gleain stili shone in his hollow eyes, and a nerv- oue twitehing continually distorted one side of bis pale face. At times lie looked a devil incarnate as lie glar- ed, beneatb bis buishy brows aI thie gathered people gossipîng seemingly care-free and grief -fre. before the house-doors iii the squalid streets. The women called their ebjîdlren to Ihein as lie passed. REad tbey been Christ- lans they would bave made Ill. aign of tbe cross, su baleful was t.he lighI bliat gleamed in M6fisha's brooding eyes. But Môisha passed on witbout a word, and gave no sign that lie had seen. Soon other rumours were brited about bim, of an even more disquiet- ing nature tu anome, particularly the rabbis and those wbose friends and relatives were involved in these re- ports. Il was said that Mô\\1isha bad become a kind of self-appointed apus-",
         "THE CANAPIAN MAGAZINE tie of atheism snd revoit among the youmger men, that lie was exciting tliem, by speeches of passionate elo- quence, against tlie rabbis, against the Tsar, against the Goverument, agaînst the police, against their own people, against everything and everyhody, that his influence was growing witli giant strides. The greatest compliment that May be paid, witli justice, to the police system of Russia is that its policy of secret espionage is supported by an -organization that is well-nigli perfect. In an incredibly short time the Is- prâvnik had received detailed infor- mnation of the underground activities of a fanatic, half-crazed, in the Jew- jali Quarter. Immediately he des- patched a detacbment of mounted Cossaeks to take him prisoner at any ,cost; tliey were prepared, following their instructions, to show no mercy ~sbould there be resistance. It was higli time that these Jews shonld be tauglit a lesson, wlien they presumed to rebel against the powers that bel But report is a winged creature with magie qualities, it la capable of flying in two opposite directions at 'the same time. Even as the soldiers -were on the way, rumours of their progress and intentions had already reached the ears of Môislia and bis friends aud partisans. It was the spark required to set .ablaze tlie combustible elements whieh Môisha had cast into their souls with bis wild eloquence. With frenzied ýeheers they crowded around hlm in the narrow street as lie, standing on a table. haranzued tliem. Excitement eflhiaren, eau versai flame, and liung :words of the long, unkemil reviIed sud fie threw ou pgssionate g( \"We are Jews!\" lie eried ,Y. \"Jews! Jews! Jews! tbis we are slaughtered and for this we pay witli our hea: and the blood of those we 1 dear! They corne into ou into our quiet peaceful lious we sit, we wlio have doue i to any man, and they b: smash and slanghter; tliey cliildren 's tliroats; tliey mis women; they hurl our infanti the windows dowu into t. street below 1 Then tliey set c on fire, and depart, laden di booty, glutted witli blood beast lust.\"1 The people groaned, swa a Single body back and for denseiy erowded street. Cri( and hatred burst from ever\u003e scarcely-healed wounds of t disasteri reopened, and hie within the souls of eaeli. were convulsed by an uncoi burst of emotion. Plats Brests lieaved. Women sc \"Yea, verily, we remain shouted Môislia frantically, his flst furiously at the gros.i titude. \"We, the Jews! down-trodden, the aubia apathetie race! We, the pea humble folk! We remain We bury ail the hope and b: our wretclied lives in the col( and then we corne back to o. rooms, alone, and bow down er to a pitiless, cruel spirit brouglit us nauglit but evil down before the cowardly, ical, lying men, wlio eall ti His priesta.\"- A commotion lu the cent, crowd suddenly interrupted rent of frenzied words. voice cried, \"Hold!I\" It wal alri~.",
         "THE ]?IRST JEW \" lold! \" lie cried again, ini a rasp- ing voice. \"Why heed ye this man's words? lie le an atheist, self-.confess- ed, Ie la insane, Would ye turn from the religion of your fathers? Would ye-\" But Môisha, with a voice of thun- der, burst in upon his feeble protes- tations. Pointing Mas bony finger at the axigry priest, who, shaking off the outstretched lands that sought te chieck hlmii, wvas hotly retorting te the shouts ot protest that rose ail around him, lie vociferated -There, there stands your evil! Theo maxn who preaches peace and con tentmet-wlen? 'Wlen wild beasts iii human terni rush into your quiet homes and kilt your eidren and mis- treat your wives and daugliters be- fore your very eyes!\" ~A wild howl of rage went up from the. awaying crowd, drowning effeet- uadly the thin voice of the rabbi, who egayed te speak again, but wîth a sudden transition, in a voice that sent an electrie current down the apines of the gatlered throng, shaking tlem from head te foot, M6Îsha cried: 110, mny people l If I could say te y. with the voice ot a mighty prophet ýij that lies stamped, i letters of fire, on, my sout! TIen would I convixice ye, once and forever, tluit lite and deatb are nothmng, nothixig, when com- pared witl honour I Honeur! We, the. Jews, et ail nations of the. eartli have none! They burn our boeuses, asnd we say, Spassibo! Tley eut our wlves, and chitdren's tlroats, and 'we 1,ow our heads most humbly in the dust, and niarmur submissively, 'At your pleasure, gospod4l' Tley mis- treat our women-tolk before our very eyes, aid we-we walew upen the bloodY floor, and lick their boots, anid then, wiien they have departed, ait back upen our hauncles, lîlre ignoble jaekals, and meekly wait for theni to ecome, when the humour strikes them, for anotiier frolic in eur homes! Sucli, sudh are the JTews, my brethren, the aeeursed, the banned, the base, the i2mobie, the uuispeakably degraded!\" The erowd trembled, and slrank visibly away froni the burning blat of M6isha's impassioned speech. Hies wild eontempt lashed them like whips; they swayed uneasily baek and forth, with a tow murmiur, tike the sound of the. ses, when heard f roni far away. \" Aye, and suh,\" cried Môýisla, Mie a madman; \"sueh wiil we always be untit we tearu how to resist! Till we, are as bold as lions, wlere w. have been meek as iambe! Tilt we exact, as our Book commnands, au eye for an oye: a tooth for a tooth! Tilt we court death, instead. ef fleeing front it! Tilt we figît as thougl thi. dovit held us by the. throat!1 Titi we staini the ground with rivera of btood, blood, blood 1 \" His frantie, inspired voîce rose te a slriek. Hie waved bis gaunt armas in wild, violent, grotesque gestures. Ris face was that of some otd Hoe- brew seer prophesying the dewnfatt of a race. Suddenly, from, the lower end of the street, a clatter ot horses' hoof s resounded ctearty and distinctly over the cobbled pavement; a metattie clinldng and ctashing ot steet and ac- coutremnent;- a ringing word of cem- mand. Then a detachrmeut of Cos- saeks eantered around tiie cerner, and galloped up the narrew, steep street where the densety massed people stood, swaying baekward and for- ward, ehaken lilce a single quivering leaf beneath the powertut breath of .Mdisla Varshàffchik's frantie elo- quence. lI a moment all was confusion. The targer part ot the, people, totallty for- getting in their fear, the import or Mô('isha's biùrning wevrds, sourried away liko frightened rats before the thunderilg charge et the brutal Cos- saeks, who, with their deadly nagô4- kcas, lashed out rigît and let, maini- ing, blinding, slashing, tramplig un- der foot. The yeunger men, M6isha's chiot adiierents, through very shame, souglit for a moment, as lie witdly laranguedj them, te make a stand;",
         "THIE CANADIAN MAGAZINE but as the Cossacks bore down upon thein, they, too, were terror-strieken and broke and rani. In a moment Môisha, an indeseribable expression of contempt upon bis curling lips, as lie watched his people flee, stood alone, utterly alone. The Cossacks, recognizing their man, came at him full tilt, with wild, brutish shouts, whirling the cruel thongs of the na- gdikas round and round their heads. \"I-I alone!\" he cried, lu a voice that resounded down the whole lcngth of the street, as lie sprang, like a mad- man, at the bridle of tlie foremeat bors, \" I alous! Barehanded 1 The first Jew that lias liad no fe\u0026ar! The first! The first! \" Blows rained down upon his liands and face and eut frein hlm great strips of fleili. l3lood streamed into his eyes. The maddensd horse rsared and plunged, seeking to tlirow off its heavy weight. Other Jossecks gai- loped up and formed a cireJe about him;- tliey rained upon him, as lie Swuixg violsntly back aud forth frein the horse's mouth, a shower of cruel deadly blows. But lie lield thie horse' bridle in a grip of steel, which netb ing could unelasp, aud finaily, sueori ing and blowing, the horse ceased it pluninlg and camne to a fulll hait. Stil the blows rained. M6isha f cit hi strcngth flowing frein him in a stead; stream: the whole scene swamn dizzil before hlm. 'With a supreme effer just as a Cossack eut at hlm with h~ sabre, lie released bis hold on t1t bridle, and blindly staggering foý ward, seized the rider's bootcd le just above the knes hetweu bis stror whiite teeth, and, with the dylng an mal's instinct, bit it te the bone. They had te pry bis teeth apaý witli the edge of their sabres to un( the hld. T1hey withdrew bixu, bloody foam oozing from bis lips, ai: threw hlm brutaily, like a dog, 'flý the middle of the stony street, st: faintly whispering, as bis life ebb\u003c rapidly away: \"Th fistJew! The first Je, The first-\"",
         "j- .Ia",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "JEF CAUSES 0F THE WAR BY THEODORE WEHLE DR OF \" ORIGIN AND MEANING 0F TH-E OL.D TESTAMENT,\" ETC. ;truggle now carried ou be- wex'e also represented. It is eas n leadiug E~uropean nations see how under these conditions 'i bc traced for its ultixuate der, rapine, assiation, and th, nunmber of events, some of teriuination of whole commun arred many centuries ago. were of frequent occurrence, and e most imp~ortant the. cap- thc saine spirit continues to this nistantinople b4T Mohamnmed tiot only amxrng the, T1urks, but inmay be mentioned, where- ail the different races. ;terzi Roman, or Byzantine, When at lengtb. the Turkish as overtbrowu. In a comn- begau to lose its vitality, its pooi short time the. Turks then ministrative inethods led to gex 1 Bulgagia, Servla, Wal- diuintegration and Greece -was bania, Grees., and other first nation toe assert its iudepeud mnade themselves 'nasterm aud te shako off the foreign yol Ikan Penitwula. They b.- 1829. But this event, hy indieî enace to all Europe when that the. Turkish rule was becoi ge iena in 1529, and too weak to keep control of its theyhad eenthoroughly jeots, changed the. wbole internati n th\u0026rsecond attemnpt to aspect of the question. e Au~stran capital, iu 163 Sine the~ reign of Peter the. G cae o bea foridable, ag- it lia. been the determined ain",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE 1854. When Ru.isia threatened Tur- key, the great statea of England and France, aided by the rising littie mon- archy of Sardinia, came to lier aid. They feared that witli the possession of Constantinople, a Russian navy miglit contend for supremacy ini Europe and destroy the so-called bal- ance of power. On the defeat of IRus- sia, she was compelled to aign a treaty depriving lier of th~e riglit Wo have any of her slips of war leave the Black Sea. The next occasion on whic]h the bar- barities of the Turkish mile gave a nr'-4pyt f iw Rritdain iriterference in LJ.VUIMZ.L IU \"A neutrality, by to occupy and of Bosnia and 1 of the war. the other hand, Austria was allowed Wo occupy and to adininister the Pro- vinces of Bosnia and Herzegovina as previously agreed. This action indi- cated a change in the aima and pur- poses of Austria, for heretofore she had endeavoured to preserve Turkist territory intact and to upliold thc power of the Sultan in opposition tc Russia. 'The policy now inaugtsrated of dismembering Turkey and acquir. ing some of its territory for herseli was most dangerous and in its conse quences contributed largely Wo th(A nresent crisis. For when the uaJrt3 mue muie ot tue oiaL ; claimed a constîtutio the two Provinces Herzegovina, still suzerainty in theory, reresentation in the Thi plcedAustria î 1inm wind Q11., M'fA fbp f",
         "CITIEF CAUSES 0F THE WAR d moulded the whole political de- [opmnent of Europe since the xuid- Sof the nineteenth century. Italy di wrested nearly ail lier Italian )vinces from Austria and had be- ne a united kingdom. UTnder the CI of Prussia, Austria had been ex-. Ied f£rom the German Confedera- n, and a uwifled state had arisen der the titie of the German Empire. is having been accolnpli8hed large- through the prowess of the feudal stocraçy of Prussia aud the miii- ýy caste elosely ailied with it, these 'ces retained a commandiug influ- 'e in the new government. While becamne nominaily constitutionalin na, the real power was vested in Emperor and the Federal Coun- coniposed o~f the delegates of the 'editary sovereigils. The represen- ive chamber, the Reichstag, while 'ted by universal suffrage, was not crn the power to pass any law with- ~thieapproval of the upper honse, 1lience ail legisiation waB depend- entirely upon the wil sud the in- ýsts of the ruling dynasties. To ther increase the influence of the Ctonry autocratie powers no ef- t wass spared to foster and stimu- tewar spirit and to fuse it with airations sud ideals of national sut ad expansion., effective generalship they dispayed, astonished even the best informed military circles. With their over- whelming success the last hope of Austria 's obtaining Salonica and co11- trol of the Balkan Peninsula seemed to vanish. But inatead of accepting the resuit and endeavouring to culti- vate friendly relations with theffe powers, she resorted to intrigue and threats to thwart the consummnation of their wvishes. This action by Aus- tria was frustrated to some extent by the mobilization of the Russian army and lier clear intimation that she would not tolerate any interference. Stili Wo avert the danger of a general war, the European powers used dip- lomatie pressure to compel both Ser- via and -Montenegro to relinqulali tbeir dlaims to a harbour on the Adri- atic and to submit to the erection of the independent State of Aibania, which was to bc ruled by a German prince. But niecessarily the whole Serb nationality was aroused sud the frustration of their dearest wishes ranklled in their brests, for they had hoped to acquire and to consolidate the Slav races on the Balkan under their mile. These feelings culminated flnally in the assassination of the Austrian Arcliduke, who was recog- nized as the sinhodiment of the ag- gressive Austrian policy. As soon as it had become apparent that the new Baslkan States would hienceforth be the implacable foes of Austria, Germany sounded the note of alarni. She feit that the T~riple Alliance, consisting of Germany, Ans- tria, and Italy, would now be con- fronted not only by Russia, France, and England, but also by all the Bal- kran States, whose power would be formidable after they should recover froni the strain of the late war. She at once initiated a systeni of arma- monts unequailed iu mnagnitude ini tiie of poace, and introduced s xnet'hod of taxation that was etreme- ly burdensoie and met with mmcli opposition, particularly frein the So- cial Democrats. This part-,, and its",
         "~THE CANAI)IAN MAGAZINE iiberal population. She was f ully prep mbers ini every detail, while her cbief or ,s and ents, France and $ussia, were ai roi. of very backward in introducing e next perfeeting tlieir new armarnent,. 1!. ~ -1101nr hlaw à. prevaieni dis- tinus taxation 1 an advantage ,ninent did net r while a Lib- net wrest th1e iiinnrv vr- ries, P v (Il peac give IEnroi w2tiI VIl",
         "THE TUDOR CUP BY NEIL MUNRO Tudor Cap was sold ýy's in the year 18- im of £'7,000, the fal i,'s hanuner eehoed at all events around who gather rarities. tliree sucli treasures one 110w destined ,hi was understood to Holland, another in ,ction in Paris, and nd, the property of whose anc3estor had humdred and fffty winning a game of mnansion for fear of eneountering Americans and Englisli, wliom lie hated, resenting their intrusion on lii privaey, but couriting their numbers eagerly as £rom bis window lie watcli- ed them coming up the yew avenue. Harris, the Bond Street 'dealer, modestly bent on hiding his owii im- portance lu the commercial -world of art, for the nonce a simple Engliali gentleman with a taste for miniatures, called the next day at the Flouse of Quair whose erenellated tower looked arrogazitly over ancient woods and fields where laxabs were bleâting pite- ously, and men were walking along the furrows scatterinz seed.",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Now this was ucither a Tuesday nor a Thnrsday, and Harris swore softly. He was just on the point of making bis retreat when a footstep sounded on thec gravel of a littie walk that led to a bower upon thue terrace, and turn- ing he found hiniseif face to face with Sir Gilbert Quair. \"The collection is not on view to- day, sir,\" said the baronet, an elderly, thick-sct gentleman wearing a shahby suit cf tweed. Mr. Harris took off bis hat, not to flic wearer of the shabby tweed suit but te the owner of the Tudor Cup. \"I amn most unfortunate,\" lie stan- mered. \" I was inct aware that the collection was only ou view on cer- tain days, and unhappily I must re- tiuru te Englaud this evcning. It happens that I amn somethinig of an n,±.qA1ir ifl miniatures. f ertunate in to it uder glass in a cornor cupboari \"If you had been interested iu o] English silver, Mr. Harris, this piei might have had some attraction, said Sir Gilbert, drenching his fia inig nostrils with a pinch of s'n from a tiriy ivory spoon. \"I i i great judge, inyscif, but my f ath highly prized it.\" The Bond Street dealer with a thu ding heart peered through the gla at the very counterpart of that ta nished goblet which had fetchi £7,O00 in Sotheby's. Uc was wondE inpr if the dry old shabby gentleimA",
         "THE TUJDOR OUP ýars of history crieti from the elti istion; still ini its shelter men sowed its anti their shabby dwellings ustereti, ne way changeti, to look at, ice the Borderlanti was vexecl with irs, and Quair was lord and wartien: it vassal., ne more, save te that grim igneur Commerce, who toek frem erm triple-tithes and chidren in- ,ad of the service of the sword whieh 's ail the olti lords claimeti. A lley ef peace, and niglits 'untreubi- andtihle old belti flghting Quairs their restiug graves, and their )Oers dust at the roots ef English st'ures; surely at eve in the woetis Quair, or riding spirit through the ,sses ef the hilis, a thousand ghosts %nt seeking lest passions, old de- ,lits. lIt was Thursday afternoon. HFirseli 'Pped lu at the door whieh led te the 'ai~r collection, te finti the man in arge of it hati ail the custemary 'one's du11 lequacity. fie dribbled tes andi gusheti details ef f anily ;tory as if lie were a gargoyle wlie dnever got refreshnuent from the rrent pouring tlirougl hlm. Thick- 1, short, ani rasped upen the ehin )ln tee-close sliaving, lie looked the rYfigure of a man te $111 one of the ,PY uits ot mail tha\u003ct flanketi the trnete the gaUlery, and even te shopnan's eye ot Hirseli lie hati ai 8r of truculence that soehekw Md te accord 'with the situation. 'ou do not appear te have many itr ody, \" saiti the picture-dteal- hving looketi -perfuctorilv at III should like, a little later on, te sc Sir Gilbert,\" said the dealer Who hati five thousand pounds in lis poc- ket, anti a Jew's cenvictien that an îipeetinieus Scot coulti neyer resist the tielicious crackle et English notes. \"Ye canna; he's, trem home,\" ex- plained the guide. IIHe's awa' te Bdinburghi for a month.\" A theuglit came there and then te the dealer which matie hlm ttirn pale. Avarice anti cunning were i the elti man 's face; is. shillings plainly meant a lot te hlm;- hi., clothing was in poor accord with the guardianship et treasure. \"'Leok here,\" saiti Hirsh in a cou- fidential whisper. \"If your master is te. be away for a month, there is ne reason why the matter I meant te arrange with hini sheulti not be ar- ranged with yeu anti put a handsome sum et xnoney iu your pocket. 1 have taken a fancy te this silver jug, anti thougli I know Sir Gilbert will flot part with it, 1 thouglit lie miglit at least agree te have it cepieti. It'., a thing that is etten done, Mr-\" \"Meltirum,\" saiti the guide with a proxnising air et equaninnty. \" In two or three weeks I ceulti have my copy madie ln Paris, anti this cup returned te yen lu safety, and no one else except ourselves neeti be a bit the wiser, Mr Meltiruxu\" The guide gave a laugh that was hait a sneer, andi dheeketi it sutidenly with a hanti upon lis meuth \"It's a miaist singular proposition,\" lie re- marketi reflectively \" In the foeur- anid-twenty years I have been show- lu' folk the Quair Collection I havena hearti the like et it. Anti it cemes from a total strangeri\" \"I represent eue et the mest repu- table flrms in London,\" HEiradli hast- eneti te explain, with the simultane- eus production of his business caard. Meltiruin looke t i t witht interest. \"Harris anti Hirseli. I taie it that yen uô re r. Hirsoli ? There w8 a, Mr. Hlarris calling on Sir Gilbert, 1 was tellVt, soe tiays age. \" \"Exactly,\" anwret Hiradli. \"My",
         "364 THE CANADIAN M~AGAZINE partner. Ie. had almost completed protested, and 1 neoitions for thieloau of the cup self agaiu that t for the. purpose I have meutioned. on the veritable But really there seems no~ need for us there. \"Tregas to b. troubling Sir Gilbert. The. eup on i;. \" will b. back before his returu £rom \"lla\u0026u't you 1 Edinburgh and-\" auctioneer, and \"Juil; that!\" said Meldrnm dryly. gramn, with astoi \"And what about uay secmrity' '\"The eup you t\u003e.Iigiited with sueli apparent pli- a year ugo by ability, Hirsch. produeed his Buglish client. I thoul notes which brouglit a very passion of plied Tregastel. greed to Meddrum's eyes. \" Mein GottI \"",
         "THE TUDOR ClIP Harris, \" lie remarked with his irows twitching. \" 1You connois- s are not to be deeeived so es- Ulen-then you know it is a for- !\" cried Harris with amazement. E would not tuse that word for it tly, Mlr. flarris,\" said the bar- with a gesture of distaste. \" A -and a wonderful copy too, by ,,astel of Paris. The truth is 1 the original one sorne months ago london, having first lad this one e. You see my possession of a )r, Cup is notorious, and if it got -t that the Quair Collection was ,, in any way depleted, where .our shullin's corne froni, Mr. ris?\" and le jocosely poked lis c»' in the ribs. Etrris flew back to the inn at Pee- an object of utterable despair. VIein Gotti these Scotch!\" cried eh,' wringing his lands. \"But 1 have my inoney back froni that Irumx man if 1 have to take 1dm eut a tbe part- il-i fa-. \"I could hardly fail to be aware of it\" saîd the baronet. \"You surely didua think a paltry thousand potinds would be security for a genutine cTdor Cup, and a' the world sae keen on thein at Sotlieby 's.\" \"I have been deceived; I must have my money back!\" said Hirseh, and the old man shrugged his sloulders and took snuif. \"Na, na!\" lie said. \"A bargain's aye a bergain, and ye canna get your money baek. The best I can do for ye is to swop theceup ye sent for the one I lent ye. \" \"Look lere, Meidrun-\" Hirsel began and Harris, with surprise, cor- rected hum. \"Not Meldrum,\" he remarked. \"Sir Gilbert Quair. \" \"Ye're botli of ye right, and ye're both of ye wrang,\" said the old man, 'witl a chuekie. \"For twa years back I 've heen guide to xny own collection; It's an only way to keep an eye upon the shiflin's. \" \"You d--d old rogue!\" exclaini- ed the partners simultaneously, and le grinned at theni, -with bis stout old breast across the door-way lilre a clif. For a littie while lie gloated on their fury, then took them 1\u003ey the arme and led them out lix\u003eon thp. ter-",
         "THE STORY 0F THE CHIEF 0F POLICE BY WILLIAM LE QUEUX a 11f e eraimed dispatched on a ce, the t9'wf of inwronis glacés. ,s heiglit, and as iary afternoon 1 Paolo Ferri, the D\u003ef Italian Secret iazagrafl on the SCafé de la Ré- tpr-lavinL, world As Henry iflatherleigh, traveller, I wandered over ent, careless, erratie and ir: ini order to \" pick up \" n myr books, therefore my t as seeret-service agent waa pected. The telegrams 1 iv sent to mv devoted",
         "TUlE STORY 0F THE CHIEF 0F POLICE vîictoria beneath a canopy of roses, whole carniage hidden by the blos- ns, to the spokes of the wheels, camne extremely handsome, dark-haired 'l in a creai gown of the latest ,de with a big hat to match. She s flot throwing flowers, but lield up 7 sunshade ln order to ward off the ýny bunclies of violets flung at lier. lier appearance was the signal for tremendous outhurst of applause, liher carrnage eclipsed ail ottiers in int of taste, while she lierseif was .more beautifï,l than any in that ýw~d of pretty women about us. ,ýs she passed she clianced to catch lit of me and smiled, wliereat I bed my liat. 'Ah!1 Then you know 'La Con- ,4almed Ferri in Engilali, looking me in surprise. \"If she knew that was here, in Nice, she would flot re show herseif like that! She uld fiy by the next train-or prob- ~Y steamer-to America. I ai here wateh lier, and-weIl, I inay as Il be frank witli you, niy friend-\" whispered ln my car, \"to arrest on a charge of murder.\" 'Murder! \" I gasped, staring at ri. \" Why, my dear Ferri, Olga trQw is a great friend of mine! there arnived at the Grand Hotel a Frencliman named Jules Delannoy, from, Nolay, in the Côte d'Or. Ap- parently lie was a frîeind of the f air Russian, for it is known that alie liad cailed and dined with hlm. at has hotel two years ago, and that she had beeii seen dniving wlth hlm. in the Corso. On the morning followlng lis arrivai at the Grand the concierge of the liouse în which she lives came to th\u0026 Questura and made a curious state- ment to me. Hie said that on the pre- vious eveiing, about ciglit o 'dock, ie. was passing np the staircase wlien lie heard the sounds of a violent alterca- tion ln the Countess's flat. He listen- ed and distinetly heard a f emale voîce, uttering reproaches and threats. Fol- lowing that, lie heard a man's loud cry of pain, and then ail became si- lent. Instead of raising an alarm at once lie had desccnded the stairs and watclied for somebody to leave the place. In an hour the Countess lier- self came down, ordered a cab and, carrying only a liandbag, lcft. Un- deeided liow to act, the old feilow, wlio la somewliat lacking in intelli- gence, waited tili the morning before lie informed me of the occurrence. 1l, at once, drove round Wo the place witli two agents of the brigade mobile, and on breaking open the door of the fiat found conccaled in a small box- reom in tlic rear, the body of the Frencliman, Delannoy. Hie lad been stabbed to tlic lcart.'\" \"Did you discover any motive?\" \" Yca. On cxamlning the dead man 's dress-coat, I found that the lin- ing across tlic back lad been s11f with a knife, while there was anotler slit behind thlIft lappel. The vieflim evidently carried something i secret, and liad been killed ini order Wo sec'ure \"Killed by the Coutessina, you al- lege?\" \" Yes. She was the onlyr person there, lier mald Anma haigbeen given leave tgo to hrome atCo- logne on tlie prcvioum day, whils lier brother-I have acrandb al",
         "THE CANAD IAN MAGAZINE -is there ou business. ily person iu the fiat, arson who left il?\" mec here? \" ce, came on to Nice iously. She bas mnade ,on for a long abseuiee, e concierge two days was going to Russia, return Wo Rome again 1 spent nine days iu iquiry bef ore eoming 1 find. reuted the Villa tted. To explain was each of confidence. f rieudý the pi tsuu.luri",
         "THE STORY 0F THECIEF 0F POLICE unanimotis. In the liouse live Liree other f anilies-ail of tliem respectable Italiaxis. There \u003ebackway out of the lieuse, and testion of descending frem tlie w by a ladder lias already been sed as impossible. No. De- upon it tliat your little Rus- riend, wlem. ail the gay world -o-day is clieering, kiiled this Teorge Gi.rdlestone, in order te ither some meney or documents she knew lie carried. Tlie two i tie lining of lis coat are suf- evidence tliat seardli was made anted tinie to think. Wliat lad just told me lad revealed sometliing of wbidli I liad dreauied. The trutli w\u0026s tlat stone, a captain in the Engi- was, like myseif, a inember of ritisl Secret Service. Hie was g, and we belleved lie lad dis- -ed in Nie. It was frein that lie had last been leard of, 3re I had been sent south te at seven, and go over to Monte Carlo to dine and spend tlie evening. Tlien I walked back to tlie Hôtel de France where I stood pondering. Wliat lad poor Girdiestone car- ried concealed in tlie lining of lis dress coat? Wliat eould its nature lave been tlat lie should liave been kiiled for its possession? Poor f ellow t Hie lad been one of my closest aud best friends-a splendid linguist, a smart officer, and a cosmopolitan to the back-bone. Tliat nigît I dined witl tlie fain- eus Chief of Police at tlie Hotel de Paris at Monte Carlo, aud afterwards idled about the roome, lot aud over- crowded as tliey always are in the heiglit of the seasen. \"Wlat do you intend doing re-. garding Olga Ostrow'I\" I asked hlm poimt-blauk, as we descended threugli the moon-lit gardens te the station. \" I lave already doue as I lntend- ed, \" was lis brief reply. \" She la under arrest. \" \"Arrested?\" I gasped, staring at hiUL \"Si, signore. She is detained at the central police buireau lu Nie,~ and I have annlied for lier immediate ex-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE Wo my hioti ,bbled a n~ eigb.t o'c et for Ron to the wl 3un shutte aud disco ree other ,d any kno dy whicli 1 iintess'e a rsons of ti iOrlandin aniother third a w el I pack- banker Fionsa at his office at tlie V: ote to my Vittoria and, representing myseif J lock next au agent of an insurance compan: Le by way iuquired wlietlier lie kuew bis neigi bour the (Jountess. Hie told me tliý lite louse lie was not on visitig ternis wil rs iu the lier, She was a lady wlio kept lie vered the self very mueli to herseif, and tl resideuts, only person in the bouse seh. visité wledge of wus the Signors Orlandini, wif e 1 Lad oceur- the Deputy. partment. That afternoon I called upon t] ie liighest lady in question wlio lived in the if i, the. De- above thie Countess snd, full of spol Floria, a gles, made inquiry regarding h rell-known neiglibour, wlio, I informed lier confidence, was about to insure h inquiries, 11f a for a considerable amount. e the sus- \"Certainly, signore,\" replied t] Tet wliat stout elderly wife of the Deputy. cilling the kuow the. Countess. 811e ie mc .frlend- charming-wealtliy, 1 helieve, fors' iii i Mos- \u003crnly spends the. winter months ig of im- Rome. I became acquainted with b ,cent riot- through my brother, Ruga ilalfingi 3ape froin wlio sometimes cornes to visit me.\" fliat lisd \"lialfinger,\" I repeated. ead man's \"Yes. He livesin Zuich. Do y",
         "THE STORY 0F TEIE CHIEF 0F POLICE leeiphered it I sat staggered armazing truth that had uow revealed. day I hastened to the Bureau e, and ou enteriug Ferri's pri- i.binet, that sombre, green- room of secrets, asked a -that haý would interrogate ntepa in my presence. At firat ixrred, but when I explained lesired te, elear up \u003cme or two nIt points lie at last acceded, ging bis bell, told the police-. vrho eutered to bring the ac- cfore him .alnutes later the Little Cloun- ,saed lu black, very pale and itered betweeu two carabin- she saw me she started, ex- lu F'rench: M'sieur Hatherleigh! You :uow me-you will speak lu \u003eur, 'will you not? I beg of ther, Herr Halfinger, was there.\" \"Yon knew Halilger--el? What was b.is real name?\" \"Isaac Goldberg,\" she replied. \"I have known hum for some years. While we were sitting together Sig- nor Orlaudini entered and wished me farewell, has wif e leaving the room to speak with the servants.\" \"And who la this Goldberg?\" 1 asked, adding: \"You. eau tell Signor Ferri ail that you know.'\" \"I have ascertained only recently that lie la a German secret agent.\" \"And now,\" I said, turuiug to the Chief of Police, \" I think 1 eau ex- plain the mystery. bast October, lu Paris, the Contessina introduced thia man Goldberg-wio, la au unacru- ptilous adventurer-to poor Girdie- atone, who la lu the same service as niyself. Goldberg had ascertaiued Girdlestone 'a intention to visit Romne, and eauI unexpectedly upon the Con- teasina. He came at once and told his uister of the lmpending visit. On the niglit lu question, while the Con- tessina was wishing farewell to them, L at f rom ýon- made -te descei )rire tered nim. mie iy tnere were recrimimations regarc[- learly two ing au affair whieh ¶iad occurred lu Germany, 'wheu suddenly, without him?\" warning, the weman struck him dowu He was with an old Venetian stilette whicli ýe Hote.\" liad liung on the wall lu the hall. duriug- Then, after securing what alie lied lu Romue, desired, she lid the body lu the back left~ f or rooxu where the Coritessiua wonld not see it before lier departure, and re- repea.ted, nioved ail traces of lier crime. After- « Well, 1 wards she quickly sllpped upstairs te wlsli and rejoined lier guest.\" SSiguora \"And wliat actual proof have yeu wus at a of this?\" lniquired the famous offleal, b her bro- lis dark browa narrowing.",
         "372 THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE \"This,\" and I produced a decipher erty, while Ferri of my secret message which stated Via Lombardia that confidential information fromn of Isaac Goldber Berlin had been received by our de- He found the partment to the effect that the secret locked, and on agent, Isaac Goldberg, had, a few covered the gui days ago, sold to the German Intel- her chair, dead ligence Department for twenty thou- chloral. sand marks a copy of the cipher used For some mi by our British Seeret Service, which hunted by Ferri",
         "tograph of the Sinclair Canyon, Banfi-Windermere Route THE HIGIWAY OF THE GREAT DIVIDE",
         "The Canadian Magazine",
         "CURRENT EVENTS BY LINDSAY CRAWFORD A POL EO0N'S dictum that \" Providence figlits on the side of the big battalions \" is truer war to-day than it was a century o. Whether on land or sea the rying fortunes of opposing armies the present campaigil depend to greater extent on numbers of mnen d weiglit of guns than was the case any previous armed contlict. The struction of Admiral Craddock's et by a stronger German unit, and ,subsequent sinking of the enemy's ips by Admirai Sturdee 's vessels of p)erior speed, weight, and guns cves that the day lias gone when val and military commanders eau ord to rely for victory on mere sh and reekiess bravery. Truc, these dierly qualities stiil count in in- ýased morale, but iu modern cam- iguing they must be hamnessed to entifie inethods iu whieh there is -le room for chance or the spec- ýular. This was the hardest lesson SFrenchi had to learu, but the rý- at on Paris, and the early experi- ,es in Alsace-Lorraine brouglit ne to them the importance of the e' methods of warfare. The Britishi ops already had learned the value cover, field trenches, and wire en- iglements iu South Africa, and, ,a much smaller force were able hold their owu against superior rman numbers that advanced to attack recklessly in massed slow progress made against a power- fui enemy strongly entrenclied and rarely exposed to view. So evenly balanced are the opposing forces that progress is measured lu feet instead of yards, and mûles, and it is only through the withdrawal of German troops to the casteru field of opera- tions that the Allies are able to make considerable headway iu Flanders and France. Kitchener, with far-seeing eye, provided against- this deadlock, and when lie hurls, his new army agalust the foc this month or the next, numbers and British doggedness will begin to count. Joffre 's advance through Alsace la the most important feature of the campaigu on the western front. This time the Frenchi have come to stay. They are nearing the Rhiue, and gradually forcing the enemy back on his owu soil. Aithougli strategie con- ditions forbid anythiug lu the nature of a great adhievement there lias been steady progress on the western front. On the casteru front thc situation is mucli the saine as on the west. Nei- ther side seems to be stroug enougli to secure any striking advantage. This applies only to the operations in which German forces arc employed. Further south the Austrians are again lu retreat, with Bukowiua occupied and Transylvania invaded by thc Russians, while Russian troops are advauciug once more across thc plains of Hungary. According to Mr. Hil- aire Belloc, two things are essential' to cither combatant-Cracow or 'War-",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE saw. Craeow blocks the way to Ger- many 'sý ricli industrial gateway in the south-Slcsia. Warsaw, fianked hy the fortresses of Ivangorod and Novo- Georgicvsk, controls the iRussian rail- way communications. Without War- saw flic invasion of Germany could not be carried on suceessfully. The campaigu lias resolved itacîf largely into a struggle by the Germans for Warsaw, and by the Russians for Craco-w. The indecisive character of the operations is due to the fact that the rival plans neutralize ecd other. Each aide lias been within striking distance of its objective, but ecd lia failed so far to achieve its ends. The factors that make for suceas in mod- eru warfare are so nicély balanced that thc battiefront swings on a lie with Cracow and Warsaw as alternate axes. The dcadlock is attributable to the fact that the inferiority in num- bers but greater mobiîity of the Ans- tro-Germanic forces is balanced on the Russian aide by superiority in numbers but inferior mobility. At the time of writing the line of battle, lias swtmg once again in thc direc- tion of Cracow. It may bie traced on the map from a point west of 'War- saw, on the Vistula, along the course of thc Bzura River, up its tributary, the Rawka, thence along a lie drawn between Petrokov and Kielce, aiong the rivers Nida and Dunaiee, tribu- taries on opposite banks of the Upper Vistula, turning east from the Duna- jec to join tic mie of operations across the Carpathians. The last Axustro-Germanic advance dcvcloped across the Dankl Pass, eompellcd the Russians to change their front from due west to duc south. This necessi- ta.ted a tcmporary retirement which tie Austrians dnly chronicled as a Russian reverse. The control of the network of railways enabled the Ger- mans once more to gain a strategie advantagc, but thc Russians swung around from Craeow, f aced due south aud swcpt the Austrians for the sec- ond time acroas the Carpathians. Hav- ing di.posed of ti menace to their fiank, the Russians are advaneing one( more on Craeow, with Austria-Hun gary weakened and disorganized anc too fully occupied by the invasion 0: Bukowina and Transylvania to be 02 mucli service to its ally. Tlie Allies in the east and west ari now co-operating in a simultaneoU strategie plan. 'Within the last monti the Grand Duke Nicholas lias attract ed nine German army corps from th, western war zone. The offenisive 0 the Allies is daily assuming mon formidable proportions, whule that 0 the enemy grows more ineff ective The day is nearing when the Germai defensive in Flanders and Franc, must break down unless' the enemny1 prepared to weaken his front ini PO land. The operations of the Allies 0] sea and land are no longer. isolate( actions, but parts of a co-ordinat' plan for leading the Allies to ulti mate victory. Roumaniia, Italy, and Greece 'na' yet be forced to join the Allies. B kowina and Transylvania have 101 been watched with covetous eyes b Roumnia. The inhabitants of 1e Austrian Provinces are equally de airons of changing their flag. Sl interest muist dictate to Roumnania t necessity of playing lier part if 1 hopes to secure some of the spoils war. Roumania will be guided b Italy i any step she takes, as te are in closest harmony on intrl tional questions. Italy lias WGW11' Austrian pride to the quick bY t occupation of the ehief Albanian Pr Aviona, This gives Italy contou the Adriatic. whieh Aiistria-'FlIiPi regarded as lier own preserve. it s gives Italy virtual control\" of ' Mediterranean and proteets her rican possessions. The day Of Oreater Italy has corne unlelss lac1ka the courage to seize the po tunity. t Austria-Uungary is redu4ceti sad plizht throiwl lier alac",
         "CURRENT EVENTS ible attack upon Denmark-4us- lias been the catspiaw of Prussia. was tlie first, in 1866, to feel, the sure of Prussian ambition. But larck was a wily diplomat, and care lot to humiliate Austria un- Thie Berlin Conference gave ,ria the Protectorate of Bosnia Ierzgoina-a gift that; lias ed tlie undoing of tlie Dual Mon- Y. When Austria annexed these inees in 1908 she went out of lier to lininiiate Russia, and she is paying tlie price of lier stupid Italy lias been wiser in lier ration and lias been careful for years past to effect wliat Bis- *termed. re-insurance po]icies. ~ed, Italy, by lier cultivation of relations witli the Triple En- i, l paving tlie way for tli Z\u0026tion of what Mr. Asquithi caîls uropean partnership. Tlie re- ý Mnade by a famous German ý8a to tlie Berlin correspond- Of Thke imes on the eve of tlie Ils tYpical of Germany 's attitude x~d lier deluded ally. Asked wlat %Ould do if tlie punitive expedition IASt Serbia failed, lie replied: 15at business, in Heaven's name, Of mine if Austria smnaslies lier ,?\" Tlireuglieut the eastern cara- Il the Austrians have been rutli- ý enIfloyed by tlie German gen- staf not so ranch as a barrier atthe invasion of Austrian ter- ý', a a buffer te prevent the Rus- Sfronti occupying tlie saered soil 17ey aiseas paying the penalty 1llinbug, En~ver Pasha, who lias lea4ywrecked his own and his tr 8' 0areer, became tlie teol of erfaswlie worked on lis van- \"ti ye had tlie country ln their 1'liTh AUlied fleets are forcing Psaeof the Dardanelles, and cr .s rry of thie Caucasus lias 'Wthdsaster i a flerce battle the ussanson the snow-clad ý8tl tliensand feet higli. Tur- Salanity over lRgypt lias been brought to a drainatie close by the elevation of tlie country to a Sultan- ate, and the succession of tlie ex- Kliedîve 's unele to, tlie tlirone. This bold move lias clieckmated Turkey 's attempt to fan the fiames of a 11eîy War in Egypt, tlie Soudan, and In- dia. Tlie suicidai policy of the Young Turks lias solved, tlie problem tliat lias so long endangered the peace of Europe. The future of Turkey now depends on tlie clemency of tlie .4ied nations. Tlie Russians already cal Constantinople by its'old name, Czar- grad. Having failed to reacli Calais, Ger- many 's war against Great'Britain lias entered upon a phase so tragically f amiliar in Belgium. The bombard- ment of «unfortified places and tlie massacre of women and chidren, as at Searborougi\u003e Wliitby, and Hartle- pool, lias inaugurated a systemn Of guerilla warf are* wliieli can aehieve no military purpose. Aeroplafte at- tacks may follow before tliese notes mee tlie liglit of day. A large aerial fleet le displaying unusual activity on tlie Belgian coast and great precau- tions are being taken ini England agamest a surprise yisit. Oue of the venerable relies of me- dioevalism, secret diplomnacy, is fast passing away. it is ne longer* com- patible witli the riglits and privileges of a responsible and educated democ- racy. Like many ether anaehrouisms it is perisliug at the bands of its friends. At no perîed in history lias public opinion been so seduleusly moved as djuring the last six mntls. Wide publicity lias been given te aUl the secret negotiations that preceded and led uip to tlie war. We have had the Britishi White Paper, tlie Russian Orange Book, the Belgian Gray Book, the Gerinan White Book, and t'he Frenchi Yellow Boek. The queto is raised wliy, if it is preper to pub- lish these secret documnts 10w, it sliould not have been equally permis- sable te publish themi before the. war It is centended, andi with sone so of resn, that the publicatiOf a\"",
         "THE CANADIAN MAGAZINE these facto before the war miglit have averted the confiict. ..The peoples wlio 110w pay the piper liad practically 110 voice i callig the tune. The con- trol of foreigu policy by the Britishi Parliament, instead of by a secret Cabiet of ýMinisters-iîn some cases by tlie Foreign Miister alone-has been the subjeet of agitation for some turne past i the Britisli Commons. The vigorous enforcement \"of press censorship i Great Bnitain, together with military law, liave combined to raise the whole question in a form whicli will compel attention wlien the war is over. Open diplomacy may have its drawbacks, but i the twen- tietli century there is a good deal to be said i favoiûr of a modification of the m.ethods of the Foreign Office. Up tiil tlie outbreak of war it was a debatable question .among Britisli parties whetlier Bnitain was commit- ted to aid France by sending Britisli troops to figlit on the Èuropean con- tinent. Yet ail tlie time--unknown to Parliament-the Foreign Office liad comxitted the country definitely to the support of its neiglibour. Few wiil question the wisdom of the course adopted, but the policy of secreey by means of whicli the country is kept in the dark i regard to its responsi- bility i the matter is foreign to tlie spirit of the times. Tlie close of the war wiil donbtless witness a revival of the agitation for Parliamentary control, and for more clearly-defined relations between the self -goverig nations of tlie Empire. Wliile the war is progressig f av- ourably for Britai and hier Allies, and tlie cleanig-up process i Af- rica and elsewliere goes on uncheck- ed, publie iterest bas been diverted for~ a turne to the attitude of the Unit- ed States touichig the riglits of neu- frai shippers. Au exeliauge of views between the Britishi anld United Stateý Governments places the latter in very unfavourable ligit; as a natiox which, having ignored the Germa, violation of treaties,, steps in as thi champion of the Gopper Kings whi have been shippin.g contraband o: war tlirougli neutral countries to Ger mally. These are the same Coppe Kings who some time ago shot doWl women and children in a labour dis pute. It, is naturally, to 'be expecte( that, their sympathies go out to thei traffie i copper, and not to the wive and chidren of Britishi and Frenc] soldiers killed to enhance the profit of these soulless magnates. The Bri tiali Government agreed to foi'g seareli i the case of vessels inspeceo hefore leaving port by British Cor~ sular officiais. A modus vivendi ina: be arranged whereby United Statê shipping certified by the America Government may avoid delay or d teution. Sir Edward Grey's stati ment of the case was a digniffe\u0026 Pr( test against the sacrifice of Britis lives througli the shipment of cotrei band to the enemny from a neuitre country thattlirougli its press lias s veliemently voiced its abliorrence c German methods of warf are. Britai cannot forgo lier riglits as a bellige eut, and there is no reason to bêlie' that publie opinion i the IUÎWit States would in this case place the ,1 terial iterests of tlie shippers eO the lîves of the men -who are batt1il i Flanders and France for the C81 of liiglier civilization. HFere agafi tl blame is not entirely on the Arnei- aide. Even sueli an autlionity as I Times (London) admnits that Il' of the awkwardnesses of tlie pree situation would be got rid of if 4?' Foreign Offie would act a little Il\" promptly. and, above all, a lfl n publickl.\"",
         "Zbc ILibrary Zabtc CIIRONICLES OF CANADA !rED BY GEOROGE M. WR0NG AND) ]EL 1. LANGToN. Toronto: 'Glasgow, ýrook and Companjy lihaS remained for'this series of ?'hronicles ta demonstrate com- )Ietely the faet that the history of rada lends itself with peculiar apt- 3 to treatment in the form of irate and distinct narratives. And lLPPosition to theirdistinctiveness ;e Chronieles compose en masse a ,prehensive review of the history of Lada from its dawn down to \"The 1of Sir Wilfrid Laurier\" and 3e Railroad Builders.\" Ail this attest after reading twelve vol- ~S, the first section of the whole 'tY-two to be delivered in three ions to the subscribers. Many his- es of Canada have been pubhshed, ýýW of them good but most of thein Yet iu ail truthfulness it can be that these Chronicles embrace first Canadian history that will end and enjoyed by any great mass the people. At first thouglit it Id4 seem as if the, plan were too ýnIg to be practicable, as if it would rnlPOssible to get a score of writers I'Qw ta the line and not overlap- \"Ilia arnuck into one another 's ter- ry But whether it is due to the 1 ense of the writers or the astute ýt1Y of the editors, we flnd very Psaes that are common to any volumes.~ The first twelve Chron- 'dý8lay the work of eiglit wvrit- an4 they display also the exeel- Jugent that wa-s aroused in ehie of writers~ and the .allot- ment of subjeets.- Aithougli the high standard of tlie writing is approadli- cd with rcmarkable evenness, one could not hope to find another dhap- ter to compare with \"Fit to go For- eign \" in 'William Wood's amazingly intcresting volume entitled \" Ail Afloat. \" Colonel Wood gives us a good account of ail the styles of craft that, have figured in Canadian history from the time wlien Champlain sal- ed from Honfleur to Tadousac, in eigliteen days, down to 1908, when the Prince of Wales (now King George) steamed from land to land lu sixty-seven hours on his return home from. the tcreentenary celebration at Quebee. In: \" Fit to go Foreign\" lie describes the life aboa.rd a \"Bine- nose\" sailing vessel during a voyage from a Nova Seotian port round the Hor. In a series of books that con- tain many lofty passages one does not wish to praise unduly anything lu particular, but, in a word, 'Fit to go Foreigu\" la fit to be placed beside Stevenson and Conrad. We reprint a psragraph: The \"Victoria\" is manned by the lins- bands, fathers, sono, and brothere of the place where ah. was bîlt. Rer owners are the leaders of the littie neiglibour- hood, and lier cargo is home-grown. She carrîes no special carpenter and sailmarc- or, like a Britisher, because a Bluenose has an all-round crew, overy man of which is smart enougli, either wiIth the tools or with the fld and palm and needie for or- din ary work, while some are sure to b. equal to any mpecial job. She, of cour~se, camres two suits of ce.nvas, her new best and older second bout. Each sal lies ire quired more skill than tailors need to mnake a perfect fit in clotlies, beeause there la a constant strain on sanse, exeêding, if",
         "THE CAN-AD IAN MAGAZINE possible, the strains on every' other part. But before sal is matie, lier anchor is hoye short,, that is, the ship is drawn aloug by lier cable tili ler bows are over it. \"Heave anti she cornes!\" \"H1eave and she muet\" \"H 1 ieave anti bust lier!\"1 are grunted from the men straining at the longbars of the capstau, whieh winds the tiglitening cabie in.. \"Click, click, \u0026iiek. ety clickl\" go the pawls, whidh drop every f ew inches inte cavities that, keeping them fromn spliping bacli, prevent the cap- stan frorn turning the wrong way ýwhen the men pause to take breath. \"Break out the mud-hook!\" anti a tremendons combineti effort ensues. Presentiy a sud- tien welcome siack shows that the flukes have broken clear. The anclior is thon love up, catteti, and fishcti. \"'Ail hands mals sail!\" sings out the mate. The wind is nicely on the starboarti quarter, that la, abaf t the beam and for- ward of the steru,' which gives the best chance to every sal. A wind deati aft, blanketlng more than haif the canvas, is cailed a lubbex 's winti A seltiier 's -wind is one wbichi cornes square on the beam, and so makes equally plain sailing out anti badli again. What sail a f ull-riggeti ship can carry! \"All lhants rnakc sail!\" Up go some to leose the sails aioft, while others stay on decc te haiil thc ropes that hoist the sals to the utmost lirait of the canvas. The jîbs anti spanker generaiiy go up at once, because tliey are useful as an aid te steering. The ste.ysails generaily wait. The jibe anti staysails are triangular, the spanker a quatirangular fore-anti-after. Thc square sals matie fast to wide-sprestiing yardis are the ones that tale most liaul- ig. But setting tbe sals by no means cetis the work at them. Trimming is quite as impertant. Evcry tirne there is the slightest shift in thc course or Winti, there cuglit te be al correspontiing shift of trixa se as te catch every breath the sail can liolti. To effect thls with the triangular sails a sheet must be siacketi away or hauieti more in; whie, in the case of the square mails en the yards, a brace must be attendeti to. Our Bluenese mate now thinks le eau get more work front his canvas. Hlm voice rings eut: \"Weatlier crossjack brace\" whi means haulixig the Iowest anti after- meet square sail more to 'windtwarti. \"Wea- ther crossiank bracel \" sings out the time- i,-- whf ns dutv is te rous the watel minor keys that rise 'anti ffal and rise again, like the long-drawn soughing of the wind itseif. \"Eh-heigh-eo-ait Eh- heîgh-ee 1 Eh-hugh! 1\" In cornes the bracee tîli the trini suite the mate, when he eails out, \"Turn the crossjack brace!\"' which means making it f ast on a belaying pin. The other braces f oliow. By the time the top-gailant braces are reacheti oniy two hantis are needeti, as the higher yards are naturaily much lighter than the lowe, ones. . . . Squalls neeti smart handing. Blac1k squalls are noth.ing, even when the. suaif iays over tili the lee. rail 's untier a sluic- ing rush of brolten water. But a reaI13 wicked -white -squall requires iuffing, thal is, bring lier head. so close to the winé that it will strike lier at the acutest angl( possible wlthout iosing its pressure ini th( riglit direction altogether. The officer 01 the wateh keeps one eye to wintiward makes up his mmid what sal he '11 shortel and then yells an order that pierces tbý ,wind like a shot, \" Stand by your roYa halliardsi \" As the squall swoops doW] and the ship heels over te it he ye ls agaiu \" 1Let go your royal hailiards, clew 'on, T1 andi rnke lemi f ast!\" Down corne th' yards, 'with hoarse roaring from~ thc thra5b ing canvas. But then, if no seconds sqP83 is corning, the mate will eut the clewiJll short with a stentorian \"Mastheati thb yards again. \"-on whidh the watdli ls.y 9 to the halliards anti haui-Ahoy.1 Ah*igh Aho--ohl Up plie goes! We hiave mentioned the good judg ment shown in the selection of th writers. \" The Seigneurs of Old Cox ada\" was entrusted to William 13c nett Munro, a Canadian who lias 4iý tinguished himself as a professor () history at Harvard and who is a knowledged te be an authority Oý Frenchi Canadian history. \"The DaW of! Canadian Uistory,\" \"the MJari of St. iMaie,\" and \"Adventurers the Far North \" were giveu te Pe fesr Stephen Leaeeek, who as'e as being a humourist is a serioOliS dent of histox7. Besides \"AilAla we have from olonel _Woed 'T' ?assing of New France\" a.nd \"T Winniug of Canada,\" both of w! couvince the reader of the aiutho close study of the history of his tive Provinee. Quebec, indeC",
         "THE LIBRARY TABLE v'ork of Jean Talon ini Canada. Talon vas a great zealot lu behaif of the arly settiers, but some of his metliods, specially to encourage temperance, iould sliock a few reformers of to- .ay. Mr. Chapais tells us that Talon bIought that \"one of the best means f combatting the inimoderate use of Pirits was the setting up of brew- ries,\"' whieh as well would lielp agri- ulture. Then we have \"The Adven- Lirers of England on Hudson Bay,\" Y Agnes C. Laut, in whidli there is Iail too brief account of a naval attle, in 1697, lu Hudson Bay, be- PVen speeially despatdlied fleets of le -French and the English. The re- -Lut did not add glory to either side, le account crediting to wind and 'ave uud of the disaster coinmon to OtI', fleets. \"The Ulnited Empire 94alists, \" by W. Stewart Wallace, a cliable contributor to Canadian his- »ical literature, is, remarkable for R frank consideration of a subjeet \"It usually îs treated with too much eference. The purpose and place ofr lese early settîcrs- lu Canada it en- ýrtainiugîy told, and the author le It afraid to record that many of 'enI were commnon people and not of le uPro stock from whidh some :em undoubtedly issued. \"Path- aes of flic Plains, \" by Lawrence turpee, librarian of the Carnegie ibayat Ottawa, is a faithful re- )11t of the attempts of a native-born aadian, Pierre Gaultier de la redYe, and his sons to explore 'Wýest and discover a sea beyond Afurther word should bc said )('t\"The Seigneurs of Old Can- laby Prof essor Munro, for it pr8nswithlu the compass of 150 19sthe gist of knowledge that the thrsPent many years lu acquir- e-The~ revelaf ion it gives of the Uglrconditions affecting early t1liit in the Province of Quebec an~ud lutensely luteresting, 1 'esets the volume down feeling atbt few persons who have not ait eould possibly have a proper conception of life iu a portion of Can. ada during a period when the seig- neurial system fiourished. While the Indian figures promin. ently lu many of the Chronicles, sev- eral individual red men provide re- spectively the subjeet for separate volumes. The first of these to appear is \" The War Chief of the Six Na- tions, \" by Louis Aubrey Wood, whidh. is a 1fascixuating biography of Josephi Brant, whose monument stands lu the publie park of Brantford, Ontario, and wliose last days were passed more than a hundred years ago on lis estate near Hamilton. The volumes are judiciously illus- trated, and there are nuinerous maps. Some of the illustrations are full-page in colour, reproductions of palutings by Kreighoff, Huot, Macnaughton, Collier, * Verner, Kane, Romney, Weir, Lawrence, West, Reynolds, and many others froin public and prîvate gal- leries, as well as special drawings, by C. W. Jefferys. THE DEMI-GODS By JAmEs STBPmis. Toronto: The Macmillan Company of Canada. T isl another of Mr. Stephens's Tinimitable novels. To classify if as a novel seems as if restricting if te too narrow a cempass, for there la lu moat of this author's werk a peculiar quality that- is not mere story-telllug. As niay be inferred from the title, the Demi-gods are thrce angels. These angels come to earth, and for a period of several months they beceme the close companiens of two Irish vaga- bonds, Patsy McCann and his daugh- ter Mary. They have a donkey and cart, and they go up and down the country in quest of food, a quest that Patsy follows wvif h \"the skill and per- tinacity of a wolf or vuiture. \" There l5 a delightful description of the ar- rival of the angels one night when the tramps are eating supper lu the warmth of their brazier. But if is fthc kind of book fIat one must read for onesei1f.",
         "THE ÇANADIAN~ MAGAZINE «WHAT CAN I KNOW? Bv G. TRumBULL LADD. New York-, Longmans, Green and Company. M R RMULhere gives us a means of its attairment, and its rela- tions to the practical if e. No person seems te have discovered as yet just what the human md is capable of knowing, excepting, of course, the well-known truism that nothing' ean be said to be true except that f aet in itself, namely, that inothing eau be said te be true. But Dr. Ladd je not quite se restrictive ini hie inquiries as that. Hie volume will be found inter- esting te those even who neyer have studied philosophy or metapiysice.- THE PATROL 0F THE SUN DANCE TRAIL By RéxLru tJONR. Toronto: The Westminster Company. HEEOFORE we have deplored thef llngoff in the quality of this author's work. The lateet movels frex Vhs peu, which at eue tixue was at Ieas ' virile, are commouplace and lacking in inspiration. \"Corporail Cameron\" ie perliaps the worst of the lot, altbough \"The Patrol, \" whieh is a sequel te it, ie net mueli better. They are intended te display heroism, but it ie the kind of hereismn for which the staging is always set hn ad- vance. CHILDREN 0F LOVE By HAROLD MeuRe. London: The Poetry flookshop. T HERE is hn ths little collection, -AfI\u002b itsj Phsuqt,. Lyrav cover and tive of the war, and one that we shall not; classîf y, but quote:- THE REBELLIOUS VINE One'day, the vine That elomb on Godals own house. Ouied III wiil not; groe,\" And, III will not grow,\" And, \"Z will not grow. y So God leaned out bis head, And said: \"dYou need niot.\" Then the vine Fluttered its leaves, and eried to ail thE winds:ionlrat: \"Ohý have I not permi ssionfo Lord?1 And may I not begîn to cesse to gro' But that wise Goa had pondered on th( - vine Before Re made it. And, all the while it laboured not to grow It grewr; it grew; And ail the time God knew. SINGSONGS 0F THE WAR BY MAURICE HEWLETT. London: TI, ?oetry Booksliop. H- ERE is a littie bookiet of wa verse by au author who for thi time at least lias forgotteu hinx$ell Hie writes trippingly, for the averag mnan, and is xnet averse te a pleas511tr or iuild satire: 0, England is an island, The finest ever seen; They say mien eorne to England To learn tho.t grass is green. And Englishmnen are now at 'wary All for ti, they say, That they are free, and other me\"l Must be as free as they. -The added t( rary: S. Tait, and lite Gl asgow the Ho \" The A garth, k",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISER 21 British to the Backbone Bovril is and always has been British. Bovril took its origin in Canada; it is blended and bottled in Canada; and ernploys thousands of Canadian work-people. .Ail the Directors areBritîsh, and, unlike some other beef preparations, it owns no cattie on enemy territorv. Bovril is the migrhty British body-builder. Lt is the only food' whichý has beên proved by independent scientific experiments to possess body--building powers- of from 10 to 20 times the amount taken. [tm-must - be - BOVRIL. 0f ail Stores, etc, at 1-ez. 25c.; 2-oz, 40c.; 4-oz. 70ýc.; 8-oz. $1.30; 16-oz. $ 22,5. Bovril Cordial, large, $1.25; 5-oz. 40e. 16-oz. Johnston's Fluid'Beef (Vimbos), $1,20 \"Made in \"Spreads Canada.\" like Butter\" INGERSOLL cream Cheese T45 ..J Éledfnst of INn.OL Ma.,al~,,0 INGERSOLL ?iDento Cheese ta.t\u003e' IJi11W5t41 jut: tita Green Chile sýý sp,.h Pi thing fol dainty ...dw.eLu. Cheese .~ î.îz - j15c. a.d 2\u0026v. . paak...",
         "CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISEB if the Sphinx could whisper the story of Ancient Egypt's queenh il would tell of the use of Palm and ______ Olive Ojis, 80 that modemn women would appreciate even more the value Of Palmolive Soap. They would realize why ils creamy lather is the moit effective cleanser. The peoples of anc cnt times that the Sphinx knew could obtain Palm and Olive 011* only in the crude, natural state. How they would have reveled in the convenience and luxury of their combinatian in Palmolive Soap Women who have made the acquaintance of Palmolive Soap are enthusiastic followeis of the Palmolive doctrine of soap and water. Because Pahnotive is made from these smre Palm and Olive Oils-Nature's greatest cleans- mng agents. Palmolive Shampoo A Palm and Olive Oil lijluid soap tlhat thorouglily cieages the hair and scalp. It contas no injudous lu-",
         "CANADL4.N MAGAZINE ADVERTISER ineans shortened ie for the candie. Harmful habits of food and drink added ta the natural wear and tear of work and'play, bring about the smre resuit in the bu- mfani body. An ordinary cup of cofice con- tains about 2î- grains oi caffeine, a poisonaus, habit-farrning drug. \"*Both tea and coffee7 ny a prominent p srician. irl digestion and pr une various dis. orders of the nerves, and Iead to arteriosclerosis or hardening of the arterieu, among the iemuits of which are Briglit's dseuse, apoplexy and prernature old ugo.\" There you have it-Prenature OId A.ge for coliee drinkers. Why risk health and coniiort for a i ew cups ai coffee? A stearning cup of POSTUM .-tihe pure food-drink -muade of wbeat and a bit of wholescmne molasses-has a delicious cofic-like liavour, but is free froru calfeine or other inlurious substance. Thousands of formner calice \u003cfrinkers now use POSTUM. \"'There s a Reason \"",
         "80 CÂNADIAN' MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Spasmodit Croup, Asthma, Sore Throat, Coughe, Brouchitie, Colds, Catarrh. retreatirnent,'aoiding drugs. ! he paroxysms of Whooping lie Croup at once. 5 fr Asthma. tiseptic vapor, inspired with hing easy. soothes the sore , ssuring restful nights. nehial complications of Scar- s a valuable aid in the treat- iendation is its 30 years of stal for Descriptive Bookiet Montre New Taste, New Fle for Familiar Dessi Tapioca pudding, custards, gels. -the sauces you make for dessei can be delightfully changed with MAPLEIN You'Il like its delicious flavor in whapped cream, ice creami, candîes. MapIeine, hot water and cane sugar make splendid syrup for hot cakes- casy andvery economical, Grocers sell 'Mapleine. If yours dots not, write Crescent Maufacturing Co. Dept. H., Seattie, Waah. Send 2c. sta-p for Recipe Book. W E N E Blacli-Blues- the best Cloths sold in C This~ ciame in îlong the edge every three yards. Thiý narne ii) dong the edge ever-y three yards.",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER OId Dutch is Sanitary Therefore Safe Sewa re of? Causics and -Acids ?mrticurl on Your CooIçing Utersils AD IN CANADA m A D",
         "32 CAKÂDIÂN MÂGÂZINE ÂDV IBIR Known-the world over as the maLrk which identifies the best of cutlery Look for Et on every blae. JOSEPH RODGERS \u0026 SONS, Limited SHE.FFIELD ---ENGLAND Clark's Pork and Beanit Plain Sauce Chili Sauce Tomato Sat A palatable and nourishlng meal pre- e pared from the htghest grade beanis andC flavoured with delicious sauces. Cooked to perfection anid requiring tO b. warmed for a f ew minutes only, theY provide an ideal summer dish and sSve you the labour and discomfort of pre paration in a hot itchen. The 2's tall size is sufficient: for ai' ordlnary f amily.",
         "CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVEBTISEB 33 Feàmd 'on, Vim Remember the Vitality That Quaker Oats Oaýt8 are or aimais needing spirit and strength-for horse%, flot for placid cows. T~i sNature'sý vim-foed, Here she coneentrates the ver\u003e' essence of energy. ?Iat is why Quaker Oats i se essential to children. To countless grown-ups, toe. It means Y vivacit\u003e', power for work or play' ,t Bhould be Quaker Oats becaus-e these are the choicest grains. We pick just the rich, liest-fed oats for Quaker. Their Rlayer and aroma teake the dish inviting. Theîr fullness th utniost vim-preducing power. Find eut how quickly two big dishes dail\u003e' can miake lanquid people bubble with vitalit\u003e'. The Luscious Form of Vim-Food týc ee buselikallgege huedred nations it is the premier morn- 1- al th pun, strv-e grans iere it is handy to you Every grocer ailth e), treIras 30e has Lt. A simple cal for Quaker Oats 'e nteeflksjs h cream Contains a plece of lmp\u003ere brings Lt to 3you alwa3ys, aan extra il get ree aoeaced by Ulsh pottery. We urge that Lt pays, in a tood like Ee,1hihmke h ds xtra- Regular Package this, ta serve the miost likable ferni. Ym; want i e abu.dancea-want ~Le l e a reae lqlieiOc it caten ofte. The way to insure that .vrfrt il~ the world over, Tliezeprices do nt Le ta serve Lt in this tempting tfol. \u003ct 4 Ke t. In the homes of a appIye In ar West. One servleg wll coeviece yeu.",
         "34 CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTIBEB Read what M, l'am ýthis Mothe RBINSON'S\"r PATE NT 'BARLEY gets the. credit for the. heaIth, of this faniily of eleven... MAGOR soN \u0026 co. Liumited, Cmii. Agenuts, MONTREA L says: «II arn the mother of elevenl C and have brûught them al Robinson*s \"Patent\" Barley, sin, were a fortnigbt old; tbey Wlv fine healthy babies. My baby just seven weeks eld, and ÎIr dly. A friend of mine badi delicatè baby wbich was gri wasting away, and she tried kinds of food, and when 1 sa' recommended ber the 'Patenlt' 1 and it is almnost wonderful how Ut bas improved since taking it. recomnmended it to several PeO I tbink it is a splendid food for and I advise every rnother thal bring up ber baby by hand Robinson's 'Patent' Barley, unequalled.- Mrs. A. C. Goodail, -12 Mount Asb RO, Sydenham lli, London, F-1 c1ioSlaes Thé best surprise i8 always",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 35 'irst, aid to the Inj uredI the skilled surgeon has repaired the broken it remains for the trained nurse to assist Nature torig wasted tissue and buildinj up the body iew ilCe and strength by givingr a ood that con- :he necessary body-building material in digestible As a builder of healthy tissue nothing equals UIredded Wheat rai, elementai food mnade of the whole wheat steam- .shredded and baked in the cleanest, finest, most hygîenic etory in the world. Shredded Wheat is always the same For breakhfast hoat the. Biscuit in theo vom to roatore crispnos thon pour hot milk pver it, addimg a litti. croam. Salt or sw.oten to suit the tante. Botter tixan mushy porridge* for the. chilir days. DeliclouaIy nourishing for any mel itIx 8tewed prunes, ulioed lamas.., balcod apip1.s or fruits of amy Icind. Made only by The Cmnadian Shredded Wh..t Co., Limited",
         "36 CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVEBTIER SE-AL BRAN the longiuig for a Perfect Cup of Fa.cked in one and two pournd tins only. CHASE \u0026 SANBORN ~v I ix ~vJ YOUR dress-naker endorme D\u0026 A ZCorsets, unless prejudice or a arge profit on sonie other brand warps lier Satisfies",
         "CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTIER 37 We Surely Have Great, Breakfasts At Our House floys enthuse about Puffed Wheat and Rice. There's many a food which they enjoy, but these Each grain is like a toasted nt, made thin and crisp and porous. Each is a bubble, blown to airy lightness by millions of steam explosions. E-ach is a confection, yet it is ail food and made-by Professor Anderson's processo-so it Goodies Without 'Cream rbe chief delight in rnany a cereal lies in the cream and sugar. Puffed Wheat and Puffed re goodies when one eats tbem dry. Countiess children-carry theni at play. Served in -ilk-Iike bread or crackers-they are fascinatinig rnorsels. Tbeyý are used in niaking and as garnish for ice cream. Imagine how such tîd-bits taste wben served with cream and sugar or mixed with fruit. \u003eFhese grains served in puffed formn fisure easy, complete digestion. 'Every food granule ýed to pieces. Other mnethods break part of the granules. This method breaks themn ail. In Puffed Wheat and Rice you get flot only the whole grain. You get every element in D digest. When you know what this means, as your doctor does, you will serve these iIX Puffed form every time you cao. Try them aIl. Serve a different one each day. T»he Quakerr0.15 mpany lorouagi Ont ..Mit Saskato, .J",
         "38 CÂADiIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER Beau.ty. at- Sweet Sixteen, Cornes Back When One Clears up the Complexion by the Quick Acting Stuart's -Calcium Wafers. Pimples are an offense to othiers and a crime against yourself. Peo- pie have oniy tolerated you because they considered the condition of your face to be a misfortune against which you have no0 remedy. But 110w that it is universally known that Stuart 's Calcium Wafers will usùally banieli pîmples, blackheads, blotehes, eruptions, and liverspots, your continued negligence wili be eonsidered inexcusable. The person with a pimply face is always unattractive and at a dis- advantage in society. Those ugly disfigpurements set at ýnauglit the effect of the inost perfect features. If your face and figure had the classical ouatiues of a {lreek statue, a mass of pimples would stili destroy your beauty. A clear, fresh skin is absolutely essential to any real beauty. A beautiful complexion is dependent ou a r icli, pure, abundaiit slipply of blood to the skin. Calcium sulphide lias long been recognized as one of the most effective of blood purifiers. Quickly converting all impurities into gaseous forin. that readily escapes from the pores, it purifies the blood ini remarkably short order. Calcium suiphide is the, chief constituent of Stuart 's Calcium Wafers, whieh contain besides, certain mild alteratives that invigorate the blood. You will be delighted at the rapidit-'y with which ail face disorders wiil disappear, once, the blood has been cleansed of its impurities through their use. You have a riglit to beauty and health and happiniess. You have a riglit to the admiration and respect of others. Takçe the step that Wl1 gain you ail of these. Get a 50c box of Stuart's Calciumi -Wafers Of your druggist and win back your birthright. A small sampIe packaIge Mailed free by addressing F. A. Stuart Co., 175 Stuart Bldg., -Marshall, Mich.",
         "CÂÂIÂ AGZEÂVER ISEN3 WHY :i7 D HAA LANOTDOs HY is there a sepa- rate dlean -out door between each sec- tion of the- \"Sovereign,\" instead of only one door, coveringZ al the sections, as in other Hot Water ..Boilers? RE opening one small door at a time, when removing soot s from the bolier sections, adn-uts the smnallest possible cur- )Id air to chili the water'that has been heated for circulation tdiators. These Ilindividual clean-out doors \" are one of r improvemnents of the IlSovereign \" that show how care- Las been designed to promnote fuel economny and increase ng capacity of this standard type of Hot Water Boiler. LRS TA LOR5 - r~Iu LaiJ- RADIATR COMPANY, LIMITED A K~nptrot Wet. alary-P D. -McLaren, Ltd., 622 Ninth Ave. ~rag S. Wst.St.Joh, N B.W.H. Camepbell, 16 Water St. '0 Homer Street. Qub O ue.-Mechanics SUpp yC. cCII Iron Work,.ntla. Ont.-W%. W. Tayor, 17 Sta«nley Ave. Head Office and Foderi.s: Guelph, Canada",
         "40 CANÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTTISB DO YOU KNOW TiIAT THE PRESENT RUSH SETTLERS TO CANADA REPRESENTS A NEW SETTIER EVERY MINUTE 0F OUR WAKINO IIOURS? Have you ever CONSIDERED what makes CANVADA such an ATTRACTIVE FIELD for SETTLEMENT? The Canada of today is a land of Peace and Plenty, a place of Sunshine and Big Crops, a country whose soil spelis WHEAT and out of whose farmns thousands are growing rich. AIready CANADA'S per capita wealth is the greal in the WORLD. FOR FURTHER PARTICUL4RS WRITE TO:- W. D. SCOTT, Superintendent ot Immigration, OTTAWA, CANADA J. OUED SMITH, Asst. Supt. of Emnigration, 11-12 Charing Cross, London, S. W-.118",
         "(JÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTIBEB 42 Air HeaterW 7 ortable Hleater is specially desige for'the 1 Irall months, as st wîl take the chii froto the adl sized room in a short time, and even in cold weather will heat an averaszd on 't It is very convenient for th* bath rooni, Mi or library. .adiator is S plied with seven funt of Heatar ittachrnent piug and cari be attached to any WRITE FOR CATALOGUE ther Electrically Heated Devices for Domestic CO., ILTD. Stop Cheating Yourself It's absurd to ris\u003c the per- manency ,(!or even thé neat- 4'ness) of your records for the sake of the pîti- fui savings you can mnake by using poor car- bon paper. ïMA!RIK CARBON PAPER ftevet' fades. It gives (in black or blue) copies that will Ibe legible for all timie. Its srnooth surface makes all the E letters on a page evenly distinct. It is reU econotoicl because one sheet is good for 100) letters and 20 copies can be nmade at one writîng. Send for FREE Shei of MuiKopg F. S. WEBTEI CO., 303 Comptes St.. BOSTOÏ, DM5S. 9 New York Chicago Philadeiphia Pittsburgh Maeso k mdTVeotrlbo AGER anyone doubt' the concentrated srenth, and lphysical ,zefireshment, in a botle* of PILSENER\"' Lager. when Prof. Gaermer mous book-\"Manual of Hygiene'-states iuart of beer is equal in food value to three ntb pounds of bread, and one ounce of meat ew e foods '-FE'S PILSENER LAGER d to be absolutely pure. y brewed in ýhe O'Keefe way fromn only the finest icest Barley Malt and filtered Water it Îs abso- -and healthftjl, rich in food valu\" andly oday at your dealer'. 1",
         "42 CAKÂDIÂN MÂGÂZIE ADVERTISER 1 1 Instaflld in Victoria HosPital, London, Canada. DENNISTEEL UI. CONSTRUCTION Kitchen Shelving r IS is the modern equipmnent for hopitals, institutions and residences. Made of .high grade steel and fin ished with a superi or enamnel thoroughly baked on. More durable and less bullcy thani wood, absolutely sanitary and of splendid appearance. l3uilt on the unit systemn, sections mnay be added at any timne. Dennisteel is almost invariably the choice when investigated. We would like to know your equipnxent troubles in this line. We're sure we can be of service to you. THE DENr4IS WIRE AND IRON WVORKS CO. LIMITED LONDON CANADA appc and at the present thoro is nothing economical. Ak iyour Gr\u003c Fearman's Star Madeby F. W. Fearman Co.,",
         "CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE~ ÂDVEBTIBEB 48 gays#- Eggs arc elIgs-when yourý hens don'tlay. warm chioken house encourages the hens. SOLDIR ORMake the rooe-and sldes toni-of EihrWIBe Certain- teed More Comfortable With- CEETEE' ROOFING Puire WoeI Guaraateed Unsfriné.ble -The label guarantees it for 15 years--the three biggest inilis lu NDERCLOTHING the roofing industry are behind wornbte Bout people that label. Soldbh Bei Denes. No roofinc \"testa\" can give yoa thal \"Gtect every one against sudden changes in assluranCe. a.nd climate. 'Your dealer can furnlsh Rmen advise pure wool as the best and satest Poofing ln rois anxd shingeae\u003e to be worn nCxt the skin. th eea of n e f te Ge era Roofin g Man f.C o. hast Pure wool is tlFe only material that really la~e iM sliaIi. 'ok o againet sudden changes from cold to heat, L asleIl. or Pm ,e rs, it being a non-conductor; it absorba 3iration rapidly and eveulv and does flot get and4 damp. ,Pconomlical Because Wears Longer IE ail-wool unshrinkable underwear is ýpred from only the very finet Australian eo1 scoured and conibed over and over til everY Particle of foreign matter la taken werY Strand is as clean as it Îs possible to Carefully uianufactured on expensive'and machiery, very différent fromn the or- yleof undearwoer mach' nery-fashionR E D Mtto fit the hunian orm. It ji EeL- etherefore cannot corne unraveiled, everyM A ta together, not sewn as wvith ordinary r A Triumph of the Collar Makers' Art in a. Split Front Collar, 20C or 3 for 60 Thse distinctive style whkch makes the Red Man collar different fromn all othea-s is very niarke in this collar. A joy to thse fastitious dresser. For sale by Canadas best men's stoes. EARL \u0026 WILSON - New York Makers of ?roy's bmst product.",
         "CÂNÂDIAN MUA=AIN ADVEBTI8ER Litd n 0rizii A 'IUM After- Thirty Years' ExperienceI Have Produced An Appliance for Men, Women or Chil- dren That Cures Rupture. 1 S.nd lit On Trial. If you have tried most everything else, corne to me. Where others fail is wýhere I have my greatest success. ,Send attached coupon today and I -will send The above is C. E. Brooks, inventut of the Applianc, who cured hiuselt and who iis now giig Othe\"s the benefit of his experience. I utrd write him today, at MarshallMc you free my illustrated book on Rupture and its cure, showing my Appliance and giving you prices and nanres of many people who have tried it and were cured. It gives instant relief when ail others fail. Rernember, 1 use no salves, no harness, no lies. 1 send on trial to prove what I say is true. -You are the judge and once having seen my illustrated book and read it you will be as enthusiastic as my hundreds of patients whose letters you can also reari. Fi out free coupon belo wand mail today. It's well worth your time whether you try my Appliance or not. F«HE INFORMUATION COUPON Mir. C. E. Brooks, 1810 State St., Maashall, Mich. Piease senti me by mail, in plain wrapper, your ilustrateti book and full informiation about your Appliaince for the cure of rupture. Natue........ ........... ............. Geni Bewai on the MINI MADE IN CANAI ACCOUNT BC MEMORAND and PRICE B09 LOOSE LE4 LEDGERS and BIIb COMPLETE STOI IERNS 0F ADE TO rblished Over H AfWN' IDON'T WEA",
         "CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISEB 45 BABY IS CIJTTING.TEETH USE *siew's Soothing Syrp ENDID RIEGULATOR, IEGETABLE-NOT-NARCOTIC s one. \"tout of :)Us\" matches. date\" to use \" white w illegal to make \"'white phosphorous \" ;, in a, year's time it will bc unlawful hem. e strong for cfficiency for \" Madle in and \" Safety First \" you wiIl use SESQUI\" NON .POISONOUS- MATCHES A TOILET TREASURE Murray \u0026 tanman': FLORIA Wlthou eception the best and most popular Toilet perfwne Made tN h. Bath It i. ooollug and evivng;on the andkevrcigiami for general Toflet nm i la doligbtfol:. alter Shaving àl la \"iply the -very buat thing toune. Ask your Dru«Ms for i Accept no Ssmttte I *1",
         "46 CÂNÂDL\u0026N MÂGÂZIN ÂDVERTISER F ROM the. ever-enduring music of the. opera to the. popular Monla and dances of the. day- not only in qualty, but in infinite variety-the Columbia may truly be termed an exponient of wiiat is best and most representative i the musi- cal lore and literature of every age. Wiien you combine also Columbia. tone-perfec- tion and the. exclusively Columbia control of tone- volume, by means of the tone-control \"leaves,\" you have an instrument of music beyond compare. Asic any one of the \u0026S00 Columbia dealers to demnonstrate the variou.s GranfoncIa models-and remember there is a Columbia to meet everY idea of size and price-from $20. to $650. And every one, whatever its price, is a genuine Columbia in its superior tcrne. ïMPORTANT NOTICE: AiU Columbia Reords can b. played on your dise talklng machine (if any standard make)l.",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISER Vh*t \"Made in Canada\" COSGRAVES Only Chili- xiX X roof Beer PORTER is endorsed by Doctors and Nurses as a tonic, for convalescents and those «whose boidy requires 4 3 buîldmng up. COSGRAVES XXX PORTER is pure and it stays pure. Put up in dark, light-proof botties. j-2 On Sale ait ail Dealers PATrENTS SECR\u003e OR FUE REUINP CDl Office Records. flW 10 OUTAIN A PATENT and WMAT TO \u003cI AJN~ 1\u003e10IV UT vrit List of Inventions Waxited and PIizC es oftere for inventions sent frec. Patents advertised RE athing Edut*CUi NETU BW lIS. Send for our List of Patent Buer. =iCtO i. oEVANS8\u0026 Co.sssr Washmot, DC te You WFAums SAT H R S ffr eun ýentae ant oitive Encioed f^pni chek ro, THIE MASTER UOIS fe~ eun , \" e d.keetry and. \" 'c 'rs a remedy for ill-success. NOT deperident on will, matcafly onCe. Hale worn idne d.f8,t. ~ ti- s popd ayc dy mnipIeas. nor fu1filment of impossble conditions. A#plain common-sense ýhes, diff ti d dant othes for work, explaining.whiy Your Naine is a \" WireIess,\" Teaching ýr0bI, tntfrienda. Itks curet -dMy simply and easily the TRIJE inethod of understanding anda genralycns lung troubles Ini -là handling the good and cvii forces of vibration. 0 Cents. eboo\" hrt tlnt that It aons- eti me anti my frientis. J. BOYLE, 40 Gramecy Parlk, N4ew Yortk *. It ha@ tsught m e . _____________________________ FicienC. orrect moth\"ot et -- .. - brestila and at the »tAd~ 47",
         "48 CÂNÂDIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVEBTISER HELP YOUR, STOMACH Instant Relief from Gas, Indigestion and Pains Quickly Cornes from the'Use of Stuart's Dyspepsia Tablets. FREE SAMPLE PACKAGE TO ALL Feeling ini the stomach is not natural. When you know you have astomacli it îs time to help it. Gas, fermentation, foui breath, etc., indicate this. Accept the warning and act at once. There is no occasion to suifer from indigestion or any simîlar stomacli trouble when you can so easily get Stuart 's Dyspepsia Tablets. There is scarcely a well-stocked drug, or general store in Canada or the Ujnited States but what considers these tablets part of their staple stock. Do not suifer in silence. Try Stuart 's Dyspepsia Tablets and do so quiekly so that you may becomne your old self as soon as possible. The reasons why Stuart's Dyspepsia Tablets are such a widely used remedy are very easy to understand. These tablets contain almost the same elements as the gastrie juices of the stomach. And when your stomach is sick and not workig just riglit, it does not give out enough of the natural digestive juices to properly take care of the food you eat. So if you will only give the stomach a little help by taking a Stuart's Dyspepsia Tablet after mneals you will relieve the stomacli of its chief duty and allow it the rest it needs to recuperate. One grain of the active principle in a Stuart 's Dyspepsia Tablet digests 3,000 grains of food, whether you place it in a glass jar with cooked food or in your stomach after you have eaten the food. Ail druggists sel Stuart's Dyspepsia Tablets and once you try tlem 'you wilI neyer again wonder what to do for a disordered, weak, scur and gassy stomach. Stuart 's Dyspepsia Tablets are for sale at ail druggists at 50e a box. Send coupon below to-day and we will at once send vou by mnail, a sample free. I FRIEE TRIAL COUPON -me at once by return mail, afree trial packageofSur'",
         "CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVEBTISEB 4 IMONDS flotey onyorDa by uyng fîromua e Diamond Impor- ''ivrpeý Utal U'4W -erma 20 Per cent down, $1-2-3 weekly. rantee you every advantage in price and quality. WVrite today for Catalog, it is free. ,. Dianod toany part of Canada, for inspection ipense. Lyrteents mýay be made weekly or monthiY wa Speca Discount ot 10 per centhe.r cash. 15Rlos. - Dafud ImuO\u0026\" às 1foronto Arcade, Toronto,lCan 1 Send for Free Book gîving full particu- ~ \"' E best argument forj lars of TRENCH'S RFMEDY, the world Iivraestsath t famous cure for Epilepsy and Fiti- - .isw rh 1 Simple home treatment. 25 years ~ 'it has proved twoh 6 E suces. Tstionils romail \"1 thrpugh service.. 14 ED~ ccs TsC'nlsfn yail -ROGERs BRos.\"Silver Pla4e NCaIS REMEDIIS, LIMITlED au*S .2ui.r TORONTO -1 thatWears\" is sold with an unquali- ' ' ' I ied guarantee iEwag $35 t. $50 pe RayE made possible by furnsh umpeteEqupmet. ..~an actual test of over 65 years. \u003e alog -Plansanud Details-.-FREE E qmsaîm.o..o.oomu.iaÂ mi...Th, Oid Colony pat- tern .çh 'ute here ùs a u - i* - -- - -Colonial design of\" true iimplicity re flectin the di, nit Of les Washed Rapiaiy theiercarp' mn b000 to the busy ho)USeWife, is the , beauty of today. 3all Bearing Washer. Washes clothes cleau three bines as fast as she can doiît ' Sold by 1,h board. Does the trick, too, without le adi ng a button or fraying an edge. Treats dealers. elbris vey getly.Send for abriu vry gntl. ~catalogue. 'for B BaL W asher~",
         "50 CANADIAN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTISER Choose a \" Kelsey\" and be donc witIl Furnace botheri. To have one room bstifllng and ancttier scarçely warm is not 01113 un- satisfactory, but unhealthy. The \" KELSEY - system of beating not only ensures good ventilation, but an even distribution of beat. The ZIG-ZAG heat tubes are entirely different from any other warmn aî,r heater. The special form of construction gives them 61 square feet of radiating surface for one square foot of grate surface. Wilh an equal quantity of fuel a \"KELSEY\" will warmn two or three times more air than an ordinary furnace, andi circulate it more evenly. Our bookiet, to le had for the. asking, tells you ail abont it, andi gives genuine I\u003cèlsey opinions. Reati themn. The JAMES SMART MANUFACTURING Co., Limited WINNIPEG, MAN. BROCKVILLE, ONT. FOR HOME BUILDING Milton Firefla8h Brick is Particularly DesirabIe. MILTON BRIUI \"A Genuine M~ilton Brick Has The Naine IlMILTON \" on are of two distinct styles-red fireflash and buif fire'- flash. The colors-being natural to the shale-are oermanent and flot effected by climate or weather.",
         "CÂNADIÂN MÂGÂZINE ÂDVERTIBEB 51 ECONOMY ine the BUTTER By using the following recipe one Pound of Butter will double its weight and cut your butter bill almost one-haif: BUTTER MIXTURE 11lb« gaod butter 1 heaping teaspoonful Knox Celatine 2 pint botules millc 2 teaspoonfuls Salt Taice the top cream af two piut batules af milk and add enaugli of the miik ta makre one piut. Soak the gelatine lu two tableapoanfuls af the milir 10 minutes; place dîsh over hot water util gelatine Is tboraugbiy dîssalved. Cut the butter mu rnuall pieces and place same iu a dish'over hot water until tie butter begins ta softeu;- then gradulywp the ,milk and cream, sud dîssolved geistine juta the bu:tter wit,ýh a Dover egâgbeater. After the milk is tbaraugbly beaten juta the butter adthe sait ta taste. Yf the miilk formue keep an beatiug until \u0026Il is mixed iu. Place an ice or in a cool place util bard. Ifsa yellaw colorisa desired. use butter colariug. NOTE. This mixture is intended for immediate use. and wiIl do the worlc af two pounda af ordjnary but. ter for table use and for balciug cakes, muins. etc, KNOîàX SPARKLING GELATINE i$sds oude te màle Desserts, Jeiies, h \u0026s Ice Cru=m, Shesbets, Canédes, etc. Let us send y au aur recipe Plut sample (euouigb ta maire boak. .It is FREE for your two lots of tbe Butter Mixture) grocers aunme. wîll be sent for 2c stsmp. CHLARLES B. KNOX CO., 499 Knox Avenue, Johnstown, N. Y. Pscked ln johustovu, N.Y. and Moutreai, P.Q. idensed ,Wood Friter en Save",
         "52 CÂNADIA1N MAGAZINE - DVERTISER Write the date on the negative. Make the pictures that rccording, briefiy, on ,ative, the ail important You can do it instantly you take doubly val the margin of the who - when - where. permanently, at the th an hic Kodak 5 ~-- - -- $22 20 - - - - - - 17 CANADIAD Cataloguefret ai pour dealers. or bymail.",
         "CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER,5 THE NAMVE BEHIND THE GOODS IS YOUR GUARÂNTEE FOR THE QUÂLITY. Rite-Hite\" ,,,'W ARDROBE, TRUN.KS For your winter trip to Cuba, to Bermuda, to Florida, to ý'aIifornia. You may travel in comfort, ease, and luxury, if i0ur travelling companion be a \"Rite-hiteý\" Wardrobe Trunk.' For exicellence, the rnost superbly fitted trunk on the market to-day, greatest in capacity, most conveniently appointed, most perfectly arranged for carrying*your ward- robe with the least possibility of mussing or wrinkling, a wardrohe and chest of drawers under \"1one roof\", spien- didly finished, the regulation size, and minimum weight. A Post Card wl get you a special bookiet telling yo-u ail about \",Rite-hile\" and \" Berth-higk\" wvardrobe trunks. 4RITE - HITE\" Trunke \"BERTH-HIGH' Steamner Trunka $50. to $100., $45. and $60. erhe Julian Sale Leather Goods Co., Liniited 105 King Street West, Toronto.",
         "54 CÂNA\u0026DIÂN MAGAZINE ADVEBTIBER In Times -of War the incomne of the person whose capital is invested stocks and bonds, even of the highest class, is liat' to be adversely affected. At suoh times, the value a substantial balance in the Savings Departmnent THE BANK 0F BRITISH NORTH AMERIC is apparent. Your capital is safe, unaffected by disturbed co: \u003citions, and always at your disposai; while at the sari titne your inçome is assured. THE BANK 0F BRITISH NORTH AMEItI CAPITAL (FuUly Paid) $4,866,666 *.Reserve Fund $3,017,3 Heail Office:-LONDON, ENG, .'. Head Office in Cas da:-MONTREAL H. B. MACKENZIF, G.uoeaI Manager, Montreal SAVINGS DEPARTM.IENT AT ALL BRANCHES Catering to Canadiawi The names of ýCanadians visiting this hotel are immediately commuflicate, to the general manager, who personally arranges for their comfort ar', accommodation. The 'lOld Country\" atmosphere of hospitality i. comnbik ed with the most modern American hotel conveniences. At th~e Hotel Martinique Broadway and 32nd Street CHARLES LEIGH TAYLOR, E OJ WALTER S. GiLsON. Petnt NE YOR VioeýPreident. WAL.TER CHANDLER, h.. Manaer. you can secure a pleasant rooni and bath for $2.50 per day. Our $1.50 tabled'0 dinner, served in the Louis XV room, is regarded as the. best in the. country, and isae\" pailed by~ the. music of a fiu orchestra with vocal quiartettes by singera froml theiet politan Opera Hou. For literature and reservations addreqs our Cauadian advertising agents Sella . Limîted,",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER OWNED BY CANADA OPERATED BY CANADA CANADY.~~]IN GOIVERNMENT RYS.hI ï\u00261 INTERCOLONIAL RAILWAY PRINCE EDWARD ISLAND RAILWAY MARITME EXPRESS 8.45 a. m. Leaves Montreal, Bonaventure Union Depot for St. John and Halifax eWhere Canada's next contingent will embarkIi onnection for Prince Edward Island, The Sydneys and Newfoundland. Sleeping and Dining Car Service. Daily",
         "OÂNÂDIAN MÂQÂZINE ÂDVEInBB T.HE VANDERBILT HOTE Thirty Fourth Street East at Park Avenue NEW YORK -CITY- An Ideàl Hotel with an Ideal SituatO WALTON H. MARSHALL, Manager",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER CANADIAN PACIFIC VINTER T OURS TO.THE LAND 0F unshine and Summer Days CALIFORNIA, FLORIDA, LOUISIANA, Etc. iiited trains lea've ýToronto daily, making direct connection at troit and Buffalo for the Southem States, 'and at Chicago for lifornia, Etc. '()Se contemplating a trip of any nature should consuit Canadian tifie Ticket Agent, who will be pleased to, quote rates, arrange ervations and attend to ail details in connection with your District Passer Agent . TORONTO i'",
         "58 CANADIÂN MAGAZINE ÂDVERTIBEB \"MADE IN CANADA\" The Ford Sedan This car with its graceful lines, artistic and ample proportions, beautiful finish, roomy nterior and luxuriousness in detail of appointment meets the desire for the high class enclosed five-passenger car FulIy Equipped (fo. b. Ford, Ont.) $1150 Buyers of this car wilI share i profits, if we sell at retail 30,000 new Ford cars between August 1914 and August 1915. Write for catalog (E-1.) te",
         "CÂNADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 59 'A $215 Just What She Wants r1jHE Overiand Coupe is especially The. metiiod of driving is the simpleat JLdesigned for madam's comfort and yet deivised. requirements. On the. steering column is a smnail The. doors are of extra widtii and set of electric buttons. By juat pressing heigiit, This perinits her to wear ber these buttons the car is started, stopped largeat bats, without the. Inconvenience and lighted. O~f stooping or turning sideways wiiCf Th neiri fnse uta 5h. liglts o entrs.fashionable mouse gray Bedford cord As the body is very low only a cloth. Short step la necessary when getting lu i.frtlo t hl itebat or out, Tefrtlo tti itebat Thismodl coforabl sea, fur- will bring you to the full realization that Thi indelcomortblyseas fur- tiere la but one Coupe for you-the lvitiiOut crowdlug the occupants or Overldnd. Qii5IIlag9 their gowns. Deliveries can b. made immediately. The. Seat cushions are deep and soft. See it today. Caltopie on requesf. Pkease address Dept. j. The WyIis-Overland of Canada, Limnited iâHAMILTON, ONT. Ë",
         "60 CÂNADIÂN MAGAZINE ADVERIISER 66 Cubic Inches Larger It matters flot who the car ownier is, he wants two things: Safety, Service. BECAUSE he gets these two and mai17 others from Dunlop Traction Treads you find the car owner, wbether he is Doctor, Merchant, Fariner or Manufacturer, one of the many seen driving cars equippeci with the \"Most Envied Tire In Ail America.- MERCHANT Speed for the Doctor. Reliabihty for the Marchant. Comfort for the Fariner. Durablity for the M And these hosts of motorists travet ini perpetual safety, but 1 hear anything \u0026bout rim-cutting, air capacity, etc., unless their acc wbose cars are unequipped wiI Traction Treads tell thein their th T. 94",
         "CANADIAN MAGAZINE ADVERTISER 61 $1,250 fo.b. Oshawa. LI-Who Have Neyer Owned a Motor Car DUJ who profess to know nothing about motor cars-you who are driving some other car-what You think when you hear McLaughlin - Buick Itioned? You Think of Power and Slrength McLaug hlin-Buick Cars SO thoroughly demonstrated .these features by actual performance, their reputation is world wide. It is because motorists want Power 'tre1igth that the entire output of the l4cLaughlin-Buick factory was sold Lst season. ri- -McLaughlin-Buick Valve-in -Head motor is the secret of McLaughlin- IPOwer. The 1915 models are beautif ul in uine'and luxurious ini comifort 'PPOintments, but underneath this beauty and grace are the rugged Pow- dStrength that have made the McLaughlin-Buick fanious. The demsand exceeds the supply. Orders should be placed D~ell in adoance 'f date car is needed. Five models-Fours and Sixes, prkcedfrom $1, 150 10$2,250, F. O.B. Fa-ctory. A demonstration willcon\u003einoe the mostskePtiir4. ~4CLIAUGHLIN CARRIAGE CO., Limited, Oshawa, Ont. St, John, Belleville, Toronto, Hamilton, London, Winnipeg, Reginza, Saskatoon, Calgary, Edmnonton, Vancouver.1",
         "'62 CÂNÂDI MÂGÂZIN ADVIERTIISER You Need Not Wear Cloti of Unbecoming Colors There is no rea.son why you should ever wear clothes of unbecoming colors. Why dis- card clothes because the colors do flot become you ? Follow the example of thousands of thrifty women who use DIAMOND DYES. With DIAMOND DYES right in your own home you can alter the co1or of any garinent 4 with ease, Read what Mrs. Charles Mueller writes:- \" I send yen my photograph which you inay use in your adver- tising if yeu wisb. It shows my silk dress wbich was ligbt green. My familydidneot like it, because they said it did nlot suit ey com-~ plexion. My mother wanted me te discard it, but I decided te dye it, and purcbased sorne DIAMONI) DYES and d)ed it dark brown. It is eow very becoming and suits my complexion beautifully.\" Mrs. C. 1. Treat, writes: '« It i very aneoying to purdiase a garment of which you quickly become tired. \" Last %eason 1 went te buy a top coat. 1 bai made up my mind to buy a black one, but 1 ami so easy that the saeswoman pre- vailed upe me te buy a cbecked coat. Wbee 1 got home ny daughter said it waa eetirely unbecoteing and inappropriate for a woman of m3y age, and 1 detested it al at meason.\u003e 1 recer.tly decided to try dyeing it, and purcbased arme black DIAMOND - DYBS. It came out splendidly. I was surprised the work of dyeieg Checked Coat dye a coat was so easy, and did net tire me a bit DIAMONT\u003e DYES Light Gree Black. are certainIv fashioe helpers, and great money savers.,'ak 3 DIamon4 DyCS \"«A child can use themt\" 5l$uply dissolve the dy. iu wtr aud boil the materiaI in the colored water-",
         "Q6en On those night-like morni~ W HEN you are going fuit - sleep - ahead at ;ix-twenty-five and must Tiake the stop at six-thirty -Sharp -for a safe oversleep Alock signal-a five minute ing that means a quick stop, or ten jerks at the -for plenty of time to \"coal Up\" at the breakfast table and pull out for down- town on schedule-Big Ben. Seven inches of honest clock value - well-wrought and well- balanced. Hîs bell is jolly, deep- toned and clear. His bold, black hands and numerals show plainly în the dim sîx-thirty, light. Hies price is $2.50Oin the States: $3.00 in Canada. Hf yu dealer hasn't him in stock, a mone) order addressed to his mnakers, We8telcz, Laz Sa, Il., will bring him wîth ail transportatiot' charges prepaid. 1",
         "For Clear Thinking Eo.yWt And efforts that count, COGTESSICK Feed Rigbt ( When the one you now ýh, nearly used up, wvet it and 1 it on the end of the new s It stays -you use every bit Grape Nutsstead of having to tbrow awa\u003e with cream ls afic rs suul is ideal food- c ( aGO Delicious flavour and con- S\"OVINtG a1ICI centrated food-strength, At ail good Druggists and Stol Ifyou prefer, send us 4c in stamps for a trial size -enough for a \"There's a lReaso n\" moth'sue COLGA TE \u0026 CO. Look for the famaus littie book, \"The Road LDept. P.Drumondflldg. Montreal mn to Wellville,\" ini packages. W. G. M. SHEPHERD, Montreal Sole Agent fer Cenada T M113lET PAIMTIUB CO. LUUSTID. TORONTO"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly",
         "Index for v. 44 in v. 44, no. 1, CIHM no. 8_06251_261."
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Ontario Pub. Co., [1915]"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ]
   },
   "version" : "0.4",
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06251_264/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "source" : [
         "Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06569_1802",
      "label" : "Volume 58 No. 3 (January 19, 1917)",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06569_1802",
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06569",
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : The Monetary Times Printing Company of Canada, Limited, [1917]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly 19---1970",
         "Index for Volume 58 in Volume 58 No. 1, CIHM no. 8_06569_1800."
      ],
